(base) mayingruideMacBook-Air:script mayingrui$ python main.py
“#Kimye4lyfe.”
“They’re doing couple’s therapy and making a big effort to reconnect.” Yikes — here’s to hoping the two can work things out.”
“...work to get them to this point...”
“A separate insider previously told Radar They ve got a long way to go but they want to have their marriage rock solid by the time their new baby arrives They added They ve just never been the same since Kanye s breakdown and it s taken a lot of...”
“What comes out could be devastating to Kanye, his marriage to Kim, and the Kardashian family.”Meanwhile, the hot couple is also reportedly expecting their third child together via surrogate — and seeking the help of a therapist to prepare.”
““Kanye has opened a can of worms by launching this lawsuit.”
“A source told us exclusively, “This whole lawsuit can blow up in Kanye’s face because if this goes to trial, then all of his and Kim Kardashian’s secrets will come out,” a family insider said.”
“MORE: Kylie Jenner Helped Cut Khloé Kardashian’s Hair and It Actually Looks AmazingPreviously, In Touch reported that the rapper, 40, is in the middle of a nasty lawsuit with his insurance company — who refuses to cover damages that are the result of his canceled Saint Pablo Tour.”
“She wants to protect herself, and for all her faults nobody could blame her.”MUSE SEE: Kylie Jenner Is Reportedly Pregnant With Boyfriend Travis Scott’s Baby — and Is Due in January!”
“...a fine tooth comb especially as her kids are so involved and potentially impacted at this point The insider added Kim s worried sick about Kanye s current situation which has incurred millions in legal fees already and is only getting more expensive and complicated...”


"Jinyev."
"They're doing couple therapy and trying to reestablish a relationship." Yikes - hope the two can solve the problem
“… Try to get them to this point... "
"Another person familiar with the matter told radar earlier that they still have a long way to go, but they hope that their marriage will be as solid as a rock when the new child is born. They added that they have never been the same since Kanye's collapse, which took a lot of time..."
"The result could be devastating for Kanye, his marriage to Kim and the Kardashian family." At the same time, it is reported that the infatuated couple conceived their third child through surrogacy and sought help from a psychologist to prepare
"Kanye launched this lawsuit and has opened a can of worms."
"A source told us exclusively," said a family insider, "that the whole lawsuit could blow up in Kanye's face, because if it goes to court, all the secrets of him and Kim Kardashian will be revealed."
"More: Kelly Jenner cut heloe Kardashian's hair, which looks really amazing. Previously, contact reported that the 40 year old rapper was fighting a bad lawsuit with his insurance company, which refused to compensate for the loss caused by his cancellation of the San Pablo tour. "
"She wants to protect herself. She can't blame for all her mistakes." Musee: it's reported that Kelly Jenner is pregnant with the child of her boyfriend Travis Scott and is expected to be born in January! "
“… A good comb, especially for her children, is so involved and may have an impact on this, the person familiar with the matter added. Kim's worry about the current situation of Kanye's illness has incurred millions of legal costs, just getting more and more expensive and complicated... "



Number  1
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Tom has never actually given a reason as to why he no longer sees his youngest child.”
“She wants to speak to her dad."”
“"She's growing up, asking more questions and it's becoming harder to shield her from the whispers.”
“"It's not surprising that Suri is confused by the lack of communication between her parents," the source told the publication.”
“...become brainwashed by the community...”
“Insiders revealed to Star magazine that the reason Suri is allegedly not allowed to speak to her father publicly is that of his position in the Scientology community as well as concerns from Katie Holmes that her only daughter could...”
“As far as the wider world is aware, Tom Cruise has not seen his daughter, Suri, for more than five years.”


"Tom never explained why he would never see the youngest child again."
"She wants to talk to her father."
"As she grew up, she asked more and more questions, and it became more and more difficult to protect her from whispers."
"Suri is confused about the lack of communication between her parents, which is not surprising," the source told the journal
“… Brainwashed by the community... "
"People familiar with the matter told star magazine that Suri was accused of not speaking to her father publicly because of her status in the Scientology community and Katie Holmes' concern that her only daughter might..."
"As far as the world knows, Tom Cruise hasn't seen his daughter Suri for more than five years."



Number  2
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Be sure to subscribe to our YouTube channel for fun, exclusive videos with your favorite stars.”
“Love J-14?”
“OK!”
“Magazine is reporting that the "Wildest Dreams" singer has been contacting her ex ever since he has been in New York City starring in the Broadway show called Sunday in the Park With George.”
“The tabloid is reporting that a source is saying that Taylor is the one reaching out to the actor since she feels she is now more mature than she was when they dated back in 2010.”
“The source said, “Taylor was so young when they dated, she wasn’t ready for a serious relationship, but now she’s showing Jake how much she’s matured.”
“She’s excited to see where things go.”In 2015, a rumor swirled around saying that the stars were in contact with each other, even though she was dating Calvin Harris at the time.”
“An unidentified source told Star magazine that, “He said he owed Taylor an apology for how things ended between them.”
“In June, Jake ran into Cara Delevingne at The Graham Norton Show and asked for Taylor’s new number.”
“They’ve kept in touch, albeit secretly, ever since."”


"Be sure to subscribe to our YouTube channel and watch interesting exclusive videos with your favorite stars."
"Love j-14?"
"All right!"
The magazine reported that the "wildest dream" singer has been contacting her ex girlfriend since she starred in the Broadway TV series Sunday in the park with George in New York
"The tabloid reported that a source said Taylor was the one who contacted the actor because she felt more mature now than when they dated in 2010."
"Tyler and Jack were too young when they dated and she wasn't ready for a serious relationship, but now she shows Jack how mature she is," the source said
"She's very happy to see that happen." In 2015, a rumor circulated that the stars were connected, even though she was dating Calvin Harris
"An unidentified source told Star Magazine," he said he owed Taylor an apology for how things ended between them
"In June, Jack met Carla delaviny on the Graham Norton show and asked for Taylor's new number."
"Since then, they have kept in touch, though secretly."



Number  3
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“The LA TV executive said: “Mel was incredibly open about their fights and arguments in front of staff on America’s Got Talent and other shows.”
“One model, who would not be named, even claimed that in recent weeks Stephen has been “acting like a single man”.”
“The writing has been on the wall for a while.”
“(Image: Getty)An insider said: “Ever since they got married, they have been plagued with ­problems.”
“Sources said Mel’s loss was compounded by a series of rows with her film producer hubby over cash.”
“Earlier this month, she posted a snap of her and sister Danielle, 36, holding his hand after he lost a five-year battle with myeloma cancer.”
“As their relationship failed, Mel was reconciled with her family after dad Martin made a plea.”
“Belafonte, 41, denied assaulting her.”
“(Image: PA)There were fears for her three years ago when she turned up for The X Factor panel one Sunday in the UK with bruises and scratches on her face and arms.”
“Their connection by the end was all but burned out.”Mel, 41, fell out with her family when they told her of their concerns over ­ Belafonte ahead of their 2007 wedding.”


"Mel is very candid about their quarrels and arguments in front of the staff of" America's got talent "and other programs," said the head of Los Angeles television
One model, who declined to be named, even claimed that in recent weeks Stephen had "acted like a bachelor."
"The handwriting has been on the wall for some time."
(photo: Getty) a person familiar with the matter said: "since they got married, they have been troubled by all kinds of problems."
"The source said Mel's loss was due to a series of arguments with her film producer husband over cash issues."
Earlier this month, she posted a picture of her holding his hand with her 36 year old sister Danielle after his five-year battle with myeloma cancer failed
"Because of the breakdown of their relationship, Mel reconciled with his family after his father Martin made a request."
"Belafonte, 41, denied attacking her."
"(photo: PA) three years ago, when she appeared in the UK to join the X factor group on a Sunday, people were afraid of her because she had bruises and scratches on her face and arms."
Mel, 41, fell out with her family after telling her about their concerns about Belafonte before her wedding in 2007



Number  4
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Journalism', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“He is said to be a ‘love addict’ and his parents’ example is far from encouraging."”
“One source told The Daily Beast, "There is always room for doubt because he is a serial commitment-phobe.”
“People don’t care about the Royal wedding because they don’t care about people around here."”
“Local storeowner Mike Eweje told the Daily Express, "It’s a stunt for the Royal family.”
“Locals weren't overjoyed by the visit as one accused their charity work of being a 'stunt'.”
“Or has the couple just been spending too much time together carrying out their Royal duties?”
“Was there a fight in the car before they arrived?”
“Like in this video when Harry and Meghan were in Brixton for charity work, she reaches out for her hand but he shuns her away with no explanation.”
“...express.co.ukWhen you're one of the most photographed couples in the world, the paparazzi will be sure to capture moments you don't quite want to be made public.”
“...advertising15 Why Did Harry Really Push Meghan's Hand Away In This Video?”


"It is said that he is a 'love addict', and his parents' example is not inspiring at all."
"There's always room for doubt because he's a serial commitment phobia," a source told the Daily Beast
"People don't care about royal weddings because they don't care about people here."
"It's a royal stunt," local shopkeeper Mike everyer told the daily express
"The local people are not happy with the visit, because some people accuse their charity work of being a" gimmick. "
"Or did the couple spend too much time together on Royal duties?"
"Was there a fight in the car before they came?"
"Just like in this video, when Harry and Megan are doing charity work in Brixton, she reaches out her hand, but he avoids her without explanation."
"... express company, you are one of the most photographed lovers in the world, and paparazzi will capture the moment you don't want to be public."
“… Ad 15 why does Harry really push Megan's hand away in this video? "



Number  5
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“[My daughters] look at her like she's the Messiah," he said.”
“"We understand each other's lives in a way that most other people couldn't.”
“The singer and actress talked to Harper's Bazaar about her relationship with the retired baseball player, and she stated that she doesn't see a wedding in her immediate future.”
“"I do believe in marriage, and I would love to grow old with somebody in a committed relationship," the Shades of Blue star explained.”
“"But I'm not forcing anything right now."”
“After all, Lopez and Rodriguez haven't been dating for all that long.”
“Since they began their relationship just over a year ago, they've focused on blending their families and cultivating their bond.”
“"It's good, it's healthy; we communicate well," she continued.”
“We both entered the public eye in our early 20s and overachieved right from the start.”
“[Jennifer] is such a great role model.”


"(my daughters) look at her as if she were the Savior," he said
"Our understanding of each other's lives is beyond most people's understanding."
The singer and actress talked about her relationship with the retired baseball player at Harper fair and said she would not be married in the near future
"I believe in marriage, and I want to grow old with someone who has a loyal relationship," blue star's shadow explains
"But I'm not forcing anyone now."
"After all, Lopez and Rodriguez didn't date that long."
"Since they started dating more than a year ago, they have focused on integrating families and developing relationships."
"Very good, very healthy; we communicate very well," she continued
"We all came into the public eye in our early 20s and made remarkable achievements from the very beginning."
"(Jennifer) is a good example."



Number  6
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“1 celebrity crush.”For more exclusive celebrity news, pick up the latest issue of In Touch, on newsstands now!”
“Magazine reported that the Fight Club hunk was “ready to move on” with Margot.”
“At the Hollywood Film Awards on Sunday, Nov. 5 in LA, Margot, 27, excitedly approached Angelina Jolie to introduce herself.”
“But instead of a warm reply, Angie “curtly replied, ‘I know who you are’ and turned her back on Margot,” an insider exclusively tells In Touch.”
“According to the source, the Australian-born beauty “looked shocked.” Jealousy may be to blame.”
“When Margot starred in 2015’s The Big Short alongside Angelina’s ex Brad Pitt, “rumors swirled about Brad crushing on Margot and that Angelina had tried to stop Brad from casting Margot in the film,” says the insider.”
“(Photo Credit: Splash)The source says that the mom-of-six — who shares Maddox, 16, Pax, 13, Zahara, 12, Shiloh, 11, Vivienne, 9, and Knox, 9, with Brad, 53 — can’t shake her resentment toward the Suicide Squad actress.”
““It was clear from Angelina’s reaction to Margot that she still holds a grudge,” the source says.”
“Back in November 2016, not long after Angelina, 42, filed for divorce from Brad, OK!”
““He thinks she’s the hottest girl in Hollywood right now,” a source said at the time.”


"1 celebrity infatuation". For more exclusive celebrity news, listen to the latest issue of in touch right now at the newsstand! "
The magazine reported that the fight club's handsome guy is ready to "move on" with Margot
"On Sunday, November 5, at the Hollywood Film Awards in Los Angeles, Margot, 27, excitedly approached Angelina Jolie to introduce herself."
"But Angie didn't answer enthusiastically, but" simply, "I know who you are" and recited her to Margot, "a person familiar with the matter said exclusively in contact magazine
According to sources, the Australian born beauty "looks shocked." Jealousy may be the culprit
"When Margot and Angelina's former Brad Pitt starred in the 2015 blockbuster," it was rumored that Brad had a crush on Margot, who Angelina had tried to prevent from playing in the film
"(photo source: splash) the source said the mother of six - Maddox, 16, parks, 13, Zahara, 12, Shiloh, 11, Vivian, 9, Knox, 9, and Brad, 53 - couldn't get rid of her resentment for the suicide group actresses."
"It's clear from Angelina's reaction to Margot that she still has a grudge," the source said
"Back in November 2016, shortly after Angelina, 42, filed for divorce from Brad, OK!"
"He thinks she's the sexiest girl in Hollywood right now," a source at the time said



Number  7
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Embed Code RestartRelated Gallery...”
“If you are using ad-blocking software, please disable it and reload the page.”
“This video is unavailable because we were unable to load a message from our sponsors.”
“Everything You Need to Know About the Kardashian-Jenner Babies On The Way!”
“Watch the video below for everything you need to know about Kylie Jenner, Khloe Kardashian and Kim Kardashian West's babies-on-the-way.”
“...eighty percent would be expecting a child...”
“Kourtney Kardashian kourtneykardash October 24 2017 MORE Keeping Up With the Kardashian Jenner Pregnancies A Breakdown of Kim Khloe Kylie s Babies on the Way If Kourtney was pregnant the Kardashian Jenner Rugrats style playpen that surely exists would about to get pretty crowded as four of the five sisters...”
“...of context...”
“The interviewer asked me What s a crazy rumor that you ve heard about yourself and my answer was I ve heard that I am pregnant Kourtney Kardashian kourtneykardash October 24 2017 I see online that I said I was pregnant in an interview but that was completely taken out...”
“"I see online that I said I was pregnant in an interview, but that was completely taken out of context."”


"Embedded code restart related libraries..."
If you are using ad blocking software, disable it and reload the page
"This video is not available because we were unable to load the sponsor's email."
"Everything you need to know about Kardashian Jenner's children is on the way!"
"Watch the video below for all the information about Kelly Jenner, Carol Kardashian and Kim Kardashian West's baby on the way."
“… Eighty percent of people get pregnant... "
"Kourtney Kardashian Kourtney kardash on October 24, 2017, pay more attention to the collapse of Kim Khloe Kylie's baby on the way to pregnancy. If Kourtney is pregnant, the game console with the style of Kardashian Jenner Rugrats will be very crowded, because there are four of the five sisters..."
“… Context... "
"The interviewer asked me what crazy rumors you heard about yourself, and my answer was that I heard that I was pregnant. On October 24, 2017, I saw on the Internet that I said in the interview that I was pregnant, but that was completely deleted..."
"I saw on the Internet that I said in an interview that I was pregnant, but that was completely out of context."



Number  8
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Kendall and Kylie Jenner, Brody‘s half-sisters, were also not in attendance at the affair and never RSVP’d.”
“Find out where Caitlyn was instead of attending her son’s wedding.”
““I’m pretty used to her doing that sort of thing.”Brody and his wife, Kaitlynn Carter, married at the Nihi Sumba Resort on Sumba island, off the coast of Indonesia on Saturday (June 2).”
““Especially considering that she had known about the wedding for a year.”“I wasn’t surprised,” he added.”
““It was a big disappointment,” the 34-year-old son of the former Olympian told People.”
“Brody Jenner is breaking his silence after Caitlyn Jenner skipped his wedding this past weekend.”


"Kendall and Kelly Jenner, Brody's half sisters, were not involved in the affair, and never were."
"Find out where Caitlin is instead of going to her son's wedding."
"I'm used to her doing that." Brody and his wife, Kaitlyn Carter, married on Saturday (June 2) at the nihi Sumba resort on Sumba island off the coast of Indonesia
"Especially considering that she has known about the wedding for a year." "I'm not surprised at all," he added
"It's a big disappointment," the 34 year old son of the former Olympian told people
"Brody Jenner broke his silence after Caitlin Jenner missed last weekend's wedding."



**Something goes wrong**
“Kanye West Tweets 'All Love' for Kate Spade's Family After Sharing His Mental Health StrugglesKanye West Says He Was Diagnosed With a ‘Mental Condition’ at Age 39Related Gallery...”
“Embed Code RestartRELATED CONTENT:Ariana Grande and Pete Davidson Attend Kanye West, Kid Cudi Listening Party Together: Pics!”
“West celebrated his 41st birthday on Saturday with friends, family, music, a mind-bending mentalist and lattes that had the foam made into an image of his face because, of course.”
“West's wife, Kim Kardashian, shared videos and pictures from inside the amazing soiree on social media.”
“They show a fun, festive affair, with West looking relaxed and having fun as world-class mentalist Lior Suchard completely destroyed some minds in the room with some spectacular visual illusions, suggestive powers and what looks suspiciously like some legit mind reading and telekinesis.”
“Suchard bent a spoon rubbing his finger on it and flipped a pair of glasses with what looked like a simple wave of his hand, delighting the ever-living heck out of West and his friends.”
“The party appeared to have had a cave theme, with moss hanging from the ceiling, low light and a mountain-themed birthday cake.”
“Kourtney Kardashian and Kendall Jenner were also in attendance.”
“West looked comfortable holding court, at one point, sitting on a couch and just taking everything in as his music played.”
“And then, there were those lattes with Kanye's face made into the foam.”


"After sharing Kate Spade's mental health dilemma, Kanye West expressed" all love "for Kate Spade's family on twitter. Kanye West said he was diagnosed with "mental illness" at the age of 39
"Embedded code restart" content: Ariana grand and Peter Davidson attend Kanye West, kid Cuddy's listening party: photos
On Saturday, West celebrated his 41 birthday with friends, family members, music, a psychiatrist and latte.
"West's wife, Kim Kardashian, shared the videos and pictures inside the wonderful party on social media."
"They show an interesting festive atmosphere. The west looks relaxed and interesting, because the world-class psychiatrist Lior Suchard completely destroyed some thoughts in the room with some spectacular visual illusion, the power of suggestion and some suspicious legal mind reading and remote control."
"Suchard bent down a spoon, rubbed it with his fingers and turned a pair of glasses upside down with a simple wave, which made the guy and his friends in the West happy."
"The party seems to have a cave theme, with moss hanging on the ceiling, dark light, and a birthday cake with a mountain theme."
"Courtney Kardashian and Kendall Jenner were also present."
"West looks comfortable on the court. Once, he sat on the sofa, listening to music and listening to everything
"And then there are latte made of Kanye's face to make bubbles."



Number  10
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Journalism', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
““My little one is very, very generous and very sensitive,” Holmes said, according to People.”
“Numerous reports describe Suri as an intelligent, kind-hearted girl, with Holmes herself opening up about her daughter’s philanthropic heart in a 2015 interview with Today.”
““She’s slowly warming up to the idea of a reunion,” an insider told the Star.”
“But Holmes also was torn because she wants to do what’s best for Suri.”
“...controversial self styled religious organization the Star reported...”
“He s dying to be a part of her life Holmes isn t a fan of a reunion given that she agreed to stay quiet about Cruise and Scientology if he agreed to stay away from their daughter and not try to brainwash her into becoming a part of the...”
“He’s had to watch from afar as Suri grew into a lovely young lady, and he regrets that he’s missed out on so much.”
““But Tom’s tired of being bossed around by them.”
““Tom is a loyal Scientologist, so when church leaders told him he couldn’t see Suri, he didn’t question it,” an insider told the Star.”
“According to Hollywood Life, citing a report by Star magazine, Cruise ached over the fact that he had been an absent father and not seen his daughter in more than five years, because his Church of Scientology bosses told him he couldn’t see her.”


"My child is very, very generous, very sensitive," Holmes said, according to people
"Many reports describe Suri as a smart and kind-hearted girl, and Sherlock Holmes himself disclosed her daughter's charity in an interview with today magazine in 2015."
"She's slowly becoming interested in the idea of reunion," a person familiar with the matter told the star
"But Holmes was torn, too, because she wanted to do the best for Suri."
“…… Star, a controversial self styled religious organization
"He longed to be a part of her life. Holmes didn't like reunion because she agreed to keep silent with cruise and Scientology. If he agreed to stay away from their daughter, he didn't want to brainwash her to become It's part of the story. "
"He had to watch Suri grow into a lovely young woman from a distance. He regretted missing so much."
"But Tom is fed up with them."
"Tom is a loyal Scientologist, so when church leaders told him he couldn't see Suri, he didn't question it," a source told sky
"According to a report in Star Magazine quoted by Hollywood life daily, cruise felt sad that he was an absent father and had not seen his daughter for more than five years, because his Scientology boss told him that he could not see his daughter."



Number  11
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“All of them are really hoping for a positive outcome for Khloé’s sake.””
““But they also need his commitment in order for the relationship to succeed.”
“...will be documented on season 15 which premieres Sunday...”
“(Khloé, 33, and Thompson, 27, welcomed their first child together, daughter True, on April 12 — just two days after allegations surfaced that he cheated on her throughout her pregnancy.)”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
““I don’t want to give too much away, because we genuinely had those conversations and sometimes we were filming and sometimes we weren’t,” said Kim, 37.”
““It was more maybe when Khloé wanted her privacy and no cameras when she was in Cleveland going through that, [but] the sisters were still all filming and talking [about] how to approach it and what to do.”Kim admitted the situation was a first for the famous family.”
““It was definitely new territory for us when you have a new baby coming into the world,” she said.”
““I think ultimately, we always want her to be happy, but it gets all clouded when there’s a baby, you know?”“Her motherly instincts kicked in and she has to do what makes her happy,” she added of Khloé standing by Thompson.”
““So we’ll support that.”Reflecting on Khloé going into labor in Cleveland while the rest of the family was in Los Angeles, Kim said her sister wanted to keep the news under wraps.”


"For the sake of Heroe, they all want a positive result."
"But they also need his commitment to make the relationship work."
“… Recording for season 15, which premieres on Sunday... "
"Heloe, 33, and Thompson, 27, welcomed their first child together on April 12. Daughter Zhen, just two days ago, was accused of cheating her during her pregnancy."
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
"I don't want to reveal too much, because we really had conversations like this, sometimes we were shooting, sometimes we didn't," said Kim, 37
"It's more likely that when heloe goes through all this in Cleveland, she wants her privacy and doesn't have a camera, (but) the sisters are still filming, talking about how to get close to it and what to do." Kim admitted that this was the first time for the famous family
"When you have a new child coming into the world, it's definitely a new field for us," she said
"I think in the end, we always want her to be happy, but with children, everything becomes cloudy, you know? "Her maternal instinct worked and she had to do what made her happy," she added, adding that Heroe was standing next to Thompson
"So we will support that." Kim recalled that when Carol gave birth in Cleveland, the rest of the family was in Los Angeles, and said her sister wanted to keep the news secret



Number  12
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“The newlyweds of three months are pictured in a tight embrace, both leaning toward each other.”
“Getty Images2015: When they got married.”
“We know this because other clues override the separation: the smile on Jen's face, the way their fingers are interlocked, and the placement of their feet.”
“And despite the space between them—which is a huge indicator of distance in a relationship—Wood says the relationship was in a good place; the pull away must have been due to movement here.”
“Wood describes it as "real pleasure," which makes a lot of sense considering the photo was taken just months before Brad and Jen's wedding.”
“Notice Jens's smile in this photo.”
“Getty Images2000: When they got married.”
“This means that his facial expressions are more subtle; he tends to smile less in photos or save his smiles for more intimate, private moments.”
“One thing to keep in mind about Brad is that he is a "C personality type," according to Wood.”
“"It says, 'When we're out together, I'm going to always do this...I never want to be more than an arms length away.'"”


"The three-month-old newlyweds are hugging each other in the picture, both of them nestling up to each other."
"Getty images2015: when they got married."
"We know this because other clues mask the separation: the smile on Jane's face, the way their fingers cross, and the position of their feet."
"Although the distance between them is a huge indicator of the distance in a relationship, wood said the relationship is in a good place; pulling away must be due to the movement here."
Wood described it as "real happiness," which makes sense considering that the photo was taken a few months before Brad and Jan's wedding
"Notice Jans' smile in this picture."
"Getty images2000: when they got married."
"It means that his facial expression is more subtle; he tends to smile less in the picture, or leave it for more intimate and private moments."
"One thing Brad has to remember is that he's a type C character," Wood said
"It says," when we go out together, I'll do it all the time I never want to be more than one arm away. "



Number  13
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
““Homecoming” will debut Friday, Nov. 2 on Prime Video.”
“Watch the trailer above.”
“And though it only gives us a tiny glimpse of Roberts in character as caseworker Heidi Bergman (she literally just scribbles down some notes, says the above line to someone off camera and then clicks on a tape recorder) we’re already entranced by her calm, collected mannerisms.”
“Luckily, Amazon also revealed that you won’t have to wait much longer, as “Homecoming” will premiere this November on the streaming service.”
“The rest of the one-minute clip promoting the mind-bending drama directed by “Mr.”
“Robot” creator Sam Esmail, explores the abandoned halls of what we can safely assume is the titular Homecoming Transitional Support Center where Heidi workers, a Geist Group facility helping soldiers transition back to civilian life.”
“Also Read: 'My Best Friend's Wedding' Reunion: Dermot Mulroney Joins Julia Roberts on Amazon's 'Homecoming'Walter Cruz (Stephan James) is one of these soldiers, eager to begin the next phase of his life.”
“Overseeing Heidi and the facility is Colin Belfast (Bobby Cannavale), an ambitious company man whose manic demands point to questionable motives.”
“Four years later, Heidi has started a new life, living with her mother (Sissy Spacek) and working as a small-town waitress, when a Department of Defense auditor (Shea Whigham) comes to her with questions about why she left the Homecoming facility.”
“Heidi begins to realize that there’s a whole other story behind the story she’s been telling herself.”


The homecoming festival will premiere in prime time on Friday, November 2
"Look at the trailer above."
"Although this only gives us a little understanding of Roberts' role as Heidi Bergman, a social worker (she just jots down some notes, says a word to someone outside the camera, and then clicks on the tape recorder), we have been attracted by her calm and calm manner."
"Fortunately, Amazon also revealed that you don't have to wait too long, because" coming home "will premiere on the streaming service in November this year."
"The rest of the minute is to promote the segment of a funny play directed by Mr
Sam esmail, the creator of "robot", explored the abandoned hall. We can safely assume that this is the nominal transitional support center for returning home, and Heidi workers are the spiritual group facilities to help soldiers return to civilian life
"Also read: 'my best friend's wedding' reunion: Dermot muroni and Julia Roberts on Amazon's" home "together, Walter Cruz (Stephen James) is one of these soldiers, eager to start the next stage of his life."
Colin Belfast (Bob cannavale) is Heidi and the head of the factory, he is an ambitious company owner, fanatical demands show that his motivation is questionable
"Four years later, Heidi started a new life. She lived with her mother (sissy spike) and worked as a waiter in a small town when a department of defense auditor (shea Wickham) came to ask why she left the homecoming facility."
"Heidi began to realize that there was a completely different story behind her own story."



Number  14
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Image zoom Credit: DANIEL LEAL-OLIVAS/AFP/Getty...”
“William and Kate waited two days before announcing both George and Charlotte’s names.”
“The royal baby’s name is typically revealed within a few days after the birth — after the Queen is informed of the parents’ choice.”
“Watch the full episode of Raising a Royal streaming now on PeopleTV.com, or download the PeopleTV app on your favorite device.”
“It was signed at the hospital by Kate’s doctors and then taken back to the palace by car.”
“Image zoom Credit: Dan Kitwood/GettyImage zoom Credit: Dan Kitwood/GettyThe formal announcement includes the sex of the baby and the time of birth.”
“Although royal births are now announced on social media, the tradition of announcing the birth outside of Buckingham Palace on an ornate golden easel still remains.”
“Just as when Prince George and Princess Charlotte were born, the traditional framed bulletin was brought out of the Privy Purse Door and carried across the forecourt, to be placed on the easel in front of the Queen’s residence.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
“Following the announcement of the birth of Prince William and Kate Middleton ’s third baby on Monday, a framed notice of the birth has gone on display on a ceremonial easel outside of Buckingham Palace.”


"Image zooming credit: Daniel real-olivas / AFP / Getty..."
"William and Kate waited two days to announce the names of George and Charlotte."
"The name of a royal baby is usually revealed within a few days of birth - after the queen is informed of her parents' choice."
"Now watch the whole episode of raising the royal family, or download the peopletv app on your favorite device. “
"It's signed by Kate's doctor at the hospital and sent back to the palace by car."
"Image zooming source: Dan Kitwood / gettyimage zoom source: Dan Kitwood / gettythe official announcement includes baby gender and time of birth."
"Although the birth of the royal family has been announced on social media, the tradition of announcing the birth of the royal family on the magnificent golden easel outside Buckingham Palace still exists."
"Just like when Prince George and Princess Charlotte were born, the traditional framed notice was taken out of the door of the private purse, carried over the front yard and placed on the easel in front of the Queen's residence."
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
A framed birth notice is on display on a ceremonial easel outside Buckingham Palace after the birth of Prince William and Kate Middleton's third child on Monday



Number  15
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“You can read the full interview here.”
“He also spoke on Bieber growing up in the spotlight, Iggy Azalea’s new music, and whether the upcoming releases from Vince Staples and 2 Chainz will step on each other.”
“We got a taste of what’s coming this weekend, when two full-length tracks (featuring Migos, Young Thug, and ASAP Rocky) plus one snippet surfaced online.”
“In a recent appearance on Ebro in the Morning, Chance The Rapper noted that Kanye is working with Francis from Francis and the Lights on Ye’s next album.”
“Kanye has also reportedly been working with Pusha T.According to a previous report from TMZ, Kanye has been doing this work “holed up” somewhere in Wyoming for inspiration.”
“But, according to a new interview with Def Jam CEO Steve Bartels, Kanye may actually be working on the new project in Utah.”
“He's somewhere out west, it appears, but no one seems to know exactly where.”
“Here is the interaction between Variety and Bartels.”
“Variety: Let me ask what’s up with several of your artists.”
“Word was that Kanye West was recording by himself somewhere in Utah—is that real?”


"You can watch the full interview here."
"He also talked about Bieber growing up in the spotlight, the new music of egie Rhododendron, and whether the upcoming works of Vince staples and 2.chaenz will influence each other."
"We've seen what's coming this weekend, with two complete tracks (including migos, young thug and ASAP rocky) and a clip coming out on the Internet."
"In a recent appearance at Ebro in the morning, chance rapper pointed out that Kanye is working with Francis from Francis and light leaf's next album."
"Kanye is also reported to be working with pusha t. According to a previous TMZ report, Kanye has been "hiding" somewhere in Wyoming for inspiration. "
"But according to a recent interview with Steve Bartels, chief executive of def jam, Kanye may be working on a new project in Utah."
"He seems to be somewhere in the west, but no one seems to know exactly where he is."
"It's the interaction between diversity and barter."
"Diversity: let me ask you a few artists what happened."
"Is it true to hear that Kanye West is recording alone somewhere in Utah?"



Number  16
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
““Strip That Down” does feature a rapper, Migos’s Quavo, but a redux of the only song of note that Tyga has ever made it is not.”
““My song’s more ‘Rack City’ and his song is more of a different era to something I’d listen to, I guess,” he said.”
“That’s the way I’d put it best, I think.” Liam also noted that Harry would probably say the same about his music since Harry doesn’t listen to hip-hop.”
“But he did have a quick save: “I think he did a great job of doing what he wanted to do.”
“It’s not something I’d listen to,” he said.”
““I’ll be honest with you, it’s not my sort of music.”
“Speaking with Music Choice, he complimented Niall Horan’s new singles, but Harry Styles, not so much.”
“...this song is not the only opportunity Payne has had to make his thoughts on his bandmates known...”
“I m not changing the way that I used to be I just want to have fun and get rowdy But with nearly all remaining members of One Direction releasing new music of their own within weeks of each other...”
““People want me for one thing, that’s not me.”


"Striptease" does have a rap singer, migos's kwavo, but the ensemble of TEGA's only noteworthy song is not
"My songs are more like 'rock city' and his songs are more like a different era. I think I will listen to them," he said
"I think that's the best way I can say it." Liam also pointed out that Harry might say the same thing to his music, because Harry doesn't listen to hip-hop music
But he was quick to save: "I think he's doing a good job doing what he wants to do."
"That's not what I want to hear," he said
"To be honest, it's not my favorite music."
"When it comes to music choice, he praised Neil Holland's new single, but not much for Harry stiles."
“…… This song is not the only chance for Penn to let you know what he thinks of his band mates... "
"I haven't changed my life style. I just want to have fun and make noise, but almost all members in one direction will release their new music in a few weeks..."
"People want me to have one thing, it's not me."



Number  17
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Cast members clearly work well together and are set to continue bringing viewers hilarious and clever episodes weekly.”
“The massively successful sitcom would not have endured over the years if the rumored high tensions and drama were fact.”
“The publication indicates that viewer numbers have skyrocketed from 16 million to 21 million as of late, and has a 5.0 rating, which is up from 3.1 in the 18-49 age group.”
“Not only is there no drama behind the scenes, but the ratings are in for the 2018 premiere, and the Big Bang Theory remains to be CBS’ powerhouse sitcom, as Variety corroborates.”
“The stars are not battling over paychecks and in fact, made news when the top paid actors took pay cuts so that two cast members, co-stars Mayim Bialik and Melissa Rauch, could receive raises.”
“...relayed the story that has been circulated about supposed drama and tensions tearing the show apart is completely fake news...”
“Last year Cuoco posted a funny Instagram photo of Galecki cuddling with her current boyfriend Karl Cook and joked in the caption Get off my man Clearly there are no hard feelings between the exes and co stars GC has checked in with CBS sources and a trustworthy insider has...”
““Cuoco and Galecki have remained on good terms since their 2010 split.”
“However, the gossip policing site has reminded how Cuoco and Galecki are actually friendly on set since their split and joke around, as indicated by posts to social media.”
“Now none of them socialize together at all once the cameras stop rolling.”Apparently there has never been a “friendly” relationship among cast members since the show aired, according to the same source, that is.”


"The actors are obviously working very well together and they will continue to bring funny and smart episodes to the audience every week."
"If the rumored high tension and dramatization is true, then this massive and successful sitcom will not last for many years."
"The publication shows that the number of viewers has soared from 16 million to 21 million recently, with a rating of 5.0, higher than the 3.1 of the 18-49 age group."
"Not only is there no plot behind the scenes, but the audience rating of its premiere in 2018 is also very high. The Big Bang is still the highlight of CBS, and the variety show proves that."
"Stars don't fight over salaries. In fact, when the highest paid actors cut their salaries so that the two actors, CO stars maim bialik and Melissa Rauch, can get a raise, they become news."
“… The stories reported, the hypothetical dramas and tension torn programs that have been circulated are completely false news. "
"Last year, cuoco posted an interesting photo on instagram, in which galecki and his current boyfriend Karl cook hugged each other and joked in the title that" let go of my man ". It is obvious that there is no bad feeling between ex girlfriend and co star. GC has verified with CBS sources that a trustworthy insider has..."
"Kuko and galleki have maintained a good relationship since they separated in 2010."
However, the gossip police website reminds people how friendly they have been on the set since Kuko and gaylecky broke up and joked, as social media Posts show
"Now, once the camera stops turning, they have no one to socialize with at all." According to the same source, it is clear that there has never been a "friendly" relationship between actors since the show was broadcast



Number  18
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Unclear if they interacted, but no one left bloodied.”
“Get this ... last night Chris and Tyson showed up at the same place -- the iHeartRadio Summer Pool Party in Vegas.”
“Chris later apologized.”
“You'll recall, Brown threatened Tyson Beckford a week ago after she posted a pic of the 2 of them in Vegas.”
“Karrueche was leaving 1OAK in West Hollywood when she bristled at the notion that Chris Brown scared her away from posting pics of herself with other guys.”
“Play video content EXCLUSIVE TMZ.comKarrueche Tran got hot as fish grease Saturday night when we asked if she was allowed to still mug with men.”


"It's not clear if they interacted, but no one left blood."
"Take this... Chris and Tyson were in the same place last night - iHeartRadio summer pool party in Las Vegas. "
"Chris apologized later."
"You remember, brown threatened Tyson Beckford a week ago because she posted pictures of the two of them in Vegas."
"When carruche left West Hollywood, she was furious at the thought that Chris Brown had scared her away and dared not put pictures of herself and other men together."
"Play exclusive video content" TMZ.comKarrueche On Saturday night, when we asked her if she could still drink with men, she was very hot



Number  19
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Magazine in June that the decision regarding who would move in to the residence had "not yet been finalized."”
“A palace spokesperson told Hello!”
“The complex has 21 rooms, slightly topping the size of William and Kate's, but few details are available other than its overall size.”
“The two used to be one enormous set of rooms until they were divided in the 1950s.”
“Apartment 1 is a large complex of rooms in the main palace building, much like like William and Kate's home at 1A.”
“The Old Stables recently received a $493,000 renovation in preparation for the move.”
“Moving vans were spotted outside of Kensington Palace and are reportedly going to relocate the Duke and Duchess to the Old Stables, a smaller residence on Kensington Palace grounds.”
“The Sun had previously reported that the couple offered to vacate the property to make way for Prince Harry and Meghan Markle, though this plan did not come to fruition in light of their move to Windsor.”
“They have called the apartment home since 1972.”
“Getty ImagesThe Duke of Gloucester, one of Queen Elizabeth II's cousins, and his wife, the Duchess of Gloucester, were the last to reside in Apartment 1.”


A June magazine said the decision on who will move into the house "has not been finalized"
"Hello from the palace spokesman
"The complex has 21 rooms, slightly better than William and Kate's, but there are few details other than the overall size."
"The two rooms used to be a huge suite until they were separated in the 1950s."
"Apartment 1 is a large comprehensive room in the main building of the palace, much like William and Kate's home in 1a."
"The old stables recently received a decoration fee of 493000 yuan to prepare for the relocation."
"A moving van was found outside Kensington Palace and it is reported that they will move the Duke and Duchess to the old stables, a smaller residence in Kensington Palace."
The sun had previously reported that the couple had offered to vacate their property to make way for Prince Harry and Megan markel, but the plan did not materialize considering their move to Windsor
"They've been calling this apartment home since 1972."
Getty Elizabeth II's cousin, the Duke of Gloucester, and his wife, the Duchess of Gloucester, were the last to live in apartment 1



Number  20
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Like, she is my best friend and I just want to be with her all the time."”
“And she's the only person I want to hang out with.”
“Portia told ET: "We're just really good friends and we talk about everything, and we never ever, ever lie to each other, like, not even the tiniest lies.”
“The couple have repeatedly denied reports that they are trying to hide their marital problems.”
“DeGeneres married the Australian-American actress in 2008 at their home in Beverly Hills after the state of California lifted its ban on same-sex marriages.”
“That does not seem to be their problem right now."”
“The source shared: "Ellen has always been a drinker, but she does not drink on set or when she is working.”
“DeGeneres has apparently quit drinking, which was earlier cited as reason for difference between them.”
“"Ellen and Portia were carrying on like a couple of happy high schoolers," the insider added.”
“But everything got really mellow once the spliff was passed around."”


"Like, she's my best friend, and I just want to be with her all the time."
"She's the only one I want to be with."
"We're just really good friends," Portia told et. "we talk about everything, and we never, never lie to each other, not even the smallest lies."
"The couple repeatedly denied reports that they were trying to hide their marital problems."
"After lifting the ban on same-sex marriage in California, DeGeneres married the Australian American actress at her Beverly Hills home in 2008."
"It doesn't seem to be their problem right now."
"Allen has always been a drunkard, but she doesn't drink on set or at work," the source said
"DeGeneres has obviously given up drinking, which was earlier thought to be the reason for the difference between them."
"Ellen and Portia continue like a happy pair of high school students," the source added
"However, once someone sends a message, everything goes well."



Number  21
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“On Valentine’s Day, he quoted 1994’s Dumb and Dumber on his Instagram Story — admitting he didn’t have “Somebody to Love” for the romantic holiday.”
“RELATED VIDEO: Justin Bieber Says the Weeknd’s Music Is ‘Wack’ Following Selena Gomez Romance RumorsBieber is apparently a big fan of 1990s comedies.”
““You ain’t cool unless you pee your pants,” Bieber wrote — quoting the scene from the 1995, in which Sandler pretends to pee his pants to so that school bullies will stop teasing another kid who actually did pee his pants.”
“Image zoom Credit: Source: Justin Bieber TwitterHe also took to his newly reinstated Instagram to joke about the photos, posting a meme comparing his soaked sweatpants to the wet pants Adam Sandler rocked in Billy Madison.”
““Didn’t bother me if it made ya laugh nice!” he added.”
“While most celebrities might have been peed-off about the embarrassing photos, Bieber has a good sense of humor about it.”
““Someone got me flowers and I was driving, made a turn, and the water spilled on my d— area,” he tweeted.”
“Late in the evening on Thursday, Biebs set the record straight about the source of the stain.”
“But the “Love Yourself” singer has a totally reasonable explanation.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”


On Valentine's day, he quoted "dumb and dumb" in 1994 on instagram, admitting that he had no "people to love" on this romantic festival
"Related video: Justin Bieber said that this week's music was" weird "after the romantic rumors about Selena Gomez, and Bieber was obviously a big fan of comedy in the 1990s."
"Unless you piss your pants, you're not cool," Bieber wrote, citing Sandler's pretending to piss his pants in 1995, so school bullies don't tease another kid who pisses his pants
Image scaling credit: Source: Justin Bieber tweeted. He also joked about these photos on the newly restored instagram, releasing a meme to compare his wet sweatpants with Adam Sandler's wet pants in Billy Madison
"I don't mind if I can make you laugh!"! "He added
"While most celebrities may be annoyed by these embarrassing photos, Bieber has a good sense of humor about it."
"Someone sent me flowers, I was driving, I took a turn, and the water splashed into my d-zone," he tweeted
Late Thursday night, Bibbs clarified the source of the stain
"But the singer who loves you has a perfectly reasonable explanation."
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc



Number  22
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Who do you think would it resemble more?”
“HollywoodLifers, do you think Gwen and Blake would have a beautiful child?”
“Gwen Stefani may have thought her pregnancy days were behind her, but she’s considering having one more baby to make Blake Shelton a dad.”
“HollywoodLife.com has the EXCLUSIVE details on how she’s been inspired by late-in-life mom Janet Jackson.”
“Age is nothing but a number when it comes to having a baby these days.”
“Janet Jackson just proved miracles can happen by giving birth to a healthy son despite being 50-years-old.”
“That has 47-year-old Gwen Stefani inspired to make her boyfriend Blake Shelton, 40, a first time dad.”
““Gwen would love to have another child with Blake.”
“He’s not pressuring her at all, but she knows it’s something he would love too,” a source tells HollywoodLife.com EXCLUSIVELY.”
““She isn’t focused on it obsessively, but seeing Janet Jackson have a healthy baby at 50 has inspired her to open her mind more to the possibility.”


"Who do you think it's more like?"
"Holly bug, do you think Gwen and black will have a beautiful baby?"
"Gwen Stephanie may think her pregnancy is over, but she's thinking about having another child and having black Sheldon as a father."
"Hollywood life has exclusive details about how she was inspired by her late mother, Janet Jackson."
"To have children now, age is just a number."
"Janet Jackson has just proved that even though she is 50 years old, miracles can happen if she has a healthy son."
"It inspired Gwen Stefani, 47, and made Blake Shelton, 40, his first father."
"Gwen wants to have another child with black."
"He didn't put any pressure on her at all, but she knew that he would like it too," a source told reporters
"She's not obsessed with this, but seeing Janet Jackson have a healthy child at the age of 50 inspired her to be more open to this possibility."



Number  23
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“It does appear his more youthful look can be possibly attributed to fillers and/or Botox, as well as laser resurfacing or chemical peels,” he told Radar.”
“...year old actor has been laying low since Jolie shocked him with divorce papers in September taking sole custody of their six kids Once his new World War II film Allied tanked the former big screen stud decided to take...”
“Click through Radar’s gallery to see the shocking changes to the Hollywood star’s million-dollar face.”
“Brad Pitt is red carpet ready at the ‘Allied’ LA Fan Event Pitt is determined to hang onto his sexy image with a little help!”
“Pitt has been undergoing what seems like every cosmetic procedure under the sun in a bold bid to better his mood in the face of Angelina s relentless onslaught sources close to the A lister told Radar in a bombshell...”
“...world exclusive...”
““Allied” Film Premiere in London “He’s done fillers, Botox and peels , plus had his eyes tweaked,” an insider exclusively told Radar.”
“He feels like death inside but he ll be damned if he ll look like anything but a million bucks on the outside Brad Pitt and Marion Cotillard attend the Allied premiere at Callao Theater in Madrid Spain The 52”
“...his fate and his face into his own hands...”
““Brad Pitt looks significantly younger!”


"It looks like he's younger, probably because of filler and / or Botox, and laser surface dressing or chemical peeling," he told radar
“…… The 30-year-old actor has been keeping a low profile since she shocked him with her divorce agreement in September. After his New World War II film "the Allies" defeated the former big screen star, Julie raised their six children on her own... "
"Click on the radar gallery to see the amazing changes in the million dollar face of the Hollywood star."
"Brad Pitt is ready to walk the red carpet at the League Fans event in Los Angeles. Pitt is determined to keep his sexy image with a little help!"
"In the face of Angelina's ruthless attack, Pete seems to have experienced every plastic surgery in the sun, which is to improve his mood." Liszt told radar in an explosive interview
“… Exclusive in the world... "
"He made stuffing, Botox and peel, plus his eye sprains," an insider told radar exclusively
"He feels dead inside, but if he looks like anything more than a million dollars, he will be cursed for Brad Pitt and Marion godia attending the Allied premiere at the Palau theatre in Madrid, Spain, in '52."
“… His fate and his face are in his own hands. "
"Brad Pitt looks much younger!"



Number  24
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“But its massive size is really noticeable when Travis is stood in front of it.”
“Thank you Jeff you are amazing!!!"”
“OMG it’s GORGEOUS!!!!!”
“She posted a picture of it on Instagram, saying: "When @jeffleatham sends us a 10 foot tall Easter Bunny made of flowers to celebrate Easter!!!!”
“In the clips, Travis also poses in front of a 10ft giant rabbit that was gifted to Kylie's mum, Kris Jenner.”
“(Image: Snapchat) (Image: Snapchat) (Image: Snapchat)He also holds her in his arms and tickles her belly as she looks at him lovingly.”
“Another clip shows Travis sat with his little girl on his lap, leaning down to give her a kiss as she looks up at her daddy's face.”
“It's the first time we've seen the family all together and it makes for a very sweet moment.”
“Rapper Travis holds his daughter under the arms, bouncing her up and down as Kylie reaches out to stroke her head.”
“(Image: Snapchat) (Image: Snapchat) (Image: Snapchat)The 20-year-old Keeping Up With The Kardashians star is dressed down - but as stunning as ever - in a long red pinstriped shirt, while Travis is dressed in black jeans and a T-shirt, complete with a lot of bling.”


"But when Travis stood in front of it, its huge size was really obvious."
"Thank you, Jeff. You're wonderful!"
"My God, it's so beautiful!!"
She posted a photo on instagram saying, "when @ jeffleatham sent us a 10 foot Easter bunny to celebrate Easter!!"
"In the clip, Travis also poses for a giant 10 foot rabbit, which is given to Kelly's mother, Chris Jenner."
"(image: snapchat) (image: snapchat) (image: snapchat) he also held her in his arms and scratched her stomach when she looked at him affectionately."
"Another video shows Travis sitting on his lap, his little daughter, bending over to give her a kiss and looking at her father's face."
"It's the first time we've seen a family together. It's a very sweet moment."
"Rapper Travis holds his daughter in his arms, and when Kelly reaches out to touch her head, he jumps her up and down."
"(photo: snapchat) (photo: snapchat) (photo: snapchat) the 20-year-old Kardashian star is dressed in a red pinstriped shirt, which is low-key but still as amazing as ever, while Travis is dressed in black jeans and T-shirt with a lot of jewelry."



Number  25
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Sound off in the comments below!”
“Source: GettyDo you think Jen and Alex will stay together much longer?”
“The former New York Yankee even took to visiting Jen on the set of her show Shades of Blue.”
““She’s looking at a few weeks’ break, which they both agree will do them a lot of good in the long term.”Article continues below advertisementSource: GettyJen and Alex first began dating in March, and were soon spotted everywhere together.”
“Source: Getty“Things are great with Alex but they haven’t had a day off each other in literally months,” the insider added.”
“...just wants some time for herself!”
“Lo.”
“Article continues below advertisementSource: GettyHowever, the insider said there’s technically nothing wrong with the couple’s relationship — J.”
“Source: Getty“She’s put a lot of her life on hold these past few months, like hanging out with girlfriends and even her kids,” the source explained.”
“...exclusively.”


"Please leave a message in the comments below!"
"Source: do you think Jane and Alex will be together longer?"
"The former New York Yankees player even visited her on Jennifer's" blue shadows. "
"She's going to take a few weeks off and they all think it's good for their long-term development." The article continues with the following ad source: Getty Jen and Alex started dating in March and soon got caught up
"Source: Getty" Alex is doing well, but they haven't rested for months, "the insider added
“… I just want to save myself some time! "
"Look."
"The article continues with the following advertising source: gettyhowever, a person familiar with the matter said that technically, the couple's relationship is OK - J."
"Source: Getty" she's shelved a lot of her life in the past few months, such as with girlfriends and even her children, "the source explained
“…… Exclusive. "



Number  26
Source test case:  ['Agenda Driven', 'Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Let us know your thoughts below!”
“HollywoodLifers, are you excited about the new addition to the West family?”
“Kim Kardashian and Kanye West are so overjoyed by the birth of their new baby that they both shed tears after holding her for the first time!”
“After an emotional nine months, new baby West is finally here!”
“She was born on Jan. 15, at 12:47 a.m. and Kim Kardashian, 37, and Kanye West, 40, are as happy as ever!”
““Kim and Kanye fell instantly in love with their new daughter.”
“Kim and the surrogate were both brought to tears in the delivery room as the baby was immediately handed over to Kim who was overwhelmed with joy.”
“It was an emotional moment for Kanye too who joined the women after birth, and also fought back the tears as he was allowed to hold the baby shortly after Kim,” a source close to the Kardashians tells HollywoodLife.com EXCLUSIVELY!”
“Kim and Kanye’s decision to go with a surrogate was a tough one!”
“After failing to conceive for some time, Kim felt it was the best decision.”


"Let's know what you think below!"
"Holly bugs, are you excited about the new West family?"
"Kim Kardashian and Kanye West were overjoyed at the birth of the new baby. They held her for the first time and both shed tears!"
"After nine months of love, the new baby West is finally here!"
"She was born at 12:47 a.m. on January 15. Kim Kardashian, 37, and Kanye West, 40, are as happy as ever!"
"Kim and Kanye immediately fell in love with their new daughter."
"When the baby was immediately handed over to the ecstatic Kim, Kim and the surrogate mother were crying in the delivery room."
A source close to the Kardashian family told reporters: "it's also an exciting moment for Kanye. He joined these women after he was born. Shortly after Kim Jong Il was born, he held back his tears when he was allowed to hold the baby." Exclusive to Hollywood life
"It's a tough decision for Kim and Kanye to find a surrogate mother!"
"After a period of not being pregnant, Kim thought it was the best decision."



Number  27
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Zeta-Jones joins stars like Gwyneth Paltrow, Blake Lively and Reese Witherspoon, who have all expanded their resumes to include food, lifestyle and fashion brands.”
““Ready to work!” she captioned the selfie.”
“Last week, Zeta-Jones posted a photo of herself using a sewing machine.”
“WATCH: Home Hack: Make a Last-Minute Centerpiece with Things You Already OwnWhile more details of her new endeavor are yet to be announced, the actress is clearly not afraid to roll up her sleeves for a project.”
““Not one chip!”A source also told PEOPLE that Zeta-Jones has been working on her lifestyle brand for years and has had a lot of interest from various partners but has only just found the right fit.”
““Two #Versace vases that have been with me for twenty years and have lived in London, Wales, LA, Bermuda, NYC and Westchester County,” she wrote on Instagram, before encouraging followers to show off their favorite vintage items as well.”
“Earlier this month, she showed off her gorgeously-decorated home kitchen, and in June proved just how long she’s been cultivating her skills.”
“Fans who follow the Feud star, 47, on Instagram have likely been seeing Zeta-Jones’ kitchen, home and design-centric posts—all tagged with the personal hashtag #StyleByZeta.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
“PEOPLE has learned exclusively that the Oscar winning actress will launch her own lifestyle brand this fall.”


Zeta Jones joins stars like Gwyneth Paltrow, Blake Lively and Reese Witherspoon, who have expanded their resumes to include food, lifestyle and fashion brands
"Get ready! "She added a title to her selfie."
"Last week, Zeta Jones released a photo of herself using a sewing machine."
"Lookout: Home Hacking: using what you already have to make the last-minute central work" although more details of her new work have not been released, the actress is obviously not afraid to roll up her sleeves for a project
"None! "A source also told people that Zeta Jones has been working on her lifestyle brand for many years and many partners are interested in her, but she has just found the right person."
"Two Versace vases have lived with me for 20 years in London, Wales, Los Angeles, Bermuda, New York and Westchester," she wrote on instagram, and then encouraged followers to display their favorite antiques as well
Earlier this month, she showed off her ornate home kitchen, and in June proved her time to develop her skills
"Fans who follow the 47 year old star on instagram may have seen Zeta Jones's kitchen, home and design centric posts, all of which are labeled" style by zeta. "
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
"People exclusively know that the Oscar winner will launch her own lifestyle brand this fall."



Number  28
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“...a perfum...”
“In one of the scenes we see clearly no pun intended a luminous installation conceived by the plastic artist The one minute clip called Notes of a Woman shows Angelina Jolie strolling through different spaces at Chateau Miraval practicing her lines and wandering through the vineyard as a man creates...”
“Despite the fact that Pitt was no longer paying, according to her declaration, he asked her to continue working.”
“Until then, the artist and her 17 assistants and subcontractors had been working for the project in a Paris studio and partially completed the redesign at the property.”
“He then blocked all additional payments.”
“The collaboration went smoothly for three years until Pitt discovered that the company acting as the general contractor managing the network of businesses involved in the remodeling was inflating the costs.”
“According to the newspaper, he wanted the visual artist to create "an exceptional place with light at the center of everything."”
“Pitt hired Soudart in 2010 to run a €25 million project that would bring natural light into four of the buildings of the 40-bedroom domain where, in the late 1970s, the band Pink Floyd had recorded an album.”
“The Hollywood couple, according to the newspaper Liberation, which broke the story, launched a large remodeling plan intended to transform the property to their liking.”
““When, in 2010, Brad Pitt came to ask her to bring to light four buildings of his domain at Miraval, the plastic artist Odile Soudant did not suspect that this Pharaonic building site was going to cause her ruin,” writes Le Point.”


“… Perfume... "
"In one of the scenes, we can clearly see that no pun is a luminous device conceived by a plastic artist. The one minute clip "women's notes" shows Angelina Jolie strolling in different spaces of miravar castle, practicing her lines, walking in the vineyard, just like a man created... "
"Although Pete no longer pays, according to her statement, he asks her to continue working."
"Prior to that, the artist and her 17 assistants and subcontractors had been working on the project in a studio in Paris and partially completed the redesign of the hotel."
"He then froze all the extra payments."
"The cooperation went on smoothly for three years, until Pete found that the company, as the general contractor, was responsible for managing the enterprise network involved in the reconstruction, thus raising the cost."
According to the newspaper, he hopes the visual artist can create "a special place with light as the center."
"Peter hired sudat in 2010 for a 25 million euro project to introduce natural light into four buildings in the 40 bedroom area, where the band Pink Floyd recorded an album in the late 1970s."
According to Liberation Daily, the Hollywood couple launched a large-scale renovation plan to transform the property according to their preferences
"In 2010, Brad Pitt came to ask her to expose four buildings in his territory of miraval. At that time, the plastic artist Odile soudant did not doubt that the site of the Pharaonic building would lead to her destruction," Le point wrote



Number  29
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“But its hard to do normal things when every single person knows who you are'In another raw moment, Jordyn takes Kylie to a public outing to the beach - but at midnight in order to avoid being seen.”
“...made for and I respect that...”
“...to become a highly sought after model in the fashion industry The teenager entrepreneur who turns 20 in a few days sat down for her first ever therapy session When you grow up on camera people feel like they know you she said...”
“Surprise confession Kylie usually sports quit the glamorous look for her plethora of events and for her sizzling selfies for her 96 4 million Instagram followers which has transformed into a successful cosmetics range Model muse In comparison Kendall has shunned the reality TV spotlight and worked her way up...”
“During the Sunday debut, the beauty mogul spoke to a therapist about her struggles with being in the public eye.”
“Meanwhile, elsewhere int he episode of Kylie continued to vent her frustrations with fame - claiming: ''I just want to run away.'”
“However, she has worked her way up to become a highly sought after model in the fashion industry.”
“...the more reserved sister from their combined Jenner Kardashian clan...”
“The social media savvy star compared her continued adjustment to fame against her supermodel sister and her glamorous pals I just feel like this fame thing is going to come to an end Kylie couldn t help but ponder her future in the episode In comparison Kendall has usually been...”
“Shocking: This comes as a surprise given Kylie's usually glamorous outings in comparison to her supermodel sister's more reserved demeanour'I wish I could do what she does!'”


"But it's hard to do normal things when everyone knows who you are." At another awkward moment, Jordan takes Kelly on a public outing to the beach - but at midnight, to avoid being seen
"For I respect... "
“…… Become a popular model in the fashion world - a young entrepreneur who turns 20 in a few days - sit down for her first ever treatment - and when you grow up on camera, people think they know you, she says... "
"Amazing confessions Kelly sports usually gives up the glamorous look because she has so many events and her 96.04 million instagram followers that she has transformed into a successful cosmetics series model Muse compared to Kendall shunning the reality show spotlight and trying to move up..."
"On Sunday's premiere, the beauty tycoon told a therapist about her struggle in public view."
"At the same time, Kelly continues to vent her dissatisfaction with fame elsewhere in the episode - claiming: 'I just want to run away.'"
"However, she has been working hard to become a popular model in the fashion world."
“… The more conservative sister in Jenna Kardashian's family... "
"This social media savvy star compares her continued adaptation to fame with her supermodel sister and her charismatic friends. I just feel that the fame thing is coming to an end. Kelly can't help but focus on her future. By contrast, Kendall is usually..."
"What's shocking is that, compared with the more reserved manner of Kelly's supermodel sister, Kelly's usually glamorous outings surprise people," I hope I can do what she does! "



Number  30
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“After taking a break from music, Golden Globe-winner Gaga has clearly been busy modelling and will also star in her first big film role in Bradley Cooper's directorial debut, A Star Is Born, out in October.”
“Since August 15, the singer has posted 18 pictures, including a series of distorted black and white snaps, shot by Linnetz, who has worked extensively with Kanye West in the past.”
“The second photo sees her posing against a wall as she stares moodily into the lens, while in the third shot she is standing with her slim profile to camera.”
“(Image: REX/Shutterstock) (Image: REX/Shutterstock) (Image: REX/Shutterstock)In the first photo, shot by photographer Eli Russell Linnetz, the superstar is flashing her tattoos as she seductively rolls up her tights.”
“On Tuesday The Poker Face singer, 32, stunned her fans with the revealing pictures, which show her wearing only a pair of sheer white tights.”
“Her new movie, A Star Is Born, will premiere there tomorrow.”
“The 32-year-old is in Europe ahead of the Venice Film Festival, which kicked off on Wednesday.”
“The Born This Way singer has also been snapped taking her boyfriend Christian Carino to the Louvre museum along with her mother.”
“...yesterday...”
“Get a daily dose of showbiz gossip straight to your inbox with our free email newsletter Sign up Thank you for subscribing We have more newsletters Show me See our privacy notice Invalid Email Lady Gaga appeared to be channeling Madonna as she stepped out in Paris with platinum hair...”


"Golden Globe winner Gaga has obviously been busy modeling since she took a break from music. She will also play her first big movie role in Bradley Cooper's directorial debut" the birth of a star, "which will be released in October
"Since August 15, the singer has released 18 photos, including a series of distorted black-and-white photos, taken by linnetz, who has worked extensively with Kanye West in the past."
"The second picture shows her posing against the wall, staring at the camera melancholy, while the third picture shows her standing in front of the camera, slim."
"(image: Rex / shutterstock) (image: Rex / shutterstock) (image: Rex / shutterstock) in the first photo taken by photographer Eli Russell linnetz, the superstar flashes her tattoo as she seductively rolls up her tights."
"On Tuesday, the 32 year old poker face singer shocked her fans with exposure photos showing that she was wearing only a white tights."
Her new movie "star born" will premiere there tomorrow
"The 32 year old will come to Europe ahead of the Venice Film Festival, which opens on Wednesday."
"This born singer was also photographed taking her boyfriend Christian carrino to the Louvre museum with her mother."
“… Yesterday... "
"Through our free e-mail communication, we can receive gossip from the entertainment industry every day. Thank you for your subscription. We have more communication to let me see the invalid e-mail of our privacy statement. Lady Gaga seems to be grooming Madonna out of Paris with her blonde hair..."



Number  31
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“...it now Parker did understand that the conversation changes the way fans think about the legacy of the project...”
“We ve been colleagues and in some way it s a very healthy place to be Image zoom Kim Cattrall and Sarah Jessica Parker Credit Bryan Bedder Getty As the story unfolded Parker said she wanted to speak out about it in the press but was held back by coaches...”
“These are the conversations.”
“This is everything that happened over the last six months.”
“This is everything I know.”
“All you want to do is say, ‘Are you kidding me!?”
““When all that stuff was happening with Sex and the City, which I know is meaningless in the world, but when it’s happening and you’re caught up in any of the muscle of that stuff, it’s so painful because all you want to do is respond.”
“...who told her to remain quiet...”
““We’ve never been friends,” Cattrall said.”
“I m a grown freaking woman Image zoom Kim Cattrall Cynthia Nixon Sarah Jessica Parker and Kristin Davis Credit Hector Vallenilla Retna Ltd Corbis RELATED VIDEO Kim Cattrall Slams Sarah Jessica Parker as Tensions Surrounding SATC 3 Revealed Kim Killed the Movie Says Source Though she s open to discussing...”


“…… Now Parker understands that the conversation has changed the fans' view of the project Heritage... "
"We've always been colleagues, and to a certain extent, it's a very healthy place to start with the story of Kim cattrell and Sarah Jessica Parker credit Brian bedergetti, who said she wanted to speak in the press, but was stopped by the coach..."
"These are conversations."
"That's what happened in the last six months."
"That's all I know."
"You just want to say," are you kidding? "
"When all these things happen in sex and cities, I know it's meaningless in the world, but when it happens, you're entangled in any muscle of these things, which is so painful, because all you want to do is respond."
“… Who told her to keep quiet... "
"We've never been friends," katlar said
"I'm an adult perverted woman image zooming in and out of kinkatra Cynthia Nixon, Sarah Jessica Parker and Christine Davis credit Hector Valeriana reintner Ltd. Corbis related video kinkatra criticizes Sarah Jessica Parker for showing the tension around Kim killing the movie, although she's open to discussion..."



Number  32
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“It will be exciting to see where she goes from here!”
“The blue-eyed beauty recently celebrated her 20th birthday with a star-studded party that included many celebs, including Chris Brown and Paris Hilton.”
“Although Paris’ hopes for the future are big, it seems like she has a ton of support to back her up.”
“...source further explained...”
“She wants to live some of her Dad s dreams and that includes not only acting but directing she wants to be as creative in her work as most of Michael s music videos were she doesn t want to do your normal run of the mill type stuff the...”
“She’d also like to star in amazing productions that are extremely creative like the music ones that Michael was a part of.”
““To have a career that would be considered the female version of Johnny Depp would be very special because he has done so many unique things and that is the type of career she like to pursue,” the source continued.”
“In addition to her famous dad, she admires the work of superstar actor Johnny Depp and would also love to have an acting career like he does.”
“She made her acting debut in the television series, Star last year so she already took the first step into making her dreams come true.”
“But the process of becoming a full fledged working actress is a serious main goal for Paris now that she has been bitten by the bug.”It sounds like Paris definitely has the drive to make 2018 her year!”


"It must be exciting to see where she's going from here!"
"The blue eyed beauty recently held a star party to celebrate her 20th birthday. There were many celebrities at the party, including Chris Brown and Paris Hilton."
"Although Paris has great hopes for the future, she seems to have a lot of support."
“… Source: further explanation... "
"She wanted to realize some of her father's dreams, not just acting, but directing. She wants to be as creative at work as Michael's music video, because she doesn't want to do your ordinary work... "
"She also wants to play in some very creative works, such as Michael's music."
"It's going to be very special to have a career that is considered to be Johnny Depp's female version, because he does a lot of unique things, and that's exactly what she likes to pursue," the source continued
"In addition to her famous father, she appreciates the works of the star actor Johnny Depp and wants to have an acting career like him."
"She made her debut in last year's TV series starry sky, so she has taken the first step to realize her dream."
"But the process of becoming a mature professional actress is an important goal for Paris now, because she has been bitten by insects." it sounds like Paris has absolutely the motivation to make 2018 her year



Number  33
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“The couple visited the Caribbean island nation in February for the wedding of Bieber’s father.”
“She knows she doesn’t need him.”The pair, who have dated off and on since they were first linked in 2011, were last seen leaving church separately on March 8 after vacationing in Jamaica.”
“...anyone but himself Adds the source The second she saw it she walked away especially now with her health...”
“Justin and Selena decided to take a break to give her family some more time to heal and take in the idea of her and Justin being a couple again Another source tells Us that another contributing factor to the on off couple is that Bieber doesn t care about...”
“Her mom was her rock when she was having her health complications,” the insider also adds to Us.”
“A source told Us Weekly at the time that Gomez didn’t think her mom in particular “would approve.”“Her relationship with Justin has really affected her relationship with her mom, and it’s been hard for her because she is super close with her mom.”
“Though the “Sorry” singer, 24, and the 13 Reasons Why executive producer went public with their reunion shortly after, Gomez chose not to bring Bieber along to celebrate Thanksgiving with her family.”
“(She split from The Weeknd in October 2017 after 10 months of dating.)”
“...summer...”
“Selena has tried to convince her family that Justin has changed but her family just isn t budging right now The relationship between the Wolves singer 25 and her mother Mandy Teefy became rocky when Gomez started seeing Bieber again after undergoing a kidney transplant and recuperating from complications last...”


"The couple visited the Caribbean island in February to attend Bieber's father's wedding."
"She knew she didn't need him." The couple have been dating intermittently since their first date in 2011 and were last seen to leave church on March 8 after a holiday in Jamaica
“… Anyone except himself will add a source at the moment when she sees the news, especially now that she has left with her health... "
"Justin and Selena decided to take a break, give her family more time to heal, and accept the idea that she and Justin would be husband and wife again. Another source told us that another factor contributing to the couple's relationship is that Bieber doesn't care... "
"Her mother was her rock when she had complications with her health," the person added to us
"At that time, a source told us weekly that Gomez didn't think his mother would be particularly" recognized. "Her relationship with Justin really affected her relationship with her mother, which was very difficult for her, because her relationship with her mother was very close."
Although the 24-year-old "sorry" singer and executive producer soon revealed 13 reasons for their reunion, Gomez chose to celebrate Thanksgiving with his family without Bieber
"(after 10 months of dating, she broke up from work in October 2017.)"
“… Summer... "
"Serena is trying to convince her family that Justin has changed, but her family hasn't changed yet. When Gomez saw Bieber again after receiving a kidney transplant and recovering from complications, the relationship between the 25-year-old wolf singer and her mother, Mandy tiffy, became unstable. "



Number  34
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Man The Gun which also marks Robert Redford s final acting role...”
“And that’s that,” Affleck told the AP.”
“Speaking to the Associated Press Affleck discussed his decision to break tradition and skip this year s Academy Awards where as winner of Best Actor for Manchester by the Sea the previous year he was scheduled to present Best Actress past winners Jodie Foster and Jennifer Lawrence instead presented the...”
“...award...”
““I think it was the right thing to do just given everything that was going on in our culture at the moment,” Affleck said.”
““And having two incredible women go present the best actress award felt like the right thing.”The allegations against Affleck stem from a pair of sexual harassment civil lawsuits he faced while director of the 2010 Joaquin Phoenix quasi-documentary I’m Still Here.”
“Although Affleck denied any wrongdoing, he ultimately settled both lawsuits.”
“The allegations of the harassment resurfaced during Affleck’s Best Actor campaign for Manchester by the Sea; following his Oscars win, actress Brie Larson and others refused to clap for Affleck.”
““First of all, that I was ever involved in a conflict that resulted in a lawsuit is something that I really regret.”
“I wish I had found a way to resolve things in a different way.”


"This gun also marks Robert Redford's last character..."
"That's it," Affleck told the associated press
"In an interview with The Associated Press, Affleck discussed his decision to break the tradition by skipping this year's Oscar, and as the winner of the best actor for Manchester by the sea, he was given the awards last year for past best actress winners Judy Foster and Jenny F Lawrence, instead of..."
“… Reward... "
"I think it's the right thing to do, given what's happening in our culture right now," Affleck said
"It's right for two incredible women to win the best actress award." The charges against Affleck stem from a pair of civil sexual harassment suits he faced while directing the 2010 Phoenix documentary I'm still here
"Although Affleck denied any wrongdoing, he finally settled the two lawsuits."
Allegations of harassment surfaced again when Affleck starred in The best actor for Manchester by Manchester by the Sea; after he won an Oscar, actress Brie Larson and others declined to applaud Affleck
"First of all, I was involved in a conflict that led to litigation, which I regret very much."
"I wish I could find a different way to solve the problem."



Number  35
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Celebrity chef Paula Deen said she woke up Monday morning heartbroken to the news of the Las Vegas attack.”
“Apple CEO Tim Cook expressed his thoughts for the victims and their families in a tweet.”
“All of us with the P&T show are healthy and unharmed.”Kendra Wilkinson, TV personalist and former "The Girls Next Door" star, tweeted, "No words, just absolutely sick to my stomach."”
“Teller, of the magician duo Penn & Teller, tweeted, “A dreadful shooting incident took place tonight in Vegas.”
“Singer Trey Songz said, “To be in Vegas while this is happening, brings a pain to my heart.”Singer Ne-Yo said, "Hearing crazy news coming out of my hometown... Las Vegas, please, stay safe."”
“Mariah Carey said she was "horrified" at the news of the shooting.”
“Have a good night."”
“Sucks that things like this happen.”
“"So kind of bummed right now.”
“Many people [were] shot and killed and [I'm] just really, really sad," El Moussa shared.”


"Celebrity chef Paula Deen said she woke up on Monday morning heartbroken by the news of the Las Vegas attack."
"Apple CEO Tim Cook tweeted his thoughts about the victims and their families."
"All of us who have been on P & T are healthy and unhurt." Kendra Wilkinson, a TV individualist and former "girl next door" star, tweeted, "there are no words, it's just that my stomach is absolutely sick."
"There was a terrible shooting in Las Vegas tonight," wrote teller of magic group Penn & Teller on twitter
Singer Trey sonz said: "when all this happened, coming to Vegas brought pain to my heart." Singer naiyo said, "I heard crazy news from my hometown... Las Vegas, please be safe
"Maria Kelly said she was" shocked "to hear about the shooting
"Good night."
"It's terrible that such a thing happened."
"It's a bit depressing now."
"A lot of people [were] shot, (I) just really, really sad," shared elmosa



Number  36
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“RELATED: The Best Places to Buy Comfy Bras Online That Actually Fit...”
“With this guide, managing irregular bra cup sizes (yes, even for sports bras) should be a breeze, and sore, achy breasts from ill-fitting bras will be a thing of the past.”
“Bra size shouldn’t be a guessing game.”
“Best of all, knowing how to measure your bust will make adjusting to changes in your breasts (from losing or gaining weight, hormone fluctuations, aging, pregnancy, and more) so much less stressful.”
“All you need is a tape measure and a little free time, and you’ll have saved yourself a lot of bra-shopping misery.”
“Equipment is minimal.”
“...much easier especially for online shoppers...”
“Learning how to measure bra size can feel uncomfortable but knowing your measurements and keeping them written in a note on your phone or somewhere else that s accessible when the bra shopping mood strikes will make bra shopping so...”
“The best option is to know your bra size by taking bust measurements using these simple measuring instructions, which will ensure a perfect fit in band and in cup—and can even help you find the right amount of support.”
“...day or between washings...”


"Related: the best place to buy a really comfortable bra online..."
"With this guide, it should be easy to manage irregular bra cup sizes (yes, even sports bras), and breast soreness caused by unsuitable bras will be a thing of the past."
"Bra size should not be a guessing game."
"Most importantly, knowing how to measure your chest circumference will greatly reduce the stress of adapting to changes in your breasts (from weight loss or gain, hormonal fluctuations, aging, pregnancy, etc.)
"All you need is a tape measure and a little free time, so you don't have to buy a lot of bras."
"There are very few devices."
“… Especially for online shoppers... "
"It's uncomfortable to learn how to measure the size of a bra, but knowing your size and writing it on your mobile phone or other place where you can use it when your bra shopping mood hits will make your bra shopping so..."
"The best choice is to use these simple measurement instructions to measure your bra size, which will ensure that the bra fits perfectly with the cup and even help you find the right amount of support."
“… During the day or between washing and gargling... "



Number  37
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Brown ultimately deactivated her Twitter account in June 2018.”
“Brown's parents sacrificed everything — moving their family to Los Angeles — to see Brown's acting dreams come true.”
“I thought I was done," said Brown in an interview with the Daily Mail.”
“I wasn’t getting work.”
“"I was devastated.”
“With no major jump in her career, her family had become so financially strained, they moved back to the U.K. to live with an aunt.”
“While Brown continued finding work in smaller roles on shows like NCIS, Modern Family and Grey’s Anatomy, she kept getting passed up for bigger roles.”
“TV and Film Roles'Once Upon a Time in Wonderland,' 'Intruders'Within three months of moving, Brown was given the role of Alice in ABC's Once Upon a Time in Wonderland, and soon after she appeared as Madison O'Donnell in BBC America's Intruders.”
“It was there that she was spotted by a talent scout who told her parents "she has instincts you cannot teach."”
“"I had to cry in the audition.”


"Brown finally stopped her twitter account in June 2018."
"Brown's parents sacrificed everything - the family moved to Los Angeles - to see Brown's acting dream come true."
"I thought I was finished," Brown told the daily mail
"I don't have a job."
"I'm sad."
"There was no big jump in her career, her family became financially strapped and they moved back to England to live with their aunt."
"While Brown continues to look for small role jobs in NCIS, modern family and Grey's anatomy, she is constantly being eliminated by big roles."
"Three months after the TV and movie characters once Wonderland and the intruder moved in, brown got the role of Alice in ABC's once Wonderland. Soon after, she appeared as Madison O'Donnell in the intruder on BBC America channel."
"Right there, she was spotted by a talented scout who told her parents," she has instincts you can't teach. "
"I had to cry at the audition."



Number  38
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“5.17.19.”Waiting for your permission to load the Instagram Media.”
“The message said, “See you in a year, Mr. Wick,” and included the caption, “It's a date.”
“She posted a note scrawled on paper from The Continental in NYC.”
“Meanwhile, Berry recently teased the movie's opening date on Instagram.”
“The site also points out that Halle has only been on the NYC set for one day so far, which isn't much time to strike up a romance.”
“The Mega Agency Gossip Cop, however, reached out to a Berry source, who shut down the reports.”
“The two stars were photographed looking pretty chummy on the set of their new film “John Wick: Chapter 3,” sparking rumors they were seeing each other.”
“The Mega AgencyAre Halle Berry and Keanu Reeves dating?”


"5.17.19." waiting for your permission to load instagram media. "
The message said "see you in a year, Mr. wicker" with the title "this is a date."
"She put a piece of scribbled paper on Continental Airlines in New York."
Meanwhile, berry recently raised the release date of the movie on instagram
"The website also points out that Halley has only been on the set in New York for one day so far and has not had much time to fall in love."
"However, the scandal police of this large organization contacted a source from Bray, who closed the reports."
"The two stars were photographed on the set of their new film, John wicker: Chapter three, looking very close, which triggered rumors of their meeting."
Are Halle Berry and Keanu Reeves on a date? "



Number  39
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“People can change — believe me."”
“Real change, real evolution and real perception shift can happen if we open our minds and soften our hearts.”
“A place of gnashing of teeth, continual burning of skin and probably Mike Pence’s ultimate guest list for a barbecue.”
“When I was growing up, homosexuality was synonymous with the word 'abomination' … and hell.”
“"Right and wrong were taught to me on felt boards and, of course, through the glamorous Jan Crouch crying diamond teardrops every night on that Vaseline-TBN television screen.”
“"My first words were 'mama' and 'dada,' 'God' and 'Satan,'" she related.”
“However, Perry's own curiosity seemed to have gotten repressed by her Christian leanings.”
“(For the record, she was wearing a Rasario design.)”
“What I did know is that I was curious, and even then, I knew that sexuality wasn’t as black and white as this dress."”
“"But B) How was I going to reconcile that with the gospel singing girl raised in youth groups that [was] pro-conversion camps?”


"People can change - trust me."
"If we open our hearts and soften our hearts, real change, real evolution and real conceptual change can all happen."
"A place with gnashing teeth and burning skin could be the ultimate guest list for Mike burns barbecue."
"When I was growing up, homosexuality was synonymous with abomination and hell."
"Right and wrong are taught to me on the felt board, of course, through the charming Jane Crouch's diamond tears crying every night on the Vaseline TV screen."
"My first words are 'Mom' and 'dad', 'God' and 'Satan'," she said
"However, Perry's own curiosity seems to have been suppressed by her Christian tendencies."
(for the record, she was wearing a Lhasa Rio dress.)
"What I know is that I was curious. Even then, I knew that sexual orientation was not as black and white as this dress."
"But b) how can I reconcile this with the evangelical girls who grew up in youth groups supporting conversion camps?"



**Something goes wrong**
“As for her recent stay in rehab, which she left after just 14 days into a six-week program, much to the objections of facility staff, Gomez's rep also confirmed that it wasn't because of a miscarriage.”
“And while the thought of Bieber with a "clean image" these days is worth a few chuckles, Gomez's rep told Us Weekly that the entire pregnancy report is "100 percent fictional."”
“The rumor also had one of the tabloid's sources claiming Bieber's team felt the baby would "ruin his career because at the time he had a clean image."”
“In Touch alleges that Gomez wanted to have the child and subsequently went into a "downward spiral," which later led to said stint in rehab in 2014.”
“All that aside, the 21-year-old's rep says that In Touch Weekly's report claiming the former Disney star was pregnant in 2012 -- but miscarried -- while she was dating Bieber is completely false.”


"As for her recent stay in a drug treatment center, she left after only 14 days in a six week drug treatment program, which made the facility staff very opposed, and the representative of Gomez confirmed that it was not because of miscarriage."
"It's worth laughing at the idea that Bieber has a" clean image, "but a representative of Gomez told us weekly that the entire pregnancy report is" 100% fictitious. "
Another tabloid source in the rumor said that Bieber's team thought the child would "ruin his career because he was innocent at the time."
"In touch claimed that Gomez wanted to have children, and then entered a" vicious circle, "which later led to his time in rehab in 2014."
"To put that aside, the 21-year-old spokesperson said that touch Weekly reported that the former Disney star was pregnant in 2012 but miscarried on a date with Bieber, which was totally wrong."



Number  41
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“...on Sundays.”
“It’s just so ridiculous.”Keeping Up With The Kardashians airs on E!”
“Kourtney‘s genuinely trying to go away and have a good time and he’s trying to like freak her out and make Kourtney think there’s going to be some crazy drama run-in.”
“...that Scott s doing this just to try to one up Kourtney and that seems super malicious...”
“Are you actually not well And he was like Yeah I m doing it to make Kourtney mad I said You re not going to make her mad for the right reasons Kim went on to explain her frustration further in the episode I think it s clear to everyone...”
“He thinks it is and i said, ‘Are you nuts?”
““He talked to me about it.”
“It’s not a good look for Scott,” Kim said to Kendall in a phone conversation.”
“Who goes to LAX together?”
““They looked so desperate at the airport.”


"Sunday."
"That's ridiculous." Keep up with the Kardashian family on e! "
"Courtney really wants to leave and have a good time. He wants to scare her and make Courtney think that there will be some crazy plots on."
“… Scott just wanted to seduce Courtney, which seems very malicious... "
"Are you really in bad health? He said yes, I did it to make Courtney angry, and I said you wouldn't make her angry for the right reason. In this episode, Kim further explains her frustration. I think everyone knows it very well... "
"He thought so, and I said," are you crazy? "
"He talked to me."
Kim told Kendall on the phone: "Scott is not very good looking."
"Who's going to Los Angeles?"
"They look desperate at the airport."



Number  42
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“We will update this post as more information becomes available.”
“According to TMZ, Pitt still plans to fight for joint custody of his children.”
“Photo: Dimitrios Kambouris/Getty Images for WSJ MagazineYesterday, multiple outlets reported that Brad Pitt is under investigation for child abuse by both the FBI and the Los Angeles Department of Child and Family Services after an incident that occurred on his family’s private plane last Wednesday.”
“More details have emerged about the incident that reportedly caused Angelina Jolie to file for divorce and request full custody of the couple’s six children.”
“Us Weekly is reporting that at least part of the alleged fight was caught on film, and TMZ and People are reporting that the fight involved Pitt and Jolie’s 15-year-old son, Maddox.”
“According to TMZ, “the details of precisely what happened” are “murky,” but the anonymous person who reported Pitt to the DCFS alleged that Pitt “attacked” Maddox on the family’s flight home from Nice, France.”
“From TMZ:Here’s what’s alleged – shortly after the plane took off, Brad and Angelina began arguing and Maddox jumped up to verbally defend his mom.”
“We’re told Brad then lunged at the boy and Angelina jumped in between them to block her husband.”
“Brad connected in some fashion with his son.”
“People, which has presented Pitt’s side of the divorce story throughout the week, reports that Pitt “did not hit” Maddox during the incident.”


"We will update this post when we get more information."
"According to TMZ, Pete still plans to fight for joint custody of the child."
Photo source: Dimitrios kambouris / Getty Images The Wall Street Journal magazine reported yesterday that Brad Pitt was under investigation by the Federal Bureau of investigation (FBI) and Los Angeles Department of child and family services after a child abuse incident happened on his family's private plane last Wednesday
"It is reported that Angelina Jolie filed for divorce and asked for full custody of the couple's six children. More details about this incident have emerged."
At least part of the so-called fight was filmed, US Weekly reported. TMZ and people reported that the fight involved Pitt and Julie's 15-year-old son Maddox
According to TMZ, "the exact details" are "unclear," but anonymous sources who reported Pitt to DCFS claimed that Pitt "attacked" the Maddox family's plane home from nice, France
"From TMZ: This is what's called here - shortly after the plane took off, Brad and Angelina started arguing, and Maddox jumped up to defend his mother verbally
"We were told that Brad suddenly jumped at the boy and Angelina jumped between them to block her husband."
"Brad made contact with his son in some way."
People magazine has been covering Peter's divorce story for a week, saying that Peter "didn't bump into" Maddox during the divorce



Number  43
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Have a look at those pictures here .”
“But he’s not the only person to think his Twilight co-star is, er, flawless.”
“...pictures showed her cheating on Robert Pattinson with a married film director...”
“But unfortunately for Kristen, life doesn’t have the ctrl+z option so she’s stuck with any mistakes she (might) have made – and embarrassing things she might have said.”
“Just one month before she was exposed as a cheat with Rupert Sanders, she revealed that she wants to have babies with her long-term boyfriend R-Pattz.”
“In an un-guarded moment, she told Vogue journalist Christa D’Souza: "My God, I'm so in love with my boyfriend.”
“I wish he were here now.”
“I think I want to have his babies."”
“Before adding: “I love the way he smells.”
“And him me.”


"Look at these pictures."
"But he's not the only one who thinks his twilight partner is perfect."
“… The photo shows her cheating Robert Pattinson with a married film director
"But for Christine, unfortunately, there is no Ctrl + Z option in her life, so she will be troubled by any mistakes she may make and embarrassing words she may say."
"Just a month before she was exposed to having an affair with Rupert Sanders, she revealed that she wanted to have a baby with her longtime boyfriend R-Pattz."
At an unguarded moment, she told fashion reporter Krista de Souza: "my God, I love my boyfriend so much."
"I hope he's here now."
"I think I want his children."
And then he said, "I like the way he smells."
"And him and me."



Number  44
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Sound off in the comment section!”
“Source: MEGADo you think Blac Chyna and Drake are dating?”
“And this week he was snapped leaving a celebrity hotspot with none other than Blac Chyna.”
“Are these two dating?”
“Read on for more.”
“Article continues below advertisementSource: INSTARImagesThough he recently confessed that he does in fact have a son named Adonus, Drake has pretty much been single and ready to mingle.”
“Source: MEGAAnd everyone knows that Blac Chyna was tossed to the side by her teenage boyfriend YBN Almighty Jay, which means she’s also available.”
“Article continues below advertisementSource: MEGASo the rumor mill has been whirring since these two were reportedly spotted together getting cozy until the early hours of this morning at The Nice Guys, a Hollywood hotspot in California.”
“Source: MEGAReports suggested it wasn’t until around 5am when the two left the club—Drake first then Blac Chyna shortly after.”
“Article continues below advertisementYes Drake was talking about me in Miss Me !”


"Please leave a message in the comments section!"
"Source: Mega, do you think Blake chener and Drake are dating?"
"This week, he was photographed leaving the celebrity hot spot with blac Chyna."
"Are these two dating?"
"Please read on."
"The article continues with the following advertising source: instarimage. Although he recently admitted that he does have a son named adonus, Drake is basically single and ready to date."
"Source: megaand everyone knows that blac Chyna was thrown aside by her teenage boyfriend, YBN all-around Jay, which means she's free, too."
"The article continues in the following advertising source: the messus rumor factory has been whistling as the two are said to have been found comfortable together until this morning in nice guy, Hollywood hot spot in California."
"Source: megareports suggests that it wasn't until around 5 a.m. that the two left Drake club first and then Blake chener soon afterwards."
In the following ad, Drake said, "I'm missing me!"



Number  45
Source test case:  ['Agenda Driven', 'Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
““Anything I say now will sound like a crappy excuse.”Instead, Tarantino continued to work with Weinstein in the years since, including on Oscar-nominated films “Inglorious Basterds” and “Django Unchained.”A rep for Apatow declined a request for comment, while Tarantino’s did not respond.”
““What I did was marginalize the incidents,” he said.”
“Despite this, he did not realize that the incidents were part of a larger pattern.”
“He also was aware that Rose McGowan, who last week tweeted that Weinstein had raped her, had allegedly reached a legal settlement with him.”
“I knew he did a couple of these things.”Tarantino owned up to hearing directly from his ex-girlfriend Mira Sirvino and another unnamed actres about their experiences with Weinstein.”
“It wasn’t secondhand.”
““There was more to it than just the normal rumors, the normal gossip.”
““I knew enough to do more than I did,” Tarantino told the paper.”
“In the interview, the director, who worked with Weinstein on basically all his major film projects, said that he’d known about Weinstein’s action as far back as the ’90s but didn’t do anything to stop it, something he admits to regretting.”
“In an interview with the New York Times on Thursday, Tarantino admitted that he knew of Weinstein’s alleged mistreatment of women years ago but did not do enough to stop it.”


"Everything I say now sounds like a lame excuse." Instead, Tarantino continued to work with Weinstein for the next few years, including Oscar nominated films "shameless bastards" and "Django unchained.". A representative of apato declined to comment, while Tarantino did not respond
"All I did was marginalize these events," he said
"Nevertheless, he didn't realize that these events were part of a larger pattern."
"He also knows that Ross McGovern, who tweeted last week that Weinstein raped her, is said to have reached a legal settlement with him."
"I know he did something like that." Tarantino admits he heard directly from his ex girlfriend Mira sivino and another unknown actor about their experience with Weinstein
"It's not secondhand."
"It's not just ordinary rumors, ordinary gossip."
"I know more than I do," Tarantino told the paper
"In the interview, the director worked with Weinstein on all his major film projects. He said he knew Weinstein's behavior as early as the 1990s, but did not take any measures to stop it. He admitted that he was sorry about it."
"In an interview with the New York Times on Thursday, Tarantino admitted that he knew a few years ago that Weinstein was suspected of abusing women, but did not take enough measures to stop it."



Number  46
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Contact us at letters@time.com.”
“If you don't get the confirmation within 10 minutes, please check your spam folder.”
“...recounted the night of his election as that famous night on television Trump also repeated his claims against fake media and fake news despite commencing the speech by saying we re going to put that aside While the speech was interspersed with applause and chants of USA”
“USA!”
“USA!” from the audience, Trump’s comments about Barack Obama and Hillary Clinton also elicited boos from the crowd, which was highlighted by users on social media.”
“Former Chief Official White House Photographer Pete Souza made his own comparison between Obama and Trump via Instagram.”
“Current Scout leaders and former Scouts, as well as parents, also used Twitter to voice their criticism of the nature of Trump’s speech.”
“In a statement, the Boy Scouts of America said that it is “wholly non-partisan and does not promote any one position, product, service, political candidate or philosophy.”
“The invitation for the sitting U.S. President to visit the National Jamboree is a long-standing tradition and is in no way an endorsement of any political party or specific policies.”Get our Politics Newsletter.”
“The headlines out of Washington never seem to slow.”


"Contact us letters@time.com 。”
"If you are not confirmed within 10 minutes, please check your spam folder."
“…… It tells the scene of the night of his election, because on that famous night on TV, trump also repeated his views on false media and false news, although at the beginning of the speech, he said that we would put it aside, and the speech was mixed with applause and American praise. "
"America!"
"America! "From the audience's point of view, Trump's comments on Barack Obama and Hillary Clinton also drew boos from the audience, which was emphasized by users on social media."
"Pete Souza, a former chief White House official photographer, made his own comparison between Obama and trump through instagram."
"Current Scout Leaders and former scouts, as well as parents, have also used twitter to criticize the nature of Trump's speech."
"In a statement, the boy scouts of America said it is completely nonpartisan and does not promote any position, product, service, political candidate or philosophy."
"It is a long-term tradition to invite the current president of the United States to visit national day. It is not an endorsement of any political party or specific policy." Access to our political newsletters
"The headlines in Washington never seem to slow down."



Number  47
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Much like those articles and many others about Strahan and Rodriguez, there’s often a lot of fabricated drama, yet zero truth to the claims.”
“And just a week ago, Gossip Cop corrected a tabloid cover story that wrongly maintained Jennifer Lopez was pregnant with Rodriguez’s baby boy.”
“Gossip Cop recently busted a magazine report that falsely alleged Strahan was feuding with Robin Roberts at “GMA.“ As we noted, the reality is the two anchors get along great.”
“In addition to being athletes turned TV personalities, Strahan and Rodriguez have also both been the subject of a slew of inaccurate reports.”
“Regardless, from what Gossip Cop hears from a mutual pal and network sources, Strahan is pretty pumped about Rodriguez joining the ABC team.”
“So sadly, we won’t be surprised if there are fake news stories filled with made-up quotes from unnamed sources about how Strahan is supposedly upset by Rodriguez’s arrival or is battling the baseball player for scoops.”
“Generally, when one celebrity is announced to be joining another star, the gossip magazines start spinning reports about (untrue) drama behind-the-scenes.”
“Of course, Gossip Cop has been around long enough to know that unreliable blogs and disreputable tabloids will undoubtedly try to manufacture a phony feud between the two New York sports heroes.”


"Like the articles about Strahan and Rodriguez and many others, there is often a lot of fabricated drama, but these statements are not true at all."
Just a week ago, a gossip cop corrected a tabloid cover story that mistakenly claimed that Jennifer Lopez was pregnant with Rodriguez's baby boy
Gossip police recently published a magazine report that falsely claimed that Strahan was at odds with Robin Roberts in GMA. We notice that the fact is that the two anchors get on well
"In addition to becoming an athlete and a TV celebrity, Strahan and Rodriguez are also the targets of a series of inaccurate reports."
"Anyway, judging from the rumors heard by a mutual friend and an Internet source, Strahan is quite excited about Rodriguez joining the ABC team."
"It's so sad that we won't be surprised if there are false news reports full of fabricated quotes from unnamed sources, about how Strahan was upset by Rodriguez's arrival, or was competing with baseball players for exclusive news."
Generally speaking, when a celebrity is announced to join another star, gossip magazines begin to report the (untrue) plot behind the scenes
"Of course, the gossip police have long known that unreliable blogs and infamous tabloids will no doubt try to create a false feud between the two New York Sports Heroes."



Number  48
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Let's jump right into that and take a closer look at how Meghan Markle's uninvited family members crashed the royal wedding.”
“Wow!”
“"Now I pray that Harry and Meghan can go on a nice honeymoon and rest and relax, and all of my relatives will just shut up about everything," he told TMZ.”
“After watching the nuptials from the hospital, Thomas expressed joy for his daughter, and also nicely summed up the drama caused by his extended family.'”
“Her mom made it, but her dad was unable to attend following a series of embarrassing tabloid debacles and emergency heart surgery.”
“In fact, the only Markles to score invites to the royal wedding were Meghan's mother, Doria Ragland, and her father, Thomas Markle.”
“Though the wedding was well-attended both in person and by tens of millions watching live at home, there were some glaring absences— namely, much of Markle's family.”
“Duchess of Sussex...”
“The American actress married Prince Harry in a public ceremony in St George s Chapel at Windsor Castle in front of 600 guests as well as thousands of onlookers gathered outside to catch a glimpse of the new Duke and...”
“How Meghan Markle's Uninvited Family Crashed The Royal WeddingMeghan Markle lived out a fantasy most women could only dream of on May 19, 2018.”


"Let's jump right in and take a closer look at how Megan markel's uninvited family members smashed the royal wedding."
"Wow
"Now I pray that Harry and Megan will have a good honeymoon, have a good rest and relax, and all my relatives will shut up," he told TMZ
"After seeing the wedding in the hospital, Thomas expressed his joy for his daughter and summed up the drama brought by the extended family."
"Her mother succeeded, but after a series of embarrassing tabloid defeats and emergency heart surgery, her father failed to attend."
"In fact, Megan's mother, Doria Raglan, and father, Thomas markel, are the only ones who have been invited to the royal wedding."
"Although many people attended the wedding in person and tens of millions of people watched the live broadcast at home, there were some obvious absences - that is, most of Mark's family were absent."
"The Duchess of Sussex..."
"The American actress held a public ceremony at St. George's Church in Windsor Castle. She married Prince Harry in front of 600 guests and thousands of onlookers. They gathered outside to see the new Duke and
"How Megan markel's uninvited guest ruined the royal wedding. Megan markel realized the dream that most women can only dream of on May 19, 2018."



Number  49
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
““I had an enormous crush on him — he was gorgeous, and it was love at first sight, but not for him.”
“She does tend to stalk the men that she’s interested in, or at least that’s how she got her husband.”
“Now that Pratt has instated himself in the Avengers, he’s on a whole new level and could certainly score a date with this beauty.”
“How hot would it be if these two started dating?”
“...of the foxiest women in Hollywood...”
“Let s check out 15 celebs Chris Pratt should date instead of the mystery blonde advertising 15 Pratt Should Take On The Black Widow Scarlett Johansson is one of the most eligible females in the industry right now and one...”
“Does he have time for his new mystery blonde?”
“With two summer hits coming his way, he'll probably reach a whole new level of fame.”
“Two months after that, we will see the much-anticipated Jurassic World: Fallen Kingdom.”
“Avengers: Infinity War is coming out in April and that is sure to keep him busy while he’s on the movie tour.”


"I'm deeply infatuated with him - he's beautiful, it's love at first sight, but not for him."
"She does tend to follow men she's interested in, or at least that's how she gets her husband."
"Now that Pratt has established himself in avenger, he is on a new level and is sure to date this beautiful woman."
"How hot would it be if these two started dating?"
“… The most cunning woman in Hollywood... "
"Let's see 15 celebrity Chris Platt should date instead of the mysterious blonde ad. 15 Platt should take the black widow Scarlett Johnson as one of the most qualified women in the industry now and one..."
"Does he have time with the new mystery blonde?"
"With the arrival of two summer hit dramas, he is likely to reach a new level of fame."
"In two months, we will see the much anticipated Jurassic world: the fallen kingdom."
"Avenger: Infinite War" will be released in April, which is sure to keep him busy during the film tour



Number  50
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“HollywoodLifers, do you think Sofia and Kourtney look alike?”
“In January 2018, Kourt finally opened up about her relationship, which she takes very seriously, during the latest season of Keeping Up With The Kardashians.”
“She just debuted mid-length brown locks, that resemble her BF Scott Disick’s ex!”
“But, it turns out, that was her plan all along…Sofia Richie, 19, has a new do’ and it wasn’t a spur of the moment decision.”
“The model’s new, long brown locks were modeled off of her boyfriend, Scott Disick‘s ex, Kourtney Kardashian, 38, HollywoodLife.com has learned.”
““Sofia is purposely transforming herself into a Kourtney Kardashian clone because she knows it’s a huge turn on for Scott,” a source close to Sofia tells us.”
““He has a type and Sofia is morphing into that for him, and it just so happens to be a lot like Kourtney.” As for how Scott feels?”
“He s playing a big part in this too the insider admits adding He s very controlling with her and even tells her what clothes to wear and how to style her hair It s no secret that Scott has had a tough time getting over his ex of over...”
“...a decade...”
“The pair also share three children together — Mason, 8, Penelope, 5, and Reign, 3 — which requires them to see a lot of one another.”


"Hollywood stars, do you think Sophia and Courtney look alike?"
"In January 2018, Kurt finally disclosed her love affair, which she attaches great importance to and keeps in touch with Kardashian in the latest season."
"She just rolled out medium length brown hair, much like her boyfriend Scott Disick's ex boyfriend!"
"But, it turns out, it's her plan all the time Sophia Ritchie, 19, has a new goal. It's not an impulsive decision. "
"The model's long brown hair was designed to imitate the 38 year old Courtney Kardashian, the ex boyfriend of her boyfriend Scott Disick, which Hollywood life has learned."
A source close to Sophia told us: "Sophia intends to transform herself into Courtney Kardashian's clone because she knows it's a huge transformation for Scott."
"He has a type, and Sophia is changing to him, which happens to be a lot like Courtney." And how does Scott feel? "
"He has also played an important role in this matter. The person familiar with the matter admits that he has great control over her, and even tells her what to wear and how to do her hair. It's no secret that Scott can hardly forget his ex girlfriend..."
“… Ten years... "
"They also share three children - 8-year-old Mason, 5-year-old Penelope and 3-year-old Rafe - which requires them to meet frequently."



Number  51
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Tell us what you think in the comments!”
““Taking a year out of the spotlight is exactly what he needed, to help get his head together and get back on track.” Nothing wrong with taking some time off!”
“So will he return to the public eye soon?”
“Kanye West, 39, is doing well these days, as a source close to the rapper tells HollywoodLife.com exclusively.”
““He’s feeling very positive and upbeat.”
“Kanye’s done a lot of soul searching over the past year, he’s worked through a lot of issues, and he’s in a better place than he has been for ages,” the insider reveals.”
“Glad to hear it!”
“(You’ll remember that Kanye was hospitalized in November 2016, which had him canceling the rest of his tour and fueling rumors that he and Kim Kardashian, 36, were on the verge of divorce.)”
“As to what Ye has been up to lately?”
““Kanye has been spending a lot of time in the studio working on his new album, and he believes it’s some of the best music he’s ever produced,” the source shares.”


"Tell me what you think in the comments!"
"A year off in the spotlight is exactly what he needs to help him pick himself up and get back on track." There's nothing wrong with taking a break! "
"Will he be back in the public eye soon?"
According to a source close to the rapper, Kanye West, 39, has been doing well recently
"He feels very positive and optimistic."
"Kanye has done a lot of introspection in the past year, he has solved a lot of problems, and his situation is better than that of many years," the insider said
"Glad to hear that!"
"(you will remember that Kanye was hospitalized in November 2016, which led him to cancel the rest of the tour and fueled rumors that he and Kim Kardashian, 36, were about to divorce."
"What have you been doing lately?"
"Kanye spent a lot of time in the studio working on his new album, which he believes is one of the best music he has ever composed," the source said



Number  52
Source test case:  ['Agenda Driven', 'Journalism', 'Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational', 'Wiki']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Thank you and goodnight.”
“There's really no need to collectively lose our minds over the Vanity Fair story on Margot Robbie.”
“(Photo: Patrick Demarchelier/Vanity Fair)Aussie bombshell Margot Robbie is on the cover of the August issue of Vanity Fair looking every bit the blonde goddess that she is.”
“However, the accompanying story, "Welcome to the Summer of Margot Robbie," by Rich Cohen, has been widely criticized for insulting Australians and even being "creepy and lecherous."”
“Yikes.”
“Well, at least no one is criticizing the stunning images that ran with it.”
“(Photo: Patrick Demarchelier/Vanity Fair)(Photo: Patrick Demarchelier/Vanity Fair)ADVERTISEMENT Thanks for watching!”
“Visit Website(Photo: Patrick Demarchelier/Vanity Fair)(Photo: Patrick Demarchelier/Vanity Fair)(Photo: Patrick Demarchelier/Vanity Fair)ADVERTISEMENT Thanks for watching!”
“Visit WebsiteADVERTISEMENT Thanks for watching!”
“Visit WebsiteLooks great, right?”


"Thank you. Good night."
"There's really no need for us to lose our collective sanity over the vanity fair story of Margot Robbie."
(photo: Patrick Demarchelier / Vanity Fair) Australian Margot Robby looks like a blonde on the cover of the August issue of vanity fair
"However, rich Cohen's essay welcome to the summer of Margot Robbie has been widely criticized for insulting Australians and even being" creepy and obscene. "
"Oh, dear."
"Well, at least no one criticized the amazing images that came with it."
"(photo: Patrick demarchelli / Vanity Fair) (photo: Patrick demarchelli / Vanity Fair) thank you for watching the ad!"
"Visit the website (picture: Patrick Demarchelier / Vanity Fair) (picture: Patrick Demarchelier / Vanity Fair) (picture: Patrick Demarchelier / Vanity Fair) advertising, thank you for watching!"
"Thanks for watching the ads on the website!"
"It looks great to visit the site, doesn't it?"



Number  53
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“I believe Catherine now has a stylist, at least part time, and that’s highly likely what will happen for Meghan.”
“...myself but soon realized she needed some help...”
“Goodbye to the casual totes and body-cross bags, hello to ladylike little clutches.”
“It must be unbelievably difficult that Meghan was a working woman and had her own style.”So it’s out with the ripped jeans and messy bun, in with the oh-so-modest below-the-knee dresses.”
“It’s a much bigger job for Meghan.”
“It’s very difficult when you’re 36 to do this — it’s far easier when you’re in your early 20s and they can mold and adapt you.”
““We’re seeing everything about Meghan change.”
““The royal family is a firm and the protocol is huge,” said British designer Caroline Castigliano.”
“But with Mulroney in Canada (where Meghan lived while starring in “Suits”) and the duchess, 36, in England, the new royal has been left to live up to the royal rules of decorum on her own.”
“When she wore ripped Mother jeans, a white “boyfriend” shirt by Misha Nonoo and an Everlane tote for a date with Harry this past September, all three pieces saw an immediate sales spike.”


"I believe Catherine now has a stylist, at least part-time, and Megan is likely to do so."
“… Myself, but soon realized that she needed help... "
"Goodbye to the casual handbag and body cross bag, and say hello to the lady like little talons."
"Megan is a professional woman with her own style, which must be incredibly difficult," so it's with ragged jeans and a messy bun, in a skirt with Oh, so modest below the knee. "
"It's a bigger job for Megan."
"It's very difficult to do that when you're 36 - it's much easier when you're in your early 20s, they can shape and adapt you."
"We see everything is changing for Megan."
Caroline Castigliano, a British designer, said: "the royal family is a company and etiquette is very important."
But with marroni in Canada (where Megan lived when she starred in suit) and the 36 year old Duchess in the UK, the new royal had to abide by the Royal etiquette rules alone
When she dated Harry in her torn mother's jeans, Misha nono's white "boyfriend" shirt and an everlane handbag last September, sales of all three immediately soared



Number  54
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“For more on this, pick up the new issue of In Touch magazine, on stands now!”
“...the family including kids North Saint and Chicago after rapper Daz Dillinger urged the notorious Crips gang to f Kanye up While Kanye brushed of the danger during his TMZ rant he and Kim did appear to beef up security...”
“Capping of a tumultuous week of bizarre rants and a Trump-related Twitter firestorm, Kanye West showed up in the TMZ newsroom on May 1 and dropped a few new bombshells.”
“During a rambling 42-minute interview, the erratic rapper announced that he’d been hooked on opioids after liposuction in 2016 and declared that "when you hear about slavery for 400 years…that sounds like a choice."”
“His shocking comments were met with instant backlash from fans, fellow celebrities and especially his own wife, Kim Kardashian.”
“She s just so mad at him for embarrassing her and her family over and over and over again says a Kardashian source noting that Kim is fearful about how Kanye s behavior affects everything from their children to the...”
“Kardashians public image and business empire...”
“The pair fought bitterly, adds an insider, because "Kanye was furious that she would even try to silence him.”
“He stormed off, leaving Kim in tears."”
“Now with Kanye, 40, holed up at a Wyoming resort — purportedly to work on his music — Kim, 37, is facing the fact that her third marriage is in free fall.”


"For more information, please click on the new issue of in touch magazine and start now!"
“… After rap singer DAZ Dillinger, family members, including children from North holy city and Chicago, urged the notorious Crips Gang to arrest Kanye, who ignored the danger in his TMZ roar, and Kim and he seemed to strengthen their security. "
"On May 1, Kanye West appeared in the TMZ newsroom and dropped several new bombs, ending a week of chaotic and weird growls and a twitter storm related to trump."
"In a rambling 42 minute interview, the capricious rapper announced that he was addicted to opioids after liposuction in 2016 and declared," when you hear about 400 years of slavery It sounds like a choice. "
"His shocking remarks were immediately strongly opposed by fans, celebrity colleagues, especially his own wife, Kim Kardashian."
A source for Kardashian said: "she is very angry that he has embarrassed her and her family over and over again. Kim is worried that Kanye's behavior will affect people from children to children
"Kardashian's public image and business empire..."
A person familiar with the matter added that the two had a heated argument because "Kanye was so angry that she even tried to keep him silent."
"He left in a huff, making Kim tearful."
"Now, Kanye, 40, is hiding in a Wyoming resort, said to be writing her own music, and Kim, 37, is facing the fact that her third marriage is falling freely."



Number  55
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Comment below, let us know.”
“ #MAGA  — Katrina Pierson (@KatrinaPierson) August 1, 2017Tell us, HollywoodLifers — What do YOU think about the rumors that Anthony might be dating Katrina?”
“She also didn’t hesitate to poke fun at the rumors they might be dating, though as you can see in the tweet below she doesn’t specifically address the alleged relationship:How does one "secretly" dine at the #TRUMP hotel??”
“Though it’s unclear what the relationship between Anthony and Katrina is, she also took to Twitter to defend his firing by revealing he was fired at 8am that day and managed to keep the news from leaking to the press.”
“We’re sure that he was upset about being fired, so this makes total sense.”
“Anthony and Katrina were seated directly next to each other, and eyewitnesses claim that Anthony spent almost the entire meal staring at his phone instead of eating.”
“According to the Daily Mail, Anthony and Katrina were with a small group of people and they chose a corner table in hopes of being secluded from the public.”
“Katrina is adamantly pro-Trump and was very briefly rumored to be replacing Anthony once he was fired, though she quickly took to Twitter to confirm that was definitely not going to happen.”
“Anthony was allegedly enjoying dinner with Katrina Pierson, 41, a political strategist who also appears as a contributor on CNN from time-to-time.”
“But, he wasn’t alone!”


"Please comment below to let us know."
"Maga Katrina Pierson (@ Katrina Pierson) 2007 August 1, Hollywood lifers tells us, what do you think of the rumor that Anthony might date Katrina?"
"She didn't hesitate to joke about the rumors that they might be dating, but as you can see in the following tweet, she didn't specifically mention the so-called rel Ministry of Foreign Affairs: what to do with" secret "dining at the trump hotel?"
"Although it's not clear about the relationship between Anthony and Katrina, she also defended Antony's dismissal on twitter, revealing that he was dismissed at 8 a.m. that day and trying not to let the news leak to the media."
"We're sure he's upset about being fired, so it makes perfect sense."
Anthony and Katrina sat together, witnesses said Anthony spent almost the entire meal time staring at his mobile phone, rather than eating
"According to the daily mail, Anthony and Katrina were with a small group of people who chose a table in the corner and wanted to be isolated from the public."
"Katrina strongly supports trump. There was a very short-lived rumor that once Anthony was fired, she would replace him, but she quickly confirmed on twitter that this would not happen."
Anthony was said to be having dinner with Katrina Pearson, a 41 year old political strategist, who was also a regular CNN writer
"But he's not alone!"



Number  56
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“MORE : Jennifer Aniston is living her best life as she parties in photobooth following Justin Theroux splitMORE : Jennifer Aniston and Justin Theroux reach agreement over custody of dogs...”
“That’s right Jen – you don’t need a man to live your life to the fullest.”
“(Picture: Getty Images)Is Jennifer Aniston is ready to look for love again?”
“Should people get their CVs ready for a shot at a relationship with her?”
“The Friends star is back on the market since separating from her husband Justin Theroux – but is ready to mingle seeing as her ex is reportedly dating again.”
“The 49-year-old may have just split from her 46-year-old husband but that’s is not going to stop her from living her best life.”
“‘Jen is in a good place right now and very much satisfied with how things are panning out after her separation with Justin,’ a source told HollywoodLife.com.”
“Jennifer and Justin announced their split in February (Picture: AP)The insider continued: ‘She likes having the monkey off her back and she is enjoying being single.”
“She loves being able to do her own thing and to only have to report to herself.’AdvertisementAdvertisementBut is she ready jump back into the dating pool?”
“‘Love is taking a back seat as she is much more interested in her work and just living life.”


"More: Jennifer Aniston is living her best life, holding a party in the studio, following Justin selux slipmore: Jennifer Aniston and Justin selux reach an agreement on dog custody..."
"Yes, Jane - you don't need a man to fill your life."
"(photo source: Getty Images) is Jennifer Aniston ready to find love again?"
"Should people be prepared to have a resume and be ready to fall in love with her?"
"The" friends "star returned to the market after breaking up with her husband Justin Cyrus, but she was ready to date because her ex girlfriend was reported to be dating again."
"At 49, she may have just broken up with her 46 year old husband, but that doesn't stop her from living her best life."
A source told reporters: "Jennifer is in a good situation now. She is very satisfied with the situation after she broke up with Justin."
"Jennifer and Justin broke up in February (photo source: Associated Press) and people familiar with the matter continued:" she likes to take monkeys off her back and she enjoys being single. "
"She likes to do her own business. She just needs to report to herself." But is she ready to jump back to the dating pool? "
"Love is retiring, because she is more interested in work and life."



Number  57
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Email us at tips@radaronline.com, or call us at (866) ON-RADAR (667-2327) any time, day or night.”
“Do you have a story for RadarOnline.com?”
“We pay for juicy info!”
““Justin just wanted to pee and he wanted to sing — and that’s exactly what he did.”Straight Shuter’s Rob Shuter has all the latest gossip.”
““He was singing and rapping as he peed and he didn’t care who was listening,” a source said of Bieber’s private bathroom concert.”
“What’s more, sources tell Straight Shuter that the singer even gets louder as he pees!”
“Click to share on Twitter (Opens in new window)Click to share on Facebook (Opens in new window)Justin Bieber surprised a gentlemen in a men’s room in New York City recently, when he walked in alone — rapping out loud!”


"Email us tips@radaronline.com , or call the (866) radar (667-2327) at any time. "
"Do you have a story to tell RadarOnline.com ？”
"We pay for interesting information!"
"Justin just wants to pee, he wants to sing - that's what he does." Rob Shute of strickshute has all the latest gossip
"He's peeing, singing and talking, and he doesn't care who's listening," a source said of Bieber's private bathroom concert
"More importantly, a source told" straight through Shute "that the singer's voice is louder when he urinates
"Click to share on twitter (open in a new window) Click to share on Facebook (open in a new window) Justin Bieber was surprised to find out in a men's room in New York City recently that he came in alone - Banging loudly!"



Number  58
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“For more on this exclusive story, pick up the new issue of Life & Style magazine, on newsstands now!”
“"But sadly, Khloé will probably take him back."”
“Khloé Kardashian doesn't need a man's help when it comes to raising her newborn baby, True Thompson.”
“The Keeping Up With the Kardashians star gave birth to her daughter on April 12, just days after Tristan was exposed for cheating on her with multiple women throughout her pregnancy.”
“Despite putting on a united front, a source told Life & Style, Koko was devastated and doesn't plan on staying with the NBA star.”
“"She's in disbelief.”
“It feels like a bad dream.”
“She's trying to be strong for the baby, but it's not easy," the insider explained.”
“"She thought she was in a loving relationship and that this was forever."”
“When the 33-year-old got wind of the footage of Tristan making out with other girls, she was "hysterical" and "felt completely humiliated and couldn't stop crying," the source said.”


"To learn more about this exclusive, let's take a look at the new issue of life and fashion."
"But it's a pity that Heroe might take him back."
"Kardashian doesn't need a man's help when she's raising a new baby, really Thompson."
"The star who followed Kardashian gave birth to her daughter on April 12. Just a few days ago, Tristan was exposed to cheating with several women during her pregnancy."
"Despite the establishment of a united front, a source told life and style that Koko is devastating and does not intend to stay in the NBA."
"She didn't believe it."
"It feels like a nightmare."
"She wants to be strong for her children, but it's not easy," the person explained
"She thinks she's in love. It's forever."
"Tristan, 33, was" hysterical "when she learned that Tristan was having sex with other girls," the source said. "She felt completely humiliated and couldn't help crying."



Number  59
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“You may be able to find more information about this and similar content at piano.io...”
“Kim said her whole family is just trying to be supportive of Khloé.”
“That is, if they even have one anymore.”
“To jog your memory, Khloé just gave birth to a baby girl named True and in the same week that happened, rumors of Tristan’s alleged affairs surfaced.”
“Kim and other members of the Kardashian-Jenner family had flown out to Cleveland, Ohio to be by Khloé’s side when she gave birth, and Kim is graciously sharing what it’s been like ever since.”
“In a sneak-peek released last week, Kim said it's not going that great for the youngest Kardashian sister.”
“In Kim’s interview with Ellen DeGeneres, Kim said, "Like, I don’t even know how to describe it besides it’s just so f*cked up."”
“Indeed it is, Kim.”
“This content is imported from {embed-name}.”
“You may be able to find the same content in another format, or you may be able to find more information, at their web site.”


"You can find more information about this and similar content at: piano.io..."
"Kim said her family just wanted to support Heroe."
"That is to say, if they have one more."
"To remind you, khlo é had just given birth to a baby girl named true, and the same week it happened, rumors of Tristan's alleged affair surfaced."
"Kim and the rest of Kardashian Jenner's family have flown to Cleveland, Ohio, to be with Carol during her childbirth, and Kim is graciously sharing her life since then."
"In a peep released last week, king said it wasn't so good for the youngest sister, Kardashian."
"For example, I don't even know how to describe it, and it's a mess," Kim said in an interview with Alan DeGeneres
"Indeed, Kim."
This content was imported from {embedded name}
You can find the same content in other formats on their website, or you can find more information



Number  60
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“One of the smartest human beings I’ve ever met and also an incredible mother.””
“In response to these allegations, the singer and actress took a cue from one of her current jobs, playing an NYPD detective in the NBC crime drama “Shades of Blue.” She hired a private detective to tail Rodriguez, an “insider” told Us.”
“Related Articles Jennifer Lopez: ditching undies to rock revealing Billboard Latin Music Awards outfits?”
“Jennifer Lopez and Alex Rodriguez on romantic getaway Jennifer Lopez has moved on to Alex Rodriguez report says Jennifer Lopez and Drake s supposed romance fizzles Jennifer Lopez is a cougar and she explains why Lopez made this move because she was alarmed by a story that broke in the...”
“National Enquirer in June in which his alleged former mistress Lauren Hunter claimed that the former New York Yankees third baseman isn t faithful the report said...”
““I don’t think he’s sexually attracted to her,” Hunter told the Enquirer.”
“Hunter, 34, said her affair with Rodriguez began in 2011 when he was still seeing actress Cameron Diaz.”
“Hunter said their affair continued even after she had a baby with former football star Marcus Allen in 2014.”
“Hunter added that Rodriguez contacted her as recently as May about having a rendezvous, and she has the text messages to prove it.”
“Stories about Lopez, 47, and Rodriguez, 41, dating began in March and they went public with their relationship at the Met Gala in New York in May.”


"One of the smartest people I've ever met is an incredible mother."
In response to the charges, the singer and actress took inspiration from her current job as a New York police detective on NBC crime TV series blue shadows. An "insider" told us that she hired a private detective to follow Rodriguez
Related article: give up underwear rock reveals billboard Latin Music Awards clothing
"Janet Lopez and Alex Rodriguez are on a romantic trip. Janet Lopez goes to Alex Rodriguez to report the so-called romantic failure of Janet Lopez and Drake. Janet Lopez is a puma. She explains why Lopez made this move because she was shocked by a story..."
"In June's national inquirer, his former mistress Lauren hunt claimed that the former New York Yankees third baseman was disloyal, reporting that..."
"I don't think he's sexually attractive to her," Hunt told the questioner
Hunt, 34, said her relationship with Rodriguez began in 2011 when he was still dating actress Cameron Diaz
"Hunt said that even if she had a baby with former football star Marcus Allen in 2014, their relationship continued."
Hunt also said Rodriguez contacted her in May and said she wanted to date her, and she had text messages to prove that
"The story of Lopez, 47, dating Rodriguez, 41, began in March, when they revealed their relationship at the New York metropolitan party in May."



Number  61
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“MORE : Jamie Foxx won’t face charges after woman claimed actor ‘struck her in the face with his penis’MORE : Katie Holmes is all smiles with daughter Suri amid Jamie Foxx split rumours...”
“If you've got a celebrity story, video or pictures get in touch with the Metro.co.uk entertainment team by emailing us celebtips@metro.co.uk, calling 020 3615 2145 or by visiting our Submit Stuff page - we'd love to hear from you.”
“The loved-up pair enjoyed a beach date in Malibu on Friday and couldn’t help but pack on the PDA, sharing their first public kiss.”
“So adorable.”
“Katie, 39, did not wipe the smile off her face as she frolicked and cuddled the Oscar-winning actor in front of fellow beachgoers.”
“Proving to be quite the playful couple, Jamie, 50, at one point is seen scooping the Kennedys actress into his arms and bending her over his arms before collapsing onto the floor.”
“While Jamie is usually the life and soul of the party, Katie took the chance to entertain the comedian by doing cartwheels across the sand and pulling gymnastic poses.”
“Get a beach, guys (PPLOS/ The Mega Agency)After battling each other at a game of volleyball, the smitten couple were then pictured laying on a blanket and kissing, marking a rare moment of affection for the notoriously private couple.”
“AdvertisementAdvertisementThe lovebirds later watched the stunning ocean view while sipping cups of champagne which they brought along with their picnic.”
“Date goals!”


"More: Jamie fox will not face charges after a woman claimed the actor 'hit her in the face with his penis' more: Katie Holmes is all the daughter of Suri laughing at Jamie fox split rumors..."
"If you have celebrity stories, videos or pictures, please email us with Metro entertainment team at: celebtips@metro.co.uk , please call 020 3615 2145 or visit our submission page - we are glad to hear from you. "
"The couple enjoyed a beach date in Malibu last Friday and couldn't help squeezing into their PDAs to share their first kiss."
"That's lovely."
"Katie, 39, didn't erase her smile. She frolicked and hugged the Oscar winning actress in front of beach visitors."
Jamie, 50, proved to be a very playful couple, holding the Kennedy actress in his arms, bending her in his arms and then falling to the ground
Although Jamie is usually the soul of the party, Katie takes the opportunity to entertain the comedian by doing somersaults and gymnastics on the beach
"Let's go to the beach. After the guys (pplos / big brokerage) fought each other in a volleyball match, the enchanted couple was photographed lying on the blanket and kissing, marking a rare intimate moment for the couple who are known for their privacy."
"Later, couples sipped the champagne from the picnic and enjoyed the charming sea view."
"Date target!"



Number  62
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“The one-time "Partridge Family" heartthrob said at the time that his retirement was "not a complete 'Good bye' but I'm planning on working much less."”
“In a statement at the time, Cassidy said that "traveling and my arthritis" have made performing around the country difficult in recent years.”
“Cassidy had announced early this year that he planned to wrap up his 50-year career by the end of 2017.”
“He's the stepson of actress and fellow "Partridge Family" star Shirley Jones.”
“The performer has had numerous personal problems in the decades following his initial success, ranging from substance abuse to bankruptcy.”
“Cassidy’s revelation follows a recent concert in Agoura Hills, California, where he reportedly struggled to remember lyrics to songs he had been singing for nearly 50 years.”
“He says for now he wants to stay focused and "enjoy life."”
“The 66-year-old actor-singer tells People magazine his family has a history of dementia and he had sensed "this was coming."”
“Former "Partridge Family" star David Cassidy says he's struggling with memory loss.”


The former sweetheart of the "Partridge Family" said at that time that his retirement "is not a complete goodbye, but I plan to work less."
"Travel and my arthritis" have made it difficult to perform across the country in recent years, Cassidy said in a statement at the time
"Cassidy announced earlier this year that he plans to end his 50 year career by the end of 2017."
"He is the stepson of the actress and the star of the partridge family, Shirley Jones."
"In the decades after his initial success, the performer encountered many personal problems, from drug abuse to bankruptcy."
Cassidy revealed the news at a recent concert in agula mountain, California, where it is reported that it is difficult for him to remember the lyrics of songs he has sung for nearly 50 years
Now, he says, he wants to focus on "enjoying life."
The 66 year old actor and singer told people that his family had a history of dementia and that he already felt "it's coming."
Former partridge star David Cassidy said he was fighting amnesia



Number  63
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Agenda Driven', 'Journalism', 'Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational', 'Wiki']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“The film, which stars Tom Cruise, has so far made $500m at the box office.”
“McQuarrie’s latest film, Mission: Impossible – Fallout, was widely praised for its Bond-style plot and stunts.”
“The high-stakes nature of such a twist, and the controversial real-life issues the film may have explored, may well have proved a sticking point with producers.”
“...involve a high concept plot in which Bond would be incarcerated for much of the running time or potentially die...”
“You acknowledge the legacy of the world of Bond and you write in the world but you also write in the modern world as well Boyle indicated that the script featured a considerable coup de cinema it s a great idea so hopefully it will work which some speculated could...”
““You write in real time,” he said.”
“A leaked casting-call sheet indicated that the key villain would be Russian, and Boyle has suggested the film would help the franchise evolve in the #MeToo and #TimesUp era.”
“Hodge and Boyle’s script – which is different in all respects – was thought to have been a work-in-progress until recently, and it is understood its themes were more topical than is traditional for a Bond film.”
“Purvis and Wade have previously written six Bond films, including all four Craig outings, as well as the final two starring his predecessor, Pierce Brosnan.”
“Photograph: Allstar/United ArtistsThe producers were reportedly so keen to secure Boyle that they put an already completed screenplay, by the longtime 007 writers Neal Purvis and Robert Wade, on the back-burner.”


The film, starring Tom Cruise, has made $500 million so far
Macquarie's latest film mission: the dust of the impossible is settled has been well received for its bond like plot and special effects
"The high-risk nature of this distortion, as well as the controversial practical issues that the film may explore, may well have proved to be the crux of the producers."
“…… It involves a high concept plot in which bond will be incarcerated or likely to die most of the running time... "
"You recognize the legacy of bond world, you write in the world, but you also write in the modern world," Boyle said. The script features a fairly big coup movie, which is a great idea, so hope it will work some guess can... "
"You write it in real time," he said
"A leaked cast shows that the key villain will be a Russian, and Boyle suggests that the film will help the series develop in meto'o and the era of progress."
"Hodge's and Boyle's plays are different in all respects. Until recently, they were considered to be an ongoing work. It is understood that the theme is more topical than traditional bond films."
"Purvis and wade have previously written six Bond films, including all four with Craig and the last two with his predecessor, Pierce Brosnan."
"Photo: All Star / CO artists it's reported that producers are very eager to get Boyle, and they put a finished play, by longtime 007 writers Neil Purvis and Robert Wade, in the back burner."



Number  64
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Ariel and Levi have been dating for more than a year and definitely seem to be going strong!”
“Based on the “Modern Family” star’s Insta, a good time was had by all at the oceanside party.”
“The pair also partied with tons of other celebrities at the famous bash, including her pal Joe Kaprielian.”
“Her main squeeze also rocked an all-white ensemble.”
“Ariel is clad in a white romper and wore her hair down in sleek, straight strands.”
“In a photo posted to Ariel’s Instagram, Levi can be seen grabbing her tush.”
“Ariel Winter’s boyfriend Levi Meaden got a little handsy at the Red White and Bootsy Fourth of July bash they went to on Wednesday At Nobu in Malibu!”


"Ariel and Livy have been dating for more than a year. They look absolutely strong!"
"According to modern family star insta, everyone had a good time at the oceanside party."
"The two are also at famous parties with other celebrities, including her friend Joe caprian."
"Her main works also shocked the all white band."
"Ariel was wearing a white one-piece suit with straight, smooth hair."
"In a photo posted on Ariel instagram, Levi can be seen holding her tusks."
"Ariel winter's boyfriend, Livy midden, became a little bit handsome at their red and white boots carnival on July 4 in nurbu, Malibu, on Wednesday!"



**Something goes wrong**
“Eventually party animal Kris prepared to call it a night as she kicked off her heels and had a little nap on the sofa.”
“(Image: Instagram) (Image: Instagram) (Image: Instagram)Kim also got in on the action, sharing videos of her mum stumbling around on the sofas and telling her millions of followers how 'wasted' she was.”
“After her questionable vocal performance was over, Kris unleashed her dance moves by griding away to Sir Mix-a-lot's booty-celebrating classic Baby Got Back.”
“"My idol," pregnant daughter Khloe told fans, as she shared footage of Kris, 62, murdering songs by Michael Jackson, Britney Spears and The Foundations.”
“(Image: Instagram) (Image: Instagram)After dessert was over, Khloe shared a video of a bleary-eyed Kris propped up between two friends as she took on the Karaoke machine.”
“But after the sophisticated dining experience was over, things quickly got out of hand.”
“As the slew of social media footage revealed, the house was opulently decorated for the occasion with red roses dripping from the ceiling, personalised chocolate place cards, and love hearts everywhere.”
“(Image: Instagram) (Image: Instagram) (Image: Instagram)The Klan gathered to celebrate Valentine's Day en masse this year, with the famous sisters - and partners including Kanye West and Tristan Thompson - sitting down together for a slap up meal.”
“And she can thank daughters Kim and Khloe Kardashian for unleashing the incredible footage on to the world.”
“Kris' Valentine's Day 2018 plans involved guzzling a lot of booze, murdering karaoke classics and twerking to Sir Mix-a-lot.”


"In the end, Chris, the party animal, was ready to finish. She kicked off her high heels and took a nap on the sofa."
"(picture: instagram) (picture: instagram) (picture: instagram) Kim also took part in the action, sharing a video of her mother bumping on the sofa and telling millions of fans how" wasteful "she was."
"After her dubious vocal performance, Chris began her dance moves, performing in Sir mix-a-lot's trophy to celebrate the return of the classic baby."
"My idol," pregnant daughter Khloe told fans, sharing footage of 62 year old Kris's murder of Michael Jackson, Britney Spears and the foundation
"(picture: instagram) (picture: instagram) after the dessert, Khloe shares a video in which a sleepy Kris stands between two friends and sings on a karaoke machine
"But at the end of the complex dining experience, things quickly get out of hand."
"As a lot of social media shots reveal, the house is very ornate, with red roses dripping from the ceiling, personalized chocolate business cards and love everywhere."
"(photo source: instagram) (photo source: instagram) (photo source: instagram) the Ku Klux Klan gathered to celebrate Valentine's day this year, and the famous sisters - as well as friends including Kanye West and Tristan Thompson - sat together for a big meal."
"She can also thank her daughters Kim and Carol Kardashian for bringing this incredible video to the world."
"Chris's plans for Valentine's day in 2018 include heavy drinking, the murder of karaoke classics and a visit to Sir Twain mix-a-lot."



Number  66
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
““New York City wasn’t ever going to be home for Jen.”With reporting by Jen Heger.”
““Jen tried the whole living in New York City thing with Justin, but at heart, she is a California girl,” a source told Us after the split news broke.”
“Above all, we are determined to maintain the deep respect and love that we have for one another.”As previously reported, distance played a role in the pair’s decision to separate.”
“Whatever else is printed about us that is not directly from us, is someone else’s fictional narrative.”
“...directly...”
“We are two best friends who have decided to part ways as a couple but look forward to continuing our cherished friendship They added Normally we would do this privately but given that the gossip industry cannot resist an opportunity to speculate and invent we wanted to convey the truth...”
““This decision was mutual and lovingly made at the end of last year.”
““In an effort to reduce any further speculation, we have decided to announce our separation,” the former couple told Us in a joint statement on Thursday, February 15.”
“That said, the insider adds, “He just felt more comfortable [in the guest house] than in the main house with Jen.”But eventually, Aniston and Theroux, who wed at their Bel Air abode in 2015, parted ways for good.”
“...more concerned about the idea...”


"New York will never be Jan's home." Janhaig reports
After the news came out, a source told us: "Jennifer and Justin tried to live in New York together, but in fact, she is a California girl."
"Above all, we are determined to maintain a deep respect and love for each other." As previously reported, distance played a role in the decision to break up
"Anything printed about us, not directly from us, is someone else's fiction."
“… Direct... "
"We are two best friends who have decided to break up but are looking forward to continuing our cherished friendship, they added. Usually we do it in private, but given that the gossip industry can't resist an opportunity for speculation and invention, we want to convey the truth..."
"This decision was made by both sides at the end of last year and is full of love."
"To reduce further speculation, we decided to announce separation," the former couple told us in a joint statement on Thursday, February 15
"Nevertheless, the person familiar with the matter added," he just feels more comfortable [in the guest house] than he Zhen in the main room. "But in the end, Aniston and Cyrus, who married in 2015 at their residence in bellelle, parted ways forever."
“… More concerned about the idea... "



Number  67
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“'I first of all lived in a plastic tent with my wife and children, then we lived with other amputees in the village in a chicken hut.”
“We were refugees and it was only the support of the UNCHR [UN Refugee Agency] that I survived.”
“The government was at war with Vietnam in the 1970s and '80s and nearly two million people were killed by the communist party led by Pol Pot.”
“Her great hope was to lift the surrounding villages out of poverty, which were some of the poorest in the country and had been destroyed by the genocidal regime of the Khmer Rouge.”
“It's where her major conservation project is situated, Maddox Jolie Pitt Foundation, which owns over 100,000 acres of endangered forest.”
“During her time in Cambodia, Jolie worked on the ground speaking to the people, especially those living in the remote region of Samlaut, north west Cambodia, such as Saas and the other landmine victims.”
“Pictured: Jolie with her adopted son Maddox, who is from Cambodia, at her film premiere in Toronto on MondayThe highly anticipated film centers on screen author Loung Ung's autobiography about growing up in the country during the Khmer Rouge years.”
“Pictured: Some of the homes Jolie builtCambodia has always been close to the 42-year-old's heart and her directorial debut First They Killed My Father, which centers on the country during its communist period, will be released on Netflix on Sunday.”
“I'm so grateful, my life would have been so hard, I'd probably be dead, but now I'm born again.'”
“Many have promised to help our people, but she really did.”


"I first lived in plastic tents with my wife and children, and then in chicken houses with other amputees in the village."
"We are refugees, and I survived only with the support of the UN refugee agency."
"In the 1970s and 1980s, the government fought with Vietnam, and the Communist Party led by Pol Pot killed nearly 2 million people."
"Her greatest hope is to lift the surrounding villages out of poverty, one of the poorest in the country and destroyed by the Khmer Rouge genocidal regime."
"This is the site of her major conservation project, the Maddox Jolie Pitt foundation, with more than 100000 acres of endangered forest."
"During her stay in Cambodia, Julie worked locally and talked to people, especially those living in the remote area of sanlaut in northwestern Cambodia, such as sayas and other mine victims."
"The picture shows Julie and her Cambodian adopted son Maddox at the film premiere in Toronto on Monday. The Autobiography of long ung, the much anticipated film center screen writer, about growing up in Cambodia during the Khmer Rouge period."
"Here's Julie Buell campodia, who has always been close to some of the 42 year old's homes. Her director's debut film, first they killed my father, will be released on Netflix on Sunday, focusing on the country in the Communist era."
"I'm grateful. My life will be hard. I may have died, but now I'm reborn."
"A lot of people promised to help our people, but she did."



**Something goes wrong**
“[Photo by Jason Merritt/Getty Images]”
“Taking it one step further, Wendy Williams used her talk show as a platform to claim that Swift pushed her pal to get intimate with Orlando, an allegation that Gossip Cop calls false.”
“After watching her friend go through heartbreak from the ups and downs that occurred in her romance with Justin Bieber, Taylor is definitely not a Belieber.”
“With the “Sorry” singer aware that Swift dislikes him, Justin is blaming Taylor for the most recent crumbling of Jelena, according to Hollywood Life’s insider.”
“However, don’t look for any signs on social media or in interviews that the Biebs blames Swift.”
““Justin knows Taylor doesn’t like him and never will and the feeling is mutual, but he is smart enough to know not to say anything in public or on social media because he knows all the scrutiny he’d endure,” explained the source.”
“Swift recently attracted attention at the iHeartRadio Awards by throwing shade at the 22-year-old pop star after his performance, pointedly looking in the opposite direction.”
“And the Biebs doesn’t believe that he and Taylor will ever become pals.”
“In contrast, he will always blame Swift for any problems in his Jelena relationship, claims the insider.”
““He never expects to be her friend and is not looking to be her friend.”


"[Jason Merritt / Getty pictures]"
"What's more, Wendy Williams used her talk show as a platform to claim that swift forced her friends to have intimate contact with Orlando, which was called false by gossip police."
"After seeing her friends go through the ups and downs of her romantic experience with Justin Bieber, Taylor is definitely not a believer."
As the "sorry" singer realized swift didn't like him, Justin blamed Taylor for her recent collapse, according to inside Hollywood life
"But don't look in social media or interviews for any sign that Biebs is accusing swift."
"Justin knows that Tyler doesn't like him, and will never like him, and the feeling is mutual, but he's smart enough to know that he doesn't say anything in public or on social media because he knows all the censorship he'll be subject to," the source explained
"Swift recently attracted attention at the iHeart radio awards, casting a shadow after the 22-year-old pop star's performance and looking in the opposite direction."
"The biebers don't believe he and Taylor will be good friends."
"By contrast, he always accuses swift of any problems in his jellyna relationship, claiming insider."
"He never wanted to be her friend, and he didn't want to be her friend."



Number  69
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“The Duchess, who married Prince William in April 2011, has a large wardrobe of gems and lavish gowns to choose from.”
“This may especially be a concern for beautiful mother-of-three Kate, who the photographers will be keen to snap on the day.”
“For most the onus on a wedding day is to not upstage the bride.”
“However, now an expert has predicted that the Duchess of Cambridge may make a jewellery choice that might ruffle some brides’ feathers.”
“Sign up fornow for the biggest moments from morning TVMeghan Markle and Kate Middleton, 36, appear to have struck up a friendship since they met.”
“You can unsubscribe at any time.”
“Our Privacy Notice explains more about how we use your data, and your rights.”
“Sometimes they'll include recommendations for other related newsletters or services we offer.”
“When you subscribe we will use the information you provide to send you these newsletters.”


"The Duchess married Prince William in April 2011 and has a large wardrobe of jewelry and luxury dresses to choose from."
"This may be a special concern for Kate, a beautiful mother of three, and photographers will be eager to take pictures of her on this day."
"For most people, the responsibility of wedding day is not to make a fool of the bride."
Now, however, an expert predicts that the Duchess of Cambridge might choose a jewelry that might annoy some brides
"Sign up for the most important moment of the morning now. It seems that Megan markel and Kate Middleton, 36, have made a friendship since they met."
"You can unsubscribe at any time."
"Our privacy statement explains in detail how we use your data and your rights."
"Sometimes it includes suggestions for other relevant newsletters or services we provide."
"When you subscribe, we will use the information you provide to send you these newsletters."



Number  70
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“...go...”
“Additionally Bomer who came out in February 2012 acknowledged the positive legal changes happening for the LGBT community in the U S by saying I hope all these laws continue to pass but we still have a long way to...”
“Its very reflective of his amazing character."”
“I am really proud of him.”
“News at New York's Heineken U.S. Open kickoff party at PH-D at Dream Downtown tonight, "Wow, I think its really bold and incredibly classy how he came out and did it.”
“The White Collar star echoed the sentiments of many Hollywood A-listers in praising the Prison Break actor for recently coming out as a gay man, telling E!”
“Add Matt Bomer to the growing list of Wentworth Miller's celeb supporters.”


“… Go to... "
"In addition, boemer, who came out in February 2012, admitted that positive legal changes are taking place in the LGBT community in the United States. He said," I hope all these laws will continue to be passed, but we still have a long way to go... "
"It reflects his amazing character."
"I'm so proud of him."
"Wow, I think it's really bold and elegant how he came out and did it," said the news at the ph-d kick-off party in dream town tonight
The white-collar star is accepting "E!"
"Add Matt bomer to Wentworth Miller's celebrity support list."



**Something goes wrong**
“"My prayers are with his family and friends."”
“Guitarist and singer Brad Paisley was distraught over the death of a fellow star.”
“TROY GENTRY DIES IN NEW JERSEY HELICOPTER CRASHGentry, 50, and bandmate Eddie Montgomery made a lasting impact in country music history, achieving success with five No.1 hits.”
“The band was also inducted into the Grand Ole Opry in 2009.”
“Celebrities immediately took to social media to share their thoughts about Gentry and his influence as an artist:.”
“"I'm in total shock and disbelief over the news that my friend Troy Gentry was just killed in a helicopter crash!!!"”
“...tweeted country star Travis Tritt.”
“"I just saw him days ago!"”
“"God bless you Troy Gentry," he tweeted.”
“"So sad to hear the news of Troy Gentry," tweeted Crow.”


"I pray for his family and friends."
"Guitarist and singer Brad Paisley is upset about the death of a fellow star."
Troy gentry died in a helicopter crash in New Jersey. At the age of 50, his band mate Eddie Montgomery had a lasting influence in the history of country music, winning with five top songs
"In 2009, the band was also included in the big Oprah."
"Celebrities immediately share on social media what they think of a gentleman and his influence as an entrepreneur Artist:" he said
"I was shocked and unbelievable to hear that my friend Troy gentry had just been killed in a helicopter crash!"
“…… Country star Travis trit tweeted
"I just saw him a few days ago!"
"God bless you, Mr. Troy," he tweeted
"It's sad to hear from the Trojan gentleman," Crowe tweeted



Number  72
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
““The fighting got worse, and they disagreed a lot about parenting and a lot of things.””
““[Jolie] did try to make it work, but her kids come first, and she couldn’t let them see Mommy and Daddy like this,” the source explained.”
“Brad Pitt is reeling over the end of his two-year marriage (and 14-year relationship) with Angelina Jolie, a source exclusively tells Us Weekly.”
“According to the insider, the Fight Club hunk’s impending divorce from the Oscar-winning actress, 41, has been a tough pill to swallow.”
““He is beside himself and has been crying.”
“He was completely caught off guard and blindsided and had no idea she would do this,” the source tells Us of Pitt’s fragile emotional state after Jolie filed divorce documents on Monday, September 19.”
““Angelina filed the court papers a minute before the courts closed on Monday night,” the insider explains of the Maleficent star’s tactful filing.”
““He didn’t have a lawyer or anything.”
“She had threatened divorce in the past but he did not think she would file this time.”The source adds: “He is completely devastated and beside himself.”
“He is a shattered man.”“He’s extremely upset,” another source tells Us.”


"The battle is getting fiercer and fiercer, and they are very different on parenting and a lot of things."
"[Julie] does try to make it work, but her children come first and she can't let them see mom and dad like that," the source explained
"Brad Pitt's two-year marriage (and 14-year relationship) with Angelina Jolie is coming to an end, which scares him," an exclusive told us weekly
"According to people familiar with the matter, the handsome man of the fight club is about to divorce the 41 year old Oscar queen, which is a pill hard to swallow."
"He's crazy. He's crying all the time."
"He was completely unprepared, silly, and didn't know she would," the source told us of Pete's fragile emotional state after Julie filed her divorce papers on Monday, September 19
"Angelina filed court papers a minute before the court closed on Monday night," the insider explained, explaining the evil star's clever filing
"He doesn't have a lawyer or anything."
"She has threatened divorce in the past, but he doesn't think she will do it this time." "He's completely broken down, he's insane," the source added
"He's a nervous breakdown." "He was very upset," another source told us



Number  73
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“But that probably wouldn’t happen at Jen’s wellness center of course, because she’s fine, it’s fine, everything’s extremely fine.”
“He was like, “What is happening?”Alarming.”
“It was an intense thing to look at Justin’s face.”
“All of that sounds (much like Aniston herself) okay and great, but the Aveeno spokesperson also shared some of the potential risks associated with attaining inner peace through facials:I had a facial and woke up later with what looked like cystic teenage acne.”
“There’s a life’s-too-short policy that I now have with my work; no negative Nancies.”
“Not to sound all woo-woo, but if you go out into the world with inner peace, you’re more joyful.”
“I’m working on it in my brain.”
“I have a fantasy where you have this beautiful space with facialists, rotating workouts, meditation classes, and a café with recipes that are healthier versions of delicious foods so you’re not deprived.”
“As she told Amy Sedaris in an interview with Harper’s Bazaar:My dream is to open a wellness center.”
“How?”


"But it won't happen at Jane's health center because she's fine and everything's fine."
He said, "what happened? "It's shocking."
"It's very nervous to look at Justin's face."
"All this sounds good (much like Aniston herself), but Avino's spokesperson also shared some potential risks and peace of mind through the face: I had a facial massage and woke up with what looked like cystic acne
"My current job has a too short life policy, no negative pregnancy."
"It's not all sobbing, but if you enter the world with inner peace, you will be happier."
"I think about it in my head."
"I have a fantasy that you have a beautiful space, a make-up artist, rotation exercises, meditation classes, and a cafe with more healthy and delicious food, so you won't be deprived."
"My dream is to open a health center," she told Amy Sedaris market in an interview with Harper magazine
"How?"



Number  74
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“… They’re continuing to work on their relationship.””
“The Selfish author zoomed in on the NBA star as he counted down and then tapped the “Unblock” button.”
“Kim begged the Cleveland Cavaliers player to unblock her on Instagram while attending Khloé’s party on Wednesday, June 27.”
““All right, guys.”
“So, what do you think?”
“It’s Khloé’s birthday.”
“Do you think I should ask this guy to unblock me?” the KKW Beauty founder, 37, said in a series of hilarious videos shared on her Instagram Story while sitting next to Thompson, 27, who blocked her on the social media app after she spoke out about his cheating scandal.”
““For Khloé’s birthday, I think it’s only right.”
“I got you,” the athlete replied with a laugh.”
“The birthday girl then implored her boyfriend of nearly two years to “do it right now.”When Thompson pulled out his iPhone, Kim jokingly asked for his passcode.”


“… They are continuing their relationship. "
The selfish author magnified the NBA star in the countdown and then hit the "unlock" button
"When king attended Heroe's party on Wednesday, June 27, he begged Cleveland Cavaliers players to lift the blockade on instagram."
"All right, guys."
"What do you think?"
"Today is khlo é's birthday."
"Do you think I should let this guy help me out? Sitting next to 27 year old Thompson, the 37 year old founder of kkw shared a series of funny videos on instagram. Thompson blocked her on the social media app because she disclosed her cheating scandal
"For Heroe's birthday, I think it's the only right one."
"I got you," the athlete replied with a smile
The birthday girl pleaded with her boyfriend of nearly two years to "do it now". When Thompson took out his iPhone, Kim jokingly asked for his password



Number  75
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Acknowledging that the diet may not be for everyone, as it can be tough to stick too, she also added that those who have suffered from an eating disorder in the past should not try it.”
“Photo / Getty Images"As soon as you drift off to sleep at night until the moment you open your eyes in the morning, you've been doing intermittent fasting.”
“Photo / Getty ImagesThe eight-hour diet is the latest health craze to hit Hollywood and fitness gurus are raving about its benefits.”
“The programme is based on only eating within a window of eight hours per day, and fasting for the other 16 to kick the body into fat burning mode.”
“Nicole Kidman and Hugh Jackman are said to be fans of the diet, eating breakfast at 10am and having their last meal of the day before 6pm.”
“Australian nutritionist, Lee Holmes, spoke to FEMAIL about the benefits of the eight-hour diet and discusses whether or not it really works.”
“"The idea of intermittent fasting may seem foreign, impossible and even scary to some but, I've got a secret for you!”
“It's something you do every.”
“Single.”
“Day," Lee said.”


She acknowledged that this diet may not be suitable for everyone because it is also difficult to stick to, adding that people who have had eating disorders in the past should not try it
"Photo / Getty Images" as long as you slowly fall asleep at night, until the moment you open your eyes in the morning, you have been fasting intermittently
"Eight hour food is a health craze in Hollywood recently, and fitness masters are full of praise for its benefits."
"The basis of this plan is to eat for only eight hours a day and fast for the remaining 16 hours to put the body into fat burning mode."
"Nicole Kidman and Hugh Jackman are said to be fans of dieting, eating breakfast at 10 a.m. and the last meal of the day before 6 p.m."
Australian nutritionist Lee Holmes told femail about the benefits of an eight hour diet and discussed whether it really works
"The idea of fasting intermittently may be strange, impossible, or even terrible to some people, but I have a secret for you!"
"That's what you do every day."
"Single."
"Today," Li said



Number  76
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Image zoom Credit: Splash NewsOn Sunday, PEOPLE confirmed that the Drop the Mic co-host and the singer are engaged.”
““Justin is of course ahead of the trends, selecting an oval stone for Hailey’s ring, which has been somewhat rare over the past decade but is making a huge resurgence,” Andrew Brown, President of WP Diamonds tells PEOPLE.”
“See the photosAre Justin Bieber and Hailey Baldwin Married?”
“See the Band She's Wearing with Her Engagement RingJustin Bieber brought some serious bling with him to the Bahamas.”
“The singer proposed to Hailey Baldwin after only a few weeks of dating (but close to a decade of friendship) during a special island engagement moon, and the model is now wearing not one but two rings on her left hand.”
“In photos circulating social media, Baldwin is seen wearing a huge oval diamond engagement ring set on what looks to be a rose gold pavé diamond band.”
“A second solo wedding-like band is seen on top of the diamond.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
““Hailey’s oval stone is about six carats, F-G color grade and VS clarity, making it one of the better diamonds out there.”
“Baldwin, 21, often turns to the Schwartz with help accessorizing her red carpet looks, but a rep for the brand confirmed to PEOPLE that the jeweler is not behind the ring.”


"Image zooming credit: splash news confirmed on Sunday that the microphone co host and the singer were engaged."
Andrew brown, President of WP diamond, told people: "Justin is certainly ahead of the trend, choosing an oval stone for Haley's ring, which has been rare in the past decade, but it is on the rise."
"Look at the pictures. Are Justin Bieber and Haley Baldwin married?"
"Look at the band she's wearing with her engagement ring. Justin Bieber came to the Bahamas with some serious jewelry."
"The singer proposed to Haley Baldwin after only a few weeks of dating (but nearly a decade of friendship) in a special island engagement month, and now the model is wearing two rings instead of one on her left hand."
"In the photos circulating on social media, Baldwin is wearing a huge oval diamond engagement ring, inlaid on a Pave Diamond ring that looks like rose gold."
"There's a second wedding ring on top of the diamond."
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
"Haley's oval diamond is about 6 carats. The F-G color level and vs transparency make it one of the best diamonds."
Baldwin, 21, often uses Schwartz's help to decorate his red carpet look, but a representative of the brand has confirmed that the jeweler is not behind the scenes



Number  77
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Give us all your thoughts below!”
“HollywoodLifers, do you think that Angelina always had a crush on Jared?”
““The word is they spoke several times on the phone before meeting up in L.A. for dinner, and they’ve been seeing each other whenever they can since then.” If they are together now it seems like Brad may have been right about Angie’s “crush”!”
““Jared reached out to Angie after she filed divorce papers in September,” an insider told Star in the magazine’s Feb. 27 issue.”
“...relationship between her and Jared started up...”
“Another insider previously told HollywoodLife com EXCLUSIVELY that Brad really wouldn t be shocked if his estranged wife was dating Jared as he s always known about her crush Brad and Angelina split in September 2016 when she filed for divorce and it was only recently that rumors of a...”
“That definitely doesn’t sound good.”
““She even sent him a script behind Brad’s back a couple of years ago.” Whoa!”
““Angelina knew Jared was a sore spot with Brad, so anytime she wanted to push his buttons she’d bring up Jared and talked about how much she loved working with him and how talented he is,” the insider continued.”
““Brad always felt like he couldn’t trust Angelina when it came to Jared.” The 53-year-old Allied actor may have had a point, as Angie, 41, and Jared, 45, are already rumored to be seeing each other.”


"Tell us what you think!"
"Hollywood stars, do you think Angelina always likes Jared?"
"I heard they called several times before dinner in Los Angeles, and they've been meeting as much as they can ever since." If they are together now, Brad seems to be right about Angie's infatuation
"Jared contacted Angie in September after filing her divorce papers," a person familiar with the matter said in the February 27 issue of star magazine
“… Her relationship with Jared began... "
"Another insider previously told Hollywood life exclusively that Brad would not be shocked if his separated wife was dating Jared, because he always knew that she had been secretly in love with Brad and Angelina when she filed for divorce in September 2016, and until recently, about a divorce
"That doesn't sound good at all."
"A few years ago, she even sent him a script behind Brad's back." WOW
"Angelina knows Jared is Brad's pain point, so whenever she wants to press his button, she talks about Jared and how much she likes working with him and how talented he is," the person familiar with the matter continued
"Brad always feels that when it comes to Jared, he can't trust Angelina." The 53 year old co star may have a point, as Angie, 41, and Jared, 45, have been rumored to meet



Number  78
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Harry proposed to Meghan over a roast chicken dinner back in 2017Kate and Meghan were spotted enjoying a day out at Wimbledon together earlier this month...”
“Following their announcement, Kate expressed her happiness for the couple, saying: "William and I are absolutely thrilled.”
“Sometimes they'll include recommendations for other related newsletters or services we offer.”
“Our Privacy Notice explains more about how we use your data, and your rights.”
“You can unsubscribe at any time.”
“Kate Middleton, 36, has been a part of the Royal Family for seven years, but actually began dating Prince William back in 2003.”
“Over the years the Duchess of Cambridge has formed a close bond with William’s brother Prince Harry.”
“Kate and Harry have often been spotted together at official engagements, and even worked together on the Head’s Up campaign, raising awareness for mental health.”
“With such a close relationship Harry is reported to have wanted Kate Middleton’s approval before proposing to Meghan Markle According to royal expert Katie Nicholl, Kate is like a mentor to Harry, and therefore Harry wanted Kate’s seal of approval the most.”
“Kate Middleton: Duchess had a huge influence on Prince Harry’s proposal to Meghan MarkleSpeaking to Grazia UK, Katie said: "Harry and Kate are very close, she’s been like a mentor to him and he wanted her seal of approval.”


"Harry proposed to Megan at the roast chicken dinner in 2017. Kate and Megan were found playing together in Wimbledon for a day earlier this month..."
After the announcement, Kate expressed her happiness for the couple, saying: "William and I are very excited."
"Sometimes it includes suggestions for other relevant newsletters or services we provide."
"Our privacy statement explains in detail how we use your data and your rights."
"You can unsubscribe at any time."
"Kate Middleton, 36, has been in the royal family for seven years, but actually started dating Prince William as early as 2003."
"Over the years, the Duchess of Cambridge has established a close relationship with William's brother Prince Harry."
"Kate and Harry are often found together when they are on a formal date, and even take part in the head up movement together, which improves people's awareness of mental health."
According to British Royal expert Katie Nicholl, Harry has such a close relationship with Megan markel that it is said that Harry wants Kate Middleton's approval before he proposes to Megan markel. Kate is just like Harry's mentor, so Harry most wants Kate's approval
Kate Middleton: The Duchess had a huge influence on Prince Harry's proposal to Megan marks. "Harry and Kate are very close, she's like his mentor, and he wants her recognition," Kate said



Number  79
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“It looks like Selena and Justin will be keeping tabs on each other’s lives forever!”
“It’s painful for her to see that he’s with Hailey again, but it is what is,” another source explained to HL.”
“Justin Bieber, 25, and Hailey Baldwin, 21, are definitely enjoying each other’s company.”
“From their club night PDA in Miami, to their recent paparazzi stunt in NYC, it’s safe to say they’re back together.”
““Justin is in a good place with Hailey, she makes him feel good, secure, and she is always caring to him,” a source close to JB tells HollywoodLife EXCLUSIVELY.”
“The insider is definitely right about that.”
“On June 11, Hailey was spotted wiping the “What Do You Mean” singer down with a towel after he took a swim.”
“So cute, right?”
““He feels happy and proud to be with her, and he doesn’t mind flaunting their rekindled romance around town,” our source continued.”
“However, Hailey’s affection isn’t the only reason Justin’s been so open about their relationship.”


"It seems that Serena and Justin will always focus on each other's lives!"
"It's painful to see him with Haley again, but that's the truth," another source explained to HL
"Justin Bieber, 25, and Haley Baldwin, 21, absolutely enjoy each other's company."
"From their club night PDA in Miami to the recent paparazzi stunt in New York, it's safe to say they're together again."
"Justin and Haley get along very well. She makes Haley feel good and secure, and she always cares about him," a source close to JB told Hollywood life
"Insiders must be right about that."
On June 11, Haley was found wiping the "what do you mean" singer with a towel after swimming
"Lovely, isn't it?"
"He's happy and proud to be with her, and he doesn't mind showing off their renewed romance in the city," our source continued
"However, Haley's love is not the only reason Justin is so open to their relationship."



Number  80
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“He should start doing his.””
“We will keep doing our jobs.”
“The video shows Trump taking down and punching a man with the cable news channel’s logo superimposed over his face.”
“Trump accompanied the video with a caption, simply saying, “#FraudNewsNetwork” and “#FNN.”Sunday’s tweet is just the latest in the president’s online crusade against CNN, MSNBC, and other media outlets.”
“Trump has been feuding with “Morning Joe” hosts Joe Scarborough and Mika Brzezinski all week, referring to the pair as “low I.Q.”
“...crazy,” “dumb as a rock,” and “psycho” on multiple occasions.”
“But while the president has defended his social media etiquette, celebrities and other prominent figures remain critical.”
“J.K. Rowling and Chelsea Clinton referenced our forefathers in their critiques of the controversial clip.”
“July 2, 1776: Continental Congress votes for independenceJuly 2, 2017: Trump auditions for @WWE https://t.co/in4xXfCQeG — Chelsea Clinton (@ChelseaClinton) July 2, 2017'To persevere in one's duty, and be silent, is the best answer to calumny.'”
“George Washington https://t.co/nvhYdTBF0P — J.K. Rowling (@jk_rowling) July 2, 2017Ava DuVernay took the opportunity to highlight what she perceives as hypocrisy between how Trump and former President Barack Obama are treated.”


"He should start to do his job."
"We will continue to do our job well."
"The video shows trump knocking down and beating a man with a cable news channel logo on his face."
Trump attached a title to the video, which simply said: "fraudnews network" and "FNN.". Sunday's tweet was just the latest in the president's online campaign against CNN, MSNBC and other media
Trump has been at loggerheads with Good Morning Joe hosts Joe Scarborough and Mika Brzezinski for a week, calling them "low IQ"
"Crazy", "silly as a stone" and "Psycho" appear many times
"However, despite the president's defense of his social media etiquette, celebrities and other celebrities remain critical."
"J.K. Rowling and Chelsea Clinton referred to our ancestors in commenting on this controversial episode."
"July 2, 1776: Continental Congress votes for independence july 2, 2017: trump participates in @ WWE audition https://t.co/in4xfcqeg- Chelsea Clinton (@ chelseaclinton) July 2, 2017 "the best answer to slander is to stick to our duty and keep silent."
"George Washington https://t.co/nvhYdTBF0P-J.K.Rowling (@ JK \ \ u Rowling) on July 2, 2017, AVA Duvernay took this opportunity to highlight what she thought was the hypocritical treatment between trump and former President Obama. "



Number  81
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Write to Laignee Barron at Laignee.Barron@time.com.”
“If you don't get the confirmation within 10 minutes, please check your spam folder.”
““Of course he said it,” Bush wrote in a New York Times op-ed Sunday titled, “Yes, Donald Trump, You Said That”.”
“Bush said he felt compelled to speak out after the president reportedly began telling aides and fellow politicians that the tape was fabricated.”
““President Trump is currently indulging in some revisionist history,” Bush said.”
““This has hit a raw nerve in me.”In the 2005 recording, which resurfaced during the final moments of last year’s presidential campaign when it was published by the Washington Post, Trump is heard lewdly bragging to Bush about groping and kissing women without their consent.”
“Trump on a hot mic tells the Access Hollywood anchor about unsuccessfully trying to have sex with a married woman and how you can do anything to women when you re a star He said he was able to grab them by the pussy After the recording s release Trump...”
“...then a presidential candidate issued an apology and dismissed the talk as locker room banter...”
“More recently, Trump has revisited the tape to question whether the voice heard is actually his, according to the New York Times.”
“Bush, who was fired by NBC after the tape’s release, confirms the voice is undoubtedly Trump’s, but adds that he only recently realized that the talk could be more than “hypothetical hot air from America’s highest-rated bloviator”.”


"To laignee Barron Lenny. Barron @ time.com. "
"If you are not confirmed within 10 minutes, please check your spam folder."
"Of course he said that," Bush wrote in the New York Times on Sunday, entitled "yes, Donald Trump, you said that."
"Bush said it was reported that after the president began telling aides and political colleagues that the tape was fabricated, he felt the need to speak."
"President trump is currently addicted to some revisionist history," Bush said
"It touched my nerves." In a 2005 recording, trump reappeared at the end of last year's presidential campaign, when the Washington Post published the recording. In the recording, trump was heard to obscene boast to Bush that he touched and kissed women without their consent
"Trump told the Hollywood anchor on a hot microphone that trying to have sex with married women failed. When you are a star, how can you do anything to women? He said that he can catch their pudenda after trump released the record..."
“…… Then a presidential candidate apologized and saw the conversation as a dressing room joke... "
According to the New York Times, "trump recently reviewed the tape and questioned whether the voice he heard was really his."
Bush, who was fired by NBC after the release of the tape, confirmed that the voice was undoubtedly Trump's, but added that he only recently realized that the conversation might not be just "the hypothetical hot air of America's most watched hooligans."



Number  82
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“"I try to keep things as private as I can, but when it comes to a point, it's just not a big deal," she added.”
“Like, if I want to go out and grab a smoothie with a friend who's a male, I'm not gonna let the paparazzi stop me from doing that and living my life and just being a normal person.”
“I try my best, but at the same time, I try not to let being out with someone affect my everyday life.”
“She said: "It's not always easy, but I don't know, I just like to keep my private life private.”
“Meanwhile, during an interview with ET, the Keeping Up With The Kardashians star said she feels the world is extremely interested in her personal life.”
“A new album, a movie, a great reputation, gorgeous, he has it all," the insider added.”
“She would be thrilled if Kendall was linked to Harry.”
“"She just doesn't get what Kendall sees in him.”
“Kris would much rather see her daughter with an A-list celeb like Harry, than A$AP [Rocky] who is now embroiled in baby mama rumors."”
“"Kris is disappointed that Harry is now off the market and dating Tess.”


"I try to keep it a secret, but at some point, it's no big deal," she added
"For example, if I want to go out for a smoothie with a male friend, I won't let the paparazzi stop me and let me live a normal life."
"I try my best, but at the same time, I try not to let going out with others affect my daily life."
"It's not always easy, but I don't know, I just like my private life," she said
"Meanwhile, in an interview with ET, the star who keeps in touch with Kardashian said she feels the world is very interested in her personal life."
"A new album, a movie, a great reputation, gorgeous, he has everything," the insider added
"If Kendall has contact with Harry, she will be very excited."
"She just didn't understand what Kendall thought of him."
"Chris would rather see her daughter with a first-class celebrity like Harry than a $AP (Rocky) person. She is now in the middle of the" baby mom "rumor."
"Chris is disappointed that Harry is not dating Tess in the market now."



Number  83
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“She captioned the Instagram photo, “Awww Kanye sent me the coolest flowers!!”
“SEPTEMBER 2015: EVERYONE LOVES FLOWERSAfter that night, Kanye sent Taylor flowers, which pretty much led to her assertion that she would, indeed, be his running mate.”
“They also took a group shot with JAY-Z, because, why not?”
“This could really be the start of something beautiful.”
“They also embraced!”
“Everyone smiled.”
“Taylor enjoyed some nice conversation with Kim.”
“FEBRUARY 2015: GOOD VIBESTaylor and Kanye were reunited at the 2015 Grammys, and there was no drama to be seen.”
“There was also a moment when Kim took a photo for Taylor.”
“Yes, yes we were ever so young.”


She added a caption to the instagram photo: "Oh, kenye gave me the coolest flower!"
"September 2015: after the night everyone loved flowers, Kanye sent flowers to Taylor, which almost led her to assert that she would indeed be Taylor's running mate."
"They also took pictures with Jay-Z, because, why not?"
"It could really be the beginning of something good."
"They hugged, too!"
"Everyone laughed."
"Tyler and Kim had a good time talking."
"February 2015: good vibes Taylor and Kanye meet again at the 2015 Grammy Awards, there's no drama to speak of."
"For a while, Kim Jong Il is taking pictures of Tyler."
"Yes, yes, we used to be so young."



Number  84
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“She’s ready to catch a few z’s!””
““Good thing too, because Blake has already told him he’s becoming Head Babysitter in their household as soon as the baby arrives.”
“And while the alleged baby was a ‘shock,’ the two couldn’t be happier!”
“Blake Lively, 30, was absolutely glowing alongside her husband Ryan Reynolds, 41, while attending the Deadpool 2 premiere in NYC on May 14.”
“But while some simply thought her black sequined gown with a giant burgundy bow was stylish and dramatic, others thought she may have been trying to conceal a tiny baby bump!”
“Turns out, the later may be correct — at least according to OK!”
“...magazine.”
“The mag claims Blake is in the first trimester of her third pregnancy, which is why she’s keeping the alleged news hush-hush.”
““Word is she’s in the first trimester, so they’ve only told close friends and family,” a source of the media outlet told the publication.”
““They had talked about having more kids but didn’t have a plan — so this is surely a shocking but very welcome development!” Blake and Ryan are already proud parents to daughters James, 3, and Ines, 19 months, but it’s no secret they want a big family.”


"She's ready to catch a few Z's!"
"It's also a good thing, because black has told him that as soon as the children arrive, he will be their baby sitter."
"Although the so-called baby is a 'shock', two can't be happy!"
"Blake Lively, 30, and her husband Ryan Reynolds, 41, were absolutely radiant at the premiere of" dead pool 2 "in New York on May 14."
However, some people just think that her black sequined dress with a huge Burgundy bow is fashionable and eye-catching, while others think that she may be trying to cover up a small baby lump! "
"It turns out that the latter may be true - at least according to OK!"
“… Magazine. "
"The magazine claims that Blake is in the first three months of her third pregnancy, which is why she is silent about the news."
"There was news that she was in her first three months of pregnancy, so they only told family and friends," a source in the media told the magazine
"They say they want to have more children, but they don't have a plan - so it must be a shocking but very popular development!"! "Black and Ryan are proud parents of their three-year-old daughter James and 19-month-old daughter Ian, but it's no secret that they want a big family."



Number  85
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Put simply, it argues that African-Americans, Latinos and every other oppressed population will internalize the somatic norm image at the expense of their native characteristics.”
“I published my first paper on the topic in 1994.”
“It’s probably no coincidence that light-skinned blacks emerged as leaders in the black community: To white power brokers, they were less threatening.”
“By early 19th century, the “mulatto hypothesis” emerged, arguing that the “white blood” of light-skinned slaves made them smarter, more civilized and better looking.”
“In America, these variations in complexions produced an unspoken hierarchy: Black people with lighter complexions ended up being granted some of the rights of the master class.”
“According to Japanese tradition, a woman with fair skin compensates for “seven blemishes.”The United States has its own complicated history with skin color, primarily because “mulatto” skin – not quite black, but not quite white – often arose out of mixed-race children conceived between slaves and slave masters.”
“In Japan, long before the first Europeans arrived, dark skin was stigmatized.”
“In India, dark-skinned Dalits, for thousands of years, were viewed as “untouchables.” Today, they’re still stigmatized.”
“But it is in Asia where dark skin has seen the longest and most intense level of stigma.”
“In many Native American communities, “Red-Black Cherokees” were denied acceptance into the tribe, while those with lighter skin were welcomed.”


In short, it believes that African Americans, Latinos and all other oppressed people will internalize the image of physical norms at the expense of their native characteristics
"I published my first paper on this topic in 1994."
"It may not be a coincidence that light skinned blacks are leaders of the black community: they are less of a threat to white power brokers."
At the beginning of the 19th century, the "mixed race hypothesis" appeared, believing that the "white blood" of light skinned slaves made them smarter, more civilized and more beautiful
"In the United States, these changes in skin color have produced a self-evident hierarchy: the lighter blacks are finally granted some rights of the host class."
According to Japanese tradition, fair skinned women can make up for "seven defects.". The United States has its own complex skin color history, mainly because the skin of "half breed" - not entirely black, but not entirely white - is usually produced by the half breed bred between slaves and slave owners
In Japan, dark skin was stigmatized long before the first Europeans arrived
In India, dark skinned Dalits have been regarded as "untouchables" for thousands of years. Today, they are still stigmatized
"But in Asia, the stigma of dark skin is the longest and strongest."
In many Native American communities, the "red and black Cherokee" were refused to join the tribe, while the lighter skinned were welcomed



Number  86
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“News reported her as saying “babies are blessings.”The legal case between Chyna and Rob is still ongoing.”
“E!”
“Chyna smiled and responded, “It’s always a blessing.” She then said something else, which The Blast reported as: “They deserve blessings.” However, it’s hard to hear exactly what she says.”
“A baby girl,” the reporter asked.”
“"Are you happy about Kim and Kanye having a kid?”
“Chyna’s response was much kinder and more subdued than some might have predicted.”
“But today, photographers from The Blast spotted Chyna running some errands in Los Angeles and decided to ask her if she has any feelings about Kim and Kanye’s new baby, who was born via surrogate earlier this week.”
“...s canceled reality show except Kim Rob and Kris Jenner...”
“They promptly separated but ever since then the two families have been embroiled in a tense legal battle that revolved around Chyna suing the Kardshains for destroying her career so she would not compete with them In November Blac Chyna removed every Kardashian from her lawsuit over her and Rob...”
“Less than a year after their child was born, the couple broke up after Rob publicly posted revenge porn photos of Blac Chyna on his Instagram and Twitter.”


News reports said she said "babies are happy.". The case between Gina and rob is still going on
“E！”
"It's always a blessing," she replied with a smile Then she said something else, and the explosion report said, "they deserve to be blessed." However, it's hard to hear what she said
"A baby girl," the reporter asked
"Are you happy that Kim and Kanye have children?"
"Chener's reaction was much more moderate than some had expected."
"But today, the photographer at the scene of the explosion found Zina running errands in Los Angeles and decided to ask her if she felt anything about Kim and Kanye's new baby, which was born earlier this week through a surrogate mother."
“… She canceled the reality show, except for Kim rob and Chris Jenner... "
"They soon separated, but since then, the two families have been involved in a tense legal battle over Zina, suing the cardesays and ruining her career so she won't compete with them in November. Blake Zina removed Kardashian from her lawsuit with Rob... "
"Less than a year after the birth of the baby, rob published a revenge pornographic photo of Blake chener on instagram and twitter, and the couple broke up."



Number  87
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“MORE : Inside Kylie Jenner’s wild 21st birthday bash as she packs on PDA with Travis Scott and Caitlyn parties with KardashiansMORE : Kanye West isn’t worried about Kim Kardashian being in the same room as Trump even though he’s a ‘player’”
“If you've got a celebrity story, video or pictures get in touch with the Metro.co.uk entertainment team by emailing us celebtips@metro.co.uk, calling 020 3615 2145 or by visiting our Submit Stuff page - we'd love to hear from you.”
“Got a showbiz story?”
“Sister Kim previously stated she was supportive of whatever decision Khloe made, so long as she is happy.”
“Khloe Kardashian decided to stay together with Thompson despite accusations that he cheated, and instead the pair reportedly enrolled in couple’s therapy to make their relationship work.”
“In June, the Kardashians welcomed Khloe home from Cleveland with balloons that read ‘Khloe and True’ – but not Tristan.”
“This is not the first time Kylie appears to have given Thompson the cold shoulder.”
“AdvertisementAdvertisementThe image did feature Kim, Khloe and Kourtney’s late father Robert Kardashian, as well as a host of other close family members.”
“Neither mentioned the missing sportsman.”
“To view this video please enable JavaScript, and consider upgrading to a web browser that supports HTML5 videoKim shared a video of the work of art on her Instagram stories, as did Khloe.”


"More: Kylie Jenner and Travis Scott pack on PDA, Caitlin and kardashiansmore wildly celebrate their 21st birthday at the party: Kanye West is not worried about Kim Kardashian and trump are in the same room, even though he is one‘
"If you have celebrity stories, videos or pictures, please email us with Metro entertainment team at: celebtips@metro.co.uk , please call 020 3615 2145 or visit our submission page - we are glad to hear from you. "
"Is there a story about the show business?"
"Sister Jin has previously said that she supports any decision Khloe makes as long as she is happy."
Kardashian decided to stay with Thompson, who, despite being accused of cheating, is said to have participated in the couple's treatment to maintain their relationship
"In June, Kardashian and her family welcomed Khloe home from Cleveland - but not Tristan - with balloons that said 'Khloe and true.'
"It doesn't seem to be the first time Kelly has been cold to Thompson."
"This photo does show Kim Jong Il, Chloe and kurtni's late father, Robert Kardashian, as well as many other close family members."
"Neither of them mentioned the missing athlete."
"To watch this video, please enable JavaScript and consider upgrading to a web browser that supports HTML5 video. Kim shared a video of a work of art on instagram, as did Khloe."



Number  88
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“The two of them together were just nothing but fighting and drama all the time.”To see what other changes Kylie has made to her body, check out the gallery below!”
“This is how I think of them: cut the wings off and if you just look at their bodies, they’re not that pretty.”
“Now that Kylie Jenner is a mom — she just announced that she gave birth to her first child with her baby daddy Travis Scott — she definitely had a completely different mindset than most other 20-year-olds.”
“Last June, fans were shocked when Kylie and Travis debuted their new matching butterfly tattoos, but now it all makes sense.”
“She got the butterfly to symbolize her relationship with the father of her baby girl!”
“What’s more surprising is Kylie got a tattoo of an insect that she’s afraid of!”
“Over the summer, her show Life of Kylie, has really taught us a lot about the makeup mogul.”
“In a clip from an episode from Season 1, Kylie and her BFF Jordyn Woods went to a zoo together.”
“Too bad Ky learns that she’s terrified of butterflies.”
““I’m scared if one lands on me!” the 20-year-old screamed as her friend laughed.”


"They're just fighting and farce together." If you want to see Kelly's other changes to her body, take a look at the gallery below
"That's what I think of them: cut off the wings. If you just look at their bodies, they're not so beautiful."
"Now that Kelly Jenner is a mother - she has just announced that she and her father Travis Scott gave birth to her first child - she must have a completely different mindset from most other 20-year-old children."
"When Kelly and Travis launched their new butterfly tattoo last June, fans were shocked, but now it all makes sense."
"She got the butterfly, symbolizing her relationship with the baby girl's father!"
"What's more surprising is that Kelly has an insect tattoo she's afraid of!"
"Over the summer, her life of Kelly really taught us a lot about make-up tycoons."
"In a clip from season one, Kelly went to the zoo with her boyfriend, Jordan woods."
"It's too bad Kay knows she's afraid of butterflies."
"I'm afraid someone will fall on me! "The 20-year-old girl screamed and her friend laughed."



Number  89
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Email us at tips@radaronline.com, or call us at (866) ON-RADAR (667-2327) any time, day or night.”
“As the itinerary reveals, Hunter was in Cleveland, Ohio until the morning of November 2, when A-Rod attended the World Series.”
“See The Proof He Booked A Sex Date With His Mistress Months AgoA-Rod Is Lying!”
“See The Proof He Booked A Sex Date With His Mistress Months Ago The baseballer's pals claim he hasn't talked to Lauren Hunter in years.”
“One day after RadarOnline.com published The National ENQUIRER‘s exclusive interview with Alex Rodriguez‘s mistress, Lauren Hunter, pals of the star are insisting that A-Rod hasn’t been in contact with Hunter for years.”
“But Radar has obtained proof that Rodriguez and his assistant were emailing Lauren with travel details for a November 2016 sex date!”
“A copy of Hunter’s flight itinerary for November 2, 2016, clearly states that it was provided to her by A-Rod’s assistant and the baseballer himself.”
“READ The Itinerary HereThese email exchanges, dated one day before Hunter’s flight, show discussion between Rodriguez and his assistant regarding Hunter’s flight details.”
““Heidi — when is the return flight?” Rodriguez wrote his assistant, Heidi Bitter, in the email chain dated November 1, 2016.”


"Email us tips@radaronline.com , or call the (866) radar (667-2327) at any time. "
"As the itinerary shows, hunt was in Cleveland, Ohio, until A-Rod took part in the world series on the morning of November 2."
"Look at the evidence that he dated his mistress a few months ago. Rod is lying!"
"Look at the evidence that he made a one-time date with his mistress a few months ago. The baseball player's friend says he hasn't talked to Lauren hunt in years."
"A day later RadarOnline.com In an exclusive interview with Alex Rodriguez's mistress Lauren hunt published in the national inquirer, a friend of the star insisted that A-Rod had not contacted hunt for years
"But radar has got evidence that Rodriguez and his assistant are e-mailing Lauren with details of their November 2016 Sex Date trip!"
"A copy of Hunt's flight schedule on November 2, 2016 clearly shows that it was provided to her by A-Rod's assistant and baseball player himself."
"Please read the itinerary here. The date of these email exchanges is the day before Hunt's flight, which shows Rodriguez and his assistant's discussion about Hunt's flight details."
"Heidi - when is the return flight? "Rodriguez wrote to his assistant Heidi pist in the email chain on November 1, 2016."



Number  90
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“While it is not common for commoners to invite their former lovers to their nuptials, there’s royal precedent for inviting your exes to your big day.”
““This can prompt disapproving looks from the older generations.”
“...concern let alone being there to attend the happy union...”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
“But, as Bonas revealed Thursday, that does not mean she did feel anxious about attending.”
“The model, 29, opened up about the experience and what she worried about most about her ex’s wedding to Meghan Markle in a column for U.K. magazine The Spectator.”
““Friends are starting to get married, which means the dilemma of British wedding attire.”
“Hats,” Bonas admitted.”
““Why do I find hats so tricky?”
“Tricky to wear, tricky to look at, and extremely tricky for the poor soul sitting in the pew behind.”“Most of the time I avoid headgear,” she revealed.”


"Although it's not common for ordinary people to invite their ex lovers to a wedding, there is a royal precedent for inviting your ex girlfriend to your big day."
"It's going to make the older generation resentful."
“… Not to mention joining the happy Alliance... "
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
"But, as Bonas revealed on Thursday, that doesn't mean she's really anxious about attending the meeting."
The 29 year old model opened her story about Khan Megan markel's wedding and her biggest worries in the British magazine spectator.
"Friends are getting married, which means that the British are in a dilemma of wedding dress."
"Hat," Bonas admitted
"Why do I find hats so tricky?"
"It's hard to put on, it's hard to look at, and the poor guy in the back bench is hard to deal with." "Most of the time I don't wear a hat," she revealed



Number  91
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Everyone is panicking because the rebooted Idol just isn’t the lightning-rod hit ABC thought it would be.” The reboot premiered on March 11 and lost 3 million viewers by March 19.”
“The source said, “There are already whispers of a cancellation or a shake-up in the judging panel.”
“I wanted it to be special.” Aside from the Katy drama, the source revealed that the other two judges — Lionel Richie and Luke Bryan — are just “bland.”So what’s in store for the singing competition?”
“I wanted to save it for my first relationship.”
“The source said that particular kiss, “was met with disapproval.” He publicly spoke about the incident with The New York Times and said, “I was a tad bit uncomfortable.”
“...smooch on the hopeful contestant Benjamin Glaze who had never been kissed before...”
“Celebrity judge Katy Perry who was paid 25 million for the gig has also been a big factor as her flirty behavior with contestants is a turnoff and key element of the ratings decline The Firework singer recently planted a...”
“And Ryan is not the only one contributing to the show’s questionable future.”
“He has since been cleared by NBC, yet his reputation still seems to be a bit tarnished.”
“...erect penis against her while in his underwear groped her and slapped her buttocks...”


"Everyone was panicking because" restart Idol "wasn't what ABC imagined. It premiered on March 11 and lost 3 million viewers by March 19."
"There have been rumors that the jury will be canceled or restructured," the source said
"I hope it's special." In addition to Katie's play, sources revealed that the other two judges - Lionel Richie and Luke Blaine - were just "prosaic.". So what is the future singing competition? "
"I want to keep it for my first relationship."
"The source said that special kiss," met with opposition. "He talked publicly about the incident to the New York Times and said," I'm a little uncomfortable. "
“… Kiss hopeful player Benjamin glass, who has never been kissed before... "
"Star judge Katy Perry was paid $25 million at the concert, which is also an important factor, because her flirting with the contestants is disgusting and also a key factor in the decline in ratings. The fireworks singer recently planted a new one
"Ryan is not the only one who has contributed to the future of the show."
"Since then, he has been cleared by NBC, but his reputation still seems to be a bit damaged."
“… Erectile penis against her, and touch her in his underwear, slap her buttocks... "



Number  92
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“In the back of her mind, she had her suspicions that there was someone else, but little did she know that person [was] Selena!”For more on this, pick up the latest issue of In Touch — and for more exclusive content sign up for our newsletter!”
““She began to lose trust when his calls and texts became less frequent.”
““Their relationship deteriorated as they started spending more and more time apart due to work commitments,” a source told In Touch exclusively.”
“In Touch previously reported that the two began speaking to each other behind Bella’s back long before the he called it quits with Bella — but the model, 19, always had suspicions about the “Can’t Feel My Face” singer talking to other girls behind her back.”
“MORE: Selena Gomez Poses Topless After Kissing The Weeknd — Bella Hadid Not Impressed!”
“...is Abel Tesfaye broke up with Bella Hadid his long term girlfriend...”
“Friends are concerned that it s only a matter of time before it all ends in tears due to Selena s self sabotaging ways Selena and The Weeknd were first linked after they were spotted getting affectionate on a date in January just months after the singer whose real name...”
““Selena’s acting so crazy that he’s starting to have second thoughts about their relationship,” the insider tells In Touch.”
““She’s so scared that she’s threatened to dump him if he doesn’t let her come along on tour.”But, the insider notes, ending their relationship may be the best thing for both Selena and her new beau.”
““Selena’s paranoid that fans will be throwing themselves at The Weeknd and he’ll be tempted to stray,” the insider notes.”


"Deep down in her heart, she suspected there was someone else, but she hardly knew it was Selena! "For more information, please click on the latest issue of in touch - for more exclusive content, please register for our press release!"
"As his phone calls and text messages dwindled, she began to lose trust."
"Their relationship deteriorated as they began to spend more and more time apart due to the commitment to work," a source told exclusive in contact
"In touch has previously reported that they started talking behind Bella's back long before he broke up with Bella - but the 19-year-old model always suspects that the singer who can't touch my face is talking behind Bella's back with other girls."
More: Serena Gomez is topless after kissing - Bella is not impressed
“… It's Abel tesfield and Bella Hadid who broke up with their longtime girlfriend... "
"My friends are worried that it's only a matter of time before Selena and" weekend "get connected for the first time due to her self destructive way, because they were found to be affectionate in a date in January, and just a few months ago, the singer's real name..."
"Selena was acting so crazy that he began to have new ideas about their relationship," the person familiar with the matter told contact
"She was so scared that she threatened to dump him if he didn't let her go on tour." But people familiar with the matter point out that ending their relationship is the best thing for Serena and her new boyfriend
"Selena's paranoid, fans will throw themselves at the weekend, he will be lured to wander," insiders pointed out



Number  93
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
““It’s about time real people took back political power, and after her stay in jail, Teresa isn’t frightened of anyone.””
““Plus, she isn’t going to be shutting down any access to bridges.”
“WATCH: Sinead O’Connor Video — Suicidal In New Jersey“She has a massive social media following to get her message out, and she has a lot of good ideas.”
“Shuter...”
“Teresa couldn t do a worse job than Chris Christie At first it was suggested she run for governor as a press stunt but now she is really thinking about it a snitch whispered to The National ENQUIRER S Rob...”
““The Real Housewives of New Jersey” star Teresa Giudice would fit right in!”
“Of New Jersey’s last four governors, one resigned in disgrace and another was nearly indicted.”


"It's time for real people to regain political power. After her imprisonment, Theresa is not afraid of anyone."
"Besides, she won't close any access to the bridge."
"Watch: cinnard O'Connor Video - New Jersey suicide" she has a huge social media trail of her information and she has a lot of good ideas
"Shute..."
"Theresa's job can't be worse than Chris Christie. At first, some people suggested that she run for governor as a media stunt, but now she's really thinking about it. An informant whispered to rob in the national inquirer that..."
"New Jersey Real housewife" star Theresa Judith is a great fit
"Of the last four governors in New Jersey, one resigned in disgrace and the other was almost prosecuted."



Number  94
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“You can go into an argument, and your first thought should not always be ‘Should I be in this relationship?’ That should be the last thought when you argue.”AdvertisementBy the looks of things, these will be making sweet music together for many years to come.”
“That is the best gift ever.”
“The pair has toured the world together belting out their hits songs including “Like We Never Loved at All,” “Angry All the Time,” and of course, “Meanwhile Back at Mama’s.”The power couple has been married for 21 years and has three beautiful daughters together.”
“However, a new report from OK Magazine claimed that the diva no longer feels connected to her spouse and is ready to move on with her life.”
“A so-called pal said for many years the legendary singer and songwriter stayed with McGraw because she did not want to break her family.”
“The publication went on to reveal that Hill has grown tired of McGraw’s love for the ladies.”
“Speculations on Hill and McGraw’s marriage have been going around for years, and they rarely dispel them.”
“Instead, during interviews to promote their albums and tours they talk about how strong their love is.”
“Last year, they sat down with ET‘s Keltie Knight and talked anniversary gifts.”
“Hill said: “He is good.”


"You can start arguing, and your first thought should not always be," should I be in this relationship? "This should be the last thought you argue about." Outwardly, these people will play sweet music together for many years to come
"It's the best gift."
"The two traveled all over the world together, singing their popular songs, including" we've never loved "," always angry ", and of course" back to mom's house at the same time. ". The powerful couple have been married for 21 years and have three beautiful daughters together
"However, according to a new report in OK magazine, the queen no longer feels connected with her spouse and is ready to continue her life."
"A so-called friend said that the legendary singer songwriter had been with McGraw for years because she didn't want to destroy her family."
"The publication goes on to reveal that hill is tired of McGraw's love for women."
"Speculation about hill and McGraw's marriage has been circulating for years, and they rarely get rid of it."
"Instead, in interviews with promotional albums and tours, they talk about how strong their love is."
"Last year, they sat down with Katie Knight of ET to talk about anniversary gifts."
"He's fine," Hill said



Number  95
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Do you think she’ll actually dress up as Maleficent?”
“There’s no question these kids are in for a Halloween treat!”
“We learned exclusively the star is determined to go ALL out this year to ensure her kids have the ‘ultimate’ holiday.”
“Angelina Jolie, 42, began her Halloween season with a bang when she took a trip to Glendale Halloween with a few of her children earlier this week.”
“Impressively, the actress reportedly dropped a whopping a $1,000 at the Halloween store — and it’s all to ensure her six kids: Maddox, 16; Pax, 13; Zahara, 12; Shiloh, 11; and the twins Knox & Vivienne, 9, have the Halloween of a lifetime!”
“As it turns out, the newly single mom is pulling out all the stops to please her and Brad Pitt‘s, 53, youngsters — even considering their pleas for her to dress up in full Maleficent garb!”
“Click here to see pics of Brad Pitt with his kids.”
““Angelina came into the store and absolutely spoiled the kids to the tune of around $1,000,” a source close to Glendale Halloween told HollywoodLife.com EXCLUSIVELY.”
““She looked like a supermom — incredibly happy and delighted to be out with the kids.”
“She bought a bunch of lights, bloody knives, multiple scary masks, and a straight jacket.”


"Do you think she will really dress up as a villain?"
"There's no doubt that these children will be treated for Halloween!"
"We learned exclusively that this star is determined to go all out this year to ensure that her children have an 'ultimate' holiday."
Angelina Jolie, 42, took her children to Glendale on a Halloween trip earlier this week
"It's impressive that the actress is reported to have lost as much as a $1000 in a Halloween shop - all to ensure that her six children: 16-year-old Maddox, 13-year-old parks, 12-year-old Zahara, 11-year-old Shiloh and 9-year-old twins Knox and Vivian spend their whole lives on Halloween!"
"It turns out that this young man who has just become a single mother did everything to please her and Brad Pitt's 53 year old children - even considering that they asked her to wear a prank costume!"
"Click here to see pictures of Brad Pitt and his children."
"Angelina went into the store and spoiled the kids for about $1000," a source close to Glendale's Halloween told reporters
"She looks like a super Mom - very happy and happy with the kids."
"She bought a bunch of lights, bloody knives, scary masks and a stiff jacket."



Number  96
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Words by Lucy WoodNow that you've had your daily dose of Zayn, you might as well check out his sexiest selfies of all time everrrr.”
“So that's that, Mr Malik has spoken - and remained in Gigi's good boyfriend books as an extra bonus.”
“You either believe ‘Look What You Made Me Do’ is an anthem that slays the history of music - or you think that Swifty needs to just not, tbh.”
“And we know what you’ve been wondering in the midst of this whole thing – where does Zayn Malik stand on the matter?”
“Luckily, Zayn has confirmed once and for all whether he’s a member of Team Tay or not, giving his say on all the backlash that Swifty has been facing over her shade-filled new track.”
“Getty Chatting to The Fader who quizzed him on the Taylor Swift drama Zayn kept things pretty neutral when he said When it comes to anything that has to do with trivia about people s personal lives or things that...”
“...s going on in their careers I don t necessarily pay too much attention...”
“Keeping well out of the whole thing, Zayn went on: "I don’t pay too much attention to what people even say about me.”
“I just tend to take it for what it is when I meet them people in real life and have a conversation with them.”
““If they’re cool with me, then I base my relationship on that."”


"Lucy wood, now that you've eaten Zahn every day, you might as well take a look at his sexiest selfie ever."
"That's it, Mr. Malik said - left it in Gigi's good boyfriend book as an extra bonus."
"You either believe that 'look what you've made me do' is a national anthem that kills the history of music - or you don't think swift needs it, TBH."
"We know what you've been thinking about in this - what's Zane Malik's position on this?"
"Fortunately, zayn has confirmed once and for all whether he is a member of the Tay team and expressed his views on all the rebounds swifty is facing on the new track."
"Getty chats with a promoter who asks him questions about Taylor Swift's play Zane when he talks about any trivialities or problems related to people's private lives
"In their careers, I don't have to pay much attention to..."
Zahn turned a deaf ear to the whole thing and said, "I don't pay much attention to what people think of me."
"When I meet them in real life and talk to them, I tend to accept reality."
"If they are cold to me, then my relationship is based on that."



Number  97
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Let us know below!”
“Were you really hoping she would have one?”
“HollywoodLifers, what do you think about Taylor’s reasons for cancelling her Fourth of July party?”
“Trust us, there are enough amazing shots of guests like Gigi Hadid, Karlie Kloss, Blake Lively, Ryan Reynolds and Tay’s old beau Tom Hiddleston at her parties to last you until next year!”
“For now, Tay fans can enjoy looking back at pics of her previous Fourth of July bashes.”
“OMG, can you imagine?”
“Hopefully, Tay will be back at it again next Fourth of July and Joe will be right there beside her in a matching red, white and blue outfit.”
“Everyone has the right to chill out and take things slow on the holidays, even our fave celebs!”
“...we can understand why the “Shake It Off” singer wanted a break this year.”
“But as fun as it is to live vicariously through Tay and her squad’s epic holiday plans (seriously, where do we get a giant red, white and blue water slide?)”


"Tell us next!"
"Do you really want her to have one?"
"Hollywood actresses, what do you think of the reason why Taylor cancelled the party on July 4?"
"Believe us, guests like Gigi Hadid, Carly Klaus, Blake Lively, Ryan Reynolds and tye's old boyfriend Tom sidleston have enough scenes at her party to last you through the next year!"
"Now, Tay's fans can go back to her previous carnival on July 4."
"My God, can you imagine?"
"I hope tye will come back on July 4 next year, and Joe will appear next to her in a red, white and blue suit."
"Everyone has the right to calm down during the holidays and take their time, even our favorite celebrity!"
“…… We can understand why the singer who "got rid of it" wants to rest this year. "
"But through the epic vacation plans of Tay and her team (seriously, where can we get a huge red, white and blue water slide?) It's fun to replace life. "



Number  98
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Nothing is going to change on the fake report front when it comes to Kardashian and West, but this report can be ignored now that Gossip Cop has debunked it.”
“...to get away from West...”
“Kim Kardashian and Kanye West have seen their names mentioned in hundreds of rumors over the years and they aren’t slowing down.”
“Amid the backlash that West is receiving for making controversial comments, reports are coming out that their marriage could be coming to an end soon.”
“Most of those rumors also insinuate that Kardashian is planning to end the marriage.”
“According to a recent report from Grazia, Kardashian is planning to leave West and even has an “escape plan” to leave him.”
““Things between her and Kanye are at a breaking point.”
“The marriage has been under increasing pressure lately and she fears all the controversy Kanye is causing is reflecting negatively on her and her family.”
“There’s concern this marriage is on borrowed time.”
“Kim may come across as his long suffering wife but she has been ready to leave on a number of occasions and has had multiple exit strategies in place over the years Gossip Cop has since debunked the rumor that Kardashian has exit strategies and an escape plan in place...”


"When it comes to Kardashian and West, there will be no change in the false report, but this report can be ignored now because the gossip police have exposed it."
“… Leaving the West... "
"Over the years, the names of Kim Kardashian and Kanye West have been mentioned in hundreds of rumors, and they have not slowed down."
"At a time when West has been strongly opposed for making controversial remarks, there are reports that their marriage may soon be over."
"Most of these rumors also suggest that Kardashian is planning to end the marriage."
"According to a recent report by Grazia, Kardashian is planning to leave the west, and even has an escape plan to leave him."
"She and Kanye are at a turning point."
"Recently, the pressure of marriage is increasing. She worries that all the disputes caused by Kanye will have a negative impact on her and her family."
"There are concerns that the marriage was borrowed."
"Kim Jong Il may be regarded as his long suffering wife, but she is ready to leave many times. Over the years, she has many exit strategies. Gossip police later exposed the rumors that Kardashian has an exit strategy and an escape plan..."



Number  99
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Both seasons have a slower burn from everyday life and a desire for normalcy devolving into crazy-ass stuff, forcing heroism among our characters.”
“That's really what we're going with always for this series.”
“When I was watching it, I liked those scenes where you don't expect it.”
“He did get a really good kill scene, so that's pretty good.”
“He was the best!”
“I remember we were all with Winona, protesting to keep him on set and not have him get killed off.”
“He was hilarious.”
“"He was like a kid.”
“"We all loved him," adds Noah Schnapp, who worked closely with Astin, thanks to Bob's role as a hopeful father figure to Will.”
“I cried."”


"Both seasons have a slow burn, from everyday life and the desire for normality to crazy ass stuff, forcing our heroes."
"That's the real purpose of our series."
"When I watch it, I like the scenes you can't imagine."
"He did make a good killing scene, so it was good."
"He's the best!"
"I remember we were all with vinona, protesting that he should stay on set, not be killed."
"He's funny."
"He's like a child."
"We all love him," Noah Snape added, adding that he worked closely with Austin, thanks to Bob's role as will's hopeful father
"I cried."



**Something goes wrong**
“Please visit the source responsible for the item in question to report any concerns you may have regarding content or accuracy.”
“The news articles, Tweets, and blog posts do not represent IMDb's opinions nor can we guarantee that the reporting therein is completely factual.”
“This content is published for the entertainment of our users only.”
“Britney’s Boy Toy Boyfriend Seals The Deal With Set Of New Boobs!” blares a new RadarOnline […]IMDb.com, Inc. takes no responsibility for the content or accuracy of the above news articles, Tweets, or blog posts.”
““Boom Or Bust!”
“Gossip Cop looked into the situation, and we’ve exclusively learned the truth.”
“A new report claims Britney Spears ’s boyfriend Sam Asghari surprised her with the gift of a boob job, but the story is entirely fabricated.”


"Please visit the person in charge of the relevant project and report any concerns about content or accuracy."
"News articles, tweets and blog posts don't represent IMDB's opinions, and we can't guarantee that the reports in them are completely true."
"This content is published just to entertain our users."
Britney Spears' toy boyfriend has reached an agreement with a new set of breasts! "Blowing a new radar line ] IMDb.com , Inc. assumes no responsibility for the content or accuracy of the above news articles, tweets or blog posts. "
"Boom or bust!"
"Gossip, the police have investigated the situation and we have the exclusive knowledge of the truth."
A new report says Britney's boyfriend Sam asgali gave her a surprise because she got a breast augmentation gift, but the story is a complete fabrication



Number  101
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“You may be able to find more information about this and similar content at piano.io...”
“At the time, sources said police performed a welfare check on Mandy after being contacted by a family member.”
“News reports as a “complicated relationship” between the singer and her mom Mandy Teefey.”
“According to one source, the mother-daughter pair have endured “a lot of ups and downs” on top of an “entire year” of not speaking to each other after Mandy was let go of her managerial duties in 2014.”
“As the source explains, things got so bad Selena wasn’t even allowed to talk to her 4-year-old sister Gracie.”
“E!”
“News’ source says that Mandy had a “really hard time” making 13 Reasons Why happen after the firing because she was so “emotionally and professionally” affected.”
““It caused a major rift in their relationship but they eventually reconnected.” Flash forward to March 2017: the show is an instant hit on Netflix and at the premiere, mother and daughter happily pose for photos together on the red carpet.”
“Getty ImagesGetty ImagesEarlier this month, TMZ reported that Mandy was briefly hospitalized in Los Angeles after she having a “heated” conversation with Selena about her relationship with Justin.”
“According to E!”


"You can find more information about this and similar content at: piano.io..."
"At that time, it was reported that after contacting Mandy's family, the police conducted a welfare check on Mandy."
News reports say the singer has a "complex relationship" with her mother, Mandy Tiffany
"According to a source, the mother and daughter experienced" a lot of ups and downs "in addition to" a whole year "of silence after Mandy was removed from management in 2014
"As the source explained, things got so bad that Selena was not even allowed to talk to her 4-year-old sister, Gracie."
“E！”
News sources said it was "really hard" for mandy to name 13 reasons for what happened after the dismissal because she was affected "emotionally and professionally."
"It created a major rift in their relationship, but they finally reestablished the connection." Flash to March 2017: the play became a hit on Netflix. At the premiere, the mother and daughter happily took pictures on the red carpet
This month, TMZ reported that Mandy was briefly hospitalized in Los Angeles because she had a heated conversation with Selena about her relationship with Justin
"According to e!"



Number  102
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
““He wants to do a couture line with her and get her back to icon status.”Are vials of blood about to be back in fashion?”
““Angelina is the most beautiful woman in the world, and it kills Tomto see her in these depressing all-black ensembles and dowdy red carpet gowns,” says the source.”
“Now he’s ready to make the newly single actress his latest project.”
“Tom was the mastermind behind Gucci and Saint Laurent before launching his own line,and has gone on to direct two Oscar-nominated flicks, A Single Man and Nocturnal Animals.”
““With all the drama around her and Brad Pitt, Angelina feels like a huge outsider right now,and she knows Tom is the industry It Guy,” tattles a fashion insider.”
“Angelina Jolie is ready to get her groove back and is enlisting fashion guru Tom Ford to help!”
“...has lost her sparkle but can the fashion guru get her back on track...”
“Click to share on Twitter Opens in new window Click to share on Facebook Opens in new window Angelina Jolie Begs Tom Ford For Help Resurrecting Her Career Angelina Jolie Begs Tom Ford For Help Resurrecting Her Career Angelina Jolie Begs Tom Ford For Help Resurrecting Her Career The star...”


"He wants to build a fashion production line with her and let her return to the status of an idol." Will bottles of blood become popular again? "
"Angelina is the most beautiful woman in the world, and seeing her in these depressing all black suits and shabby red carpet dresses is killing Tom," the source said
"Now he's going to make this new single actress his latest work."
"Before launching his own series, Tom was behind Gucci and Saint Laurent and directed two Oscar nominated films, bachelor and night animals."
"There are all kinds of dramas between Angelina and Brad Pitt. She now feels like a huge outsider. She knows Tom is an it expert in the industry," a fashion insider said in a post
Angelina Jolie is ready to get back in shape. She's enlisting fashion guru Tom Ford for help
“… Lost her light, but can fashion masters get her back on track... "
"Click Share on twitter open in new window click Share on Facebook open in new window Angelina Jolie asks Tom Ford to help her recover her career Angelina Jolie asks Tom Ford to help her recover her career Angelina Jolie asks Tom Ford to help her recover her career Angelina Jolie asks Tom Ford to help her recover her career star..."



Number  103
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“So, it’s possible he may have already scored Barry’s endorsement, and that would be huge!”
“Oh, just a FYI – during the AFI event, former president Barack Obama, 55, sent in a pre-taped statement.”
“After his big night at the AFI Life Achievement Gala, we’ve EXCLUSIVELY heard George’s friends want him to make a run for the White House!”
“Is the world ready for President George Clooney?”
“After Donald Trump, anything seems possible (or a massive upgrade, TBH.)”
“The politically-minded George, 57, and his wife, human rights lawyer Amal Clooney, 40, were definitely looking like the First Couple of Hollywood during the AFI Life Achievement Gala.”
“Some would love to see these two move into 1700 Pennsylvania Avenue as a source EXCLUSIVELY tells HollywoodLife com that Hollywood friends the likes of Julia Roberts and many more were not only interested in honoring their friend at the...”
“AFI event but they also wanted to grab his ear to try to convince him to run for President They think he would be amazing as president the source tells HollywoodLife com...”
“With Amal as the first lady by his side and whomever he would choose as a Vice President it would be one of the most amazing things they could see him do The source says that if there were any...”
“...possibility to convince George to run it would have been at the AFI event as it was the night where everyone who respects him was honoring him for his work in the entertainment world The insider added that Candidate Clooney...”


"So it's possible that he's got Barry's support, it's going to be huge!"
"Oh, for reference only - during the AFI campaign, former President Barack Obama, 55, sent a pre recorded statement."
"After an important evening at AFI life achievement party, we heard exclusively that George's friends wanted him to run for the White House!"
"Is the world ready for President George Clooney?"
"After Donald Trump, everything seems to be possible (or massive upgrade, to be determined)."
"George, 57, a political minded man, and his wife, 40 year old human rights lawyer, Amal Clooney, look absolutely like the first couple in Hollywood at the AFI life achievement Gala."
"Some people would love to see these two people move into 1700 Pennsylvania Avenue because an exclusive source told Hollywood life that Hollywood friend Julia Roberts and more people are not only interested in To their friends. "
"AFI incident, but they also want to grab his ears and try to persuade him to run for president, they think he will be amazing president, the source told Hollywood Life website..."
"With Amar around as first lady, no matter who he chooses as vice president, it will be one of the most amazing things they can see him do," the source said, if there is any... "
“… The possibility of persuading George to take charge of the company should be in AFI's activities, because that night, everyone who respected him was paying homage to him for his work in the entertainment industry. The person familiar with the matter added that candidate Clooney



Number  104
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Allen, 80, criticised her for her looks and said she wasn’t pretty enough.””
““But, then, I was like, “I’m going to prove to this little dude that I can absolutely do this!”Stewart revealed.”
“He absolutely is regretting his decision’,” she recalled.”
““I thought, ‘He hates me!”
“Earlier, the 26-year-old actress worked with the filmmaker onCafe Society and initially thought he “regretted” casting her, so was determined to prove herself on set, reported Female First.”
“...how you carry on from that point she said...”
“It s enlightening and not in a technical way it s not like I go Ooh I saw my face do this and now I know how to cry onscreen It s more like if you can correlate the experience of making the movie to the final product it affects...”
““I’ve been wanting to make movies forever and I want to direct and write and keep acting forever, so it makes me better to watch the performance.”
“The 26-year-old Twilight star believes that it is good to look back at her performances on the big screen as it helps her to become a better actress in the future, reported Female First.”
“Earlier,Kristen Stewart said she watches her previous performances time and again to improve herself.”


"Ellen, 80, criticized her for not being beautiful enough."
"But then, I thought," I'm going to prove to this little guy that I can absolutely do it! "Stewart revealed."
"He absolutely regretted his decision," she recalled
"He hates me, I think!"
"Earlier, the 26 year old actress worked with filmmaker oncafe society. At first, he thought he" regretted "choosing her, so he was determined to prove himself on the set," femal first reported
“… What did you do from that point on, she said
"It's very enlightening. It's not technical. I didn't go there. I saw my face do it. Now I know how to cry on the screen. It's more like if you can connect the experience of making a movie with the final product it affects..."
"I always want to make movies forever, I want to direct and write forever, and continue to act, so watching shows makes me better."
"The 26 year old Twilight star thinks it's a good thing to review her performance on the big screen, because it helps her become a better actress in the future," women's first reported
"Earlier, Kristen Stewart said that in order to improve herself, she watched her previous performances over and over again."



Number  105
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Agenda Driven', 'Journalism', 'Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational', 'Wiki']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“...is with husband Justin...”
“The trip is going to be a blast claims the source who adds I imagine Brad and Jen will steal private moments to they can have some emotional heart to hearts Reps for both Brad and Jen have denied Star s story and Jen has long said how happy she...”
“The magazine claims that Jen has booked a $10,000 a night chalet featuring multiple fireplaces and hot tubs.”
“Jen thought it was genius.”
“‘He pointed out that they could even hit the slopes together, since no one would recognise them in their ski masks, goggles and helmets.”
“‘He said he could fly over in his private jet and meet up with her there.”
“‘When Jen mentioned that she was planning to go skiing with friends in Aspen after New Year’s, a light bulb went off in Brad’s head,’ claims Star’s source.”
“While she will be accompanied by close friends, it seems there is room for Brad.”
“‘Jen has been a real source of comfort and strength for Brad, and during their long talks, they realised just how strong their bond still is.’The publication goes on to claim that the duo have arranged to meet up on a skiing break.”
“‘They’ve been growing closer ever since Jen reached out to Brad after his split from Ange,’ a source told Star.”


“… With her husband Justin... "
"This trip will be an explosive source of information who added that I think Brad and Jane will steal private moments, they can have some emotional heart for Brad and Jane to represent the story of denying the star, and Jane has long said how happy she is..."
"Zhan ordered a $10000 cabin with multiple fireplaces and hot tubs," the magazine said
"Jane thinks it's a genius."
He pointed out that they could even go uphill together because no one would recognize them wearing ski masks, goggles and helmets
"He said he could take a private plane and meet her there."
"When Jennifer mentioned that she was going skiing with her friends in Aspen after the new year, a light bulb suddenly fell out of Brad's head," the Star source said
"Although she will be accompanied by close friends, it seems that Brad still has room."
"Jennifer is Brad's real source of comfort and strength, and in their long talk, they realize that their relationship is still strong." The magazine went on to say that the two arranged to meet during the ski break
A source told the star: "since Jennifer and Angie broke up, her relationship with Brad has become closer and closer."



Number  106
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“It’s deplorable that someone, for their own selfish reasons, leaked selective portions of the confidential and sealed court record to create an inaccurate and unfair picture of what is really happening.””
“He also has custody for four hours a day from July 8 to 14.”
“According to court documents obtained by Us, the Superior Court of Los Angeles County determined that “not having a relationship with their father” would be “harmful” to Maddox, 16, Pax, 14, Zahara, 13, Shiloh, 12, and twins Knox and Vivienne, 9.”
“The court said that the kids “are safe with their father” and that it is “critical that each of them have a healthy and strong relationship” with both of their parents.”
“However, Maddox is essentially free to go with either parent because of his age.”
“Jolie, 43, and Pitt, 54, were ordered to arrange a phone call between them, their children and two psychologists “to explain the summer schedule,” the documents state.”
“The Fight Club actor will have physical custody of the minor children (all but Maddox) for four hours a day from June 8 to 17 in London, where the Maleficent actress rents a house.”
“Pitt must spend time with each child at least twice during the 10-day period with one of the psychologists present.”
“Jolie will not be present during her estranged husband’s custodial time.”
“The Moneyball actor will have custody of the minor children for 10 hours each day from June 27 to July 1 with the other psychologist present.”


"It's a pity that some people, for their own selfish reasons, leaked part of the confidential and sealed court records in order to create an inaccurate and unfair truth."
"He has four hours of custody a day from July 8 to 14."
"According to the court documents we obtained, the Los Angeles County High Court found that 16-year-old Maddox, 14-year-old parks, 13-year-old Zahara, 12-year-old Shiloh and 9-year-old twins Knox and Vivian" had no relationship with their father. "
The court said the children "are safe with their father" and "the key is that each of them has a healthy and strong relationship with their parents."
"But because of his age, Maddox can basically go with either of his parents."
Julie, 43, and Pitt, 54, were asked to arrange a phone call between them, their children and two psychologists to explain the summer vacation arrangements, the document said
From June 8 to 17, the fight club actor will have actual custody of the underage children (except Maddox) for four hours in London, where the evil actress rents a house
"In 10 days, Pete has to be with each child at least twice, with a psychologist present."
"Julie will not be in the custody of her separated husband."
"From June 27 to July 1, in the presence of another psychologist, the moneyball actor will have 10 hours of custody a day."



Number  107
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Kanye has been dropping massive hints that he's going to run for the White House himself in 2024.”
“He’s actually out of the sunken place when he’s being himself which is very expressive," she tweeted.”
“The rapper shocked fans when he called Donald Trump his "brother" and said the "mob" can't make him "not love him".”
“Kim admirably defended her husband's "free thinking" tweets but admitted she doesn't agree with his opinion on Trump.”
“And as he quickly lost 9 million followers over the controversial tweets, she begged her husband to explain his position.”
“"My wife just called me and she wanted me to make this clear to everyone," Kanye tweeted.”
“"I don't agree with everything Trump does.”
“I don't agree 100% with anyone but myself."”
“(Image: Elle/Youtube) (Image: Getty)After putting in her emergency call, Kim took to Twitter to explain hKanye's actions.”
“"He’s a free thinker, is that not allowed in America?”


"Kanye has been suggesting that he will run for the white house himself in 2024."
"When he's himself, he's actually out of the sink, which is very expressive," she tweeted
The rapper called Donald Trump his "brother" and shocked fans by saying "thugs" can't make him "don't love him."
"Kim admirably defended her husband's" free thinking "tweet, but admitted that she did not agree with his view of trump."
"When he soon lost nine million fans because of these controversial microblogs, she begged her husband to explain his position."
"My wife just called me and she wanted me to tell you about it," Kanye said on Weibo
"I don't agree with what trump has done."
"I don't totally agree with anyone but myself."
"(image: Elle / YouTube) (image: Getty) after making an emergency call, Kim explained hkanye's behavior on twitter."
"He is a free thinker. Is that not allowed in America?"



Number  108
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
““So if he is thinking of getting back with Kourtney she wants none of it.”HollywoodLife.com has reached out to Younes Bendjima’s and Scott Disick’s reps for a comment.”
“...in 2015 haven t publicly taken a family vacay with the kids in Mexico since 2016”
“Is it her ex, Younes Bendjima?”
“Here’s another plot twist in Kourtney Kardashian’s love life.”
“The KUWTK star is allegedly pregnant after publicly being seen with “what appeared to be a bump” in L.A. on July 30, a new report by OK!”
“...magazine claims!”
““It was strange to see because she’s usually so perfectly svelte,” a source told the outlet, and a friend to Kourt added, “Everyone is whispering that she’s pregnant with her fourth child.” If Kourtney is supposedly pregnant, then who on Earth is the father to baby number four?”
“And by that, we mean, is it once again baby daddy Scott Disick, 35, or ex-boyfriend Younes Bendjima, 25?”
“Naturally, one would assume it’s the younger model, who to the world was Kourtney’s boyfriend up until recently.”
“But Kourtney’s anonymous friend makes a shocking claim — it’s more than likely Scott!”


"So if he wants to go back with Courtney, she doesn't want it at all." Hollywood life has contacted representatives of younes bendjima and Scott disc for comments. "
“…… In 2015, since 2016, I have never had a family holiday with my children in Mexico in public. "
"Is it her ex boyfriend yones benjima?"
"This is another turning point in Courtney Kardashian's love life."
According to the latest report of OK, the Kuyt star is said to be pregnant after taking a photo with look like a lump in Los Angeles on July 30
“… The magazine claims
"It's strange, because she's usually very slim," a source told the media, adding that a friend of curt's "everyone is whispering that she's pregnant with a fourth child." If Courtney is thought to be pregnant, who is the father of baby number four? "
"We mean, another 35 year old father, Scott Disick, or 25-year-old ex boyfriend, yones bengima?"
"Naturally, people think it's a young model, and until recently, she was Courtney's boyfriend."
But Courtney's anonymous friend came up with a shocking statement - probably Scott! "



Number  109
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Both [she and Nick] are winners, and I truly believe that."”
“She grew so much, and she's just such a beautiful person you can't help but be captivated by her.”
“Dancing With the Stars will return for its 22nd season with Len Goodman back where he belongs, Bindi Irwin as the reigning champ, and a baby boy or girl for Allison Holker.”
“There's much to look forward to, but not before we close out this season one last time with everything that happened after the finale!”
“(In case you missed it, you can read our recap of the best and worst moments here.)”
“Almost an hour after Tom Bergeron declared Bindi Irwin and Derek Hough the winners of season 21, Bindi was still in disbelief, shouting from the top of her lungs, "I think I'm going to scream for 20 minutes!"”
“Her exuberance and genuine nature endeared her to literally every one on set, but no one more so than Derek.”
“"It's just so special with Bindi," he told reporters backstage.”
“"She's a champion of life."”
“Bindi shared the same sentiment, telling those in the ballroom that she gained another brother in Derek.”


"She and Nick are winners, and I firmly believe that."
"She's so big, she's such a beautiful person, you can't help but be fascinated by her."
"Dancing with the stars" will return in season 22, Ron Goodman will return to where he belongs, bingdy Owen will become the defending champion, and Alison holk will have a boy or girl
"There's a lot to look forward to, but not before we finish the season for the last time, after the end of the season!"
"In case you miss it, you can read our summary of the best and worst moments here."
"Nearly an hour after Tom bergeran announced that bingdy Owen and Derek Hoff were the champions of season 21, bingdy still didn't believe it. She cried from the bottom of her heart," I think I'm going to scream for 20 minutes! "
She is lively and sincere. Everyone on the set likes her, but no one likes her more than Derek
"Bingdi is so special," he told reporters backstage
"She's the champion of life."
"Bingdy had the same idea. She told the people in the ballroom that she had got another brother from Derek."



Number  110
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“You can get new ones!” Stefani allegedly told fans during the show.”
“Who cares about your lawn chairs?”
““Just fill in anywhere you like!”
“Lisa Stricklin filed the lawsuit in federal court Friday, alleging that during the July 23, 2016, concert, the pop star encouraged fans sitting on the lawn section to move toward the reserved seating area to be closer to the stage.”
“A North Carolina Gwen Stefani fan is suing the No Doubt singer and concert promoter Live Nation after an accident at the PNC Music Pavilion left her with a broken leg.”
“Woman says she was injured when Stefani encouraged fans to rush to the front of Charlotte, North Carolina's PNC Pavilion.”


"You can buy a new one! "Stefani is said to have told fans on the show."
"Who cares about your lawn chair?"
"Fill in whatever you like!"
"Lisa Stricklin filed a lawsuit Friday in federal court, claiming that at the concert on July 23, 2016, the pop star encouraged fans sitting on the lawn to move closer to the reserved seat area to the stage."
"A fan in North Carolina is suing the unquestionable singer and concert promoter, living, for breaking her leg in an accident at PNC music hall."
The woman said she was injured when Stephanie encouraged fans to rush to the Charlotte Pavilion in PNC



Number  111
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“I think it’s more like “Jennifer is just living her life with her dogs and her girlfriends,” but whatever.”
“But I guess the tabloids love this familiar narrative: Jennifer dumped again for a younger woman, Jennifer betrayed, Jennifer humiliated.”
“Personally, I believe Emma and Justin are a thing, in spite of their vague denials.”
“They’re just spending too much time together for it to be a “just friends” situation.”
“What I’m not sure of?”
“Whether Jennifer Aniston really cares.”
“I already shared my concern that it feels like Jen is under-reacting to her split, possibly because… she and Justin might not even really be married?”
“I don’t know.”
“And she’s definitely not acting depressed about this split at all.”
“So do you think Jennifer is sitting in Bel Air, yelling at the pool (not the ocean) about Justin and Emma?”


"I think it's more like 'Jennifer just lives with her dog and girlfriend,' but anyway."
"But I guess the tabloids like the familiar saying: Jennifer was dumped for a young woman, she was betrayed, she was humiliated."
"Personally, although Emma and Justin vaguely deny this, I believe they are a couple."
"They just spend too much time together, not 'just friends.'
"What am I not sure about?"
"Whether or not Jennifer Aniston really cares."
"I've expressed my concern that Jane didn't react enough to her breakup, probably because She and Justin may not be really married yet? "
"I don't know."
"She's not at all upset about this breakup."
"So do you think Jennifer is sitting in Belle and yelling at the pool (not the sea) about Justin and Emma?"



Number  112
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“It would be interesting to see if things end up playing out that way in the end.”
“...have a baby too which obviously already happened...”
“Considering how close the Kardashian-Jenner sisters are with each other, it's no surprise that Kardashian knows her youngest sister well enough to predict something like this.”
“...also pointed out, being that the upcoming season — which will hopefully include Jenner's pregnancy and Stormi's birth — is Season 15, Kardashian's guess was almost 100 percent accurate.”
“And as E!”
“That just happened.'"”
“"And we all looked at each other and [were] like, 'Oh sh*t!”
“"We used to say, 'Season 17, Kylie has a baby,'" Kim said at the panel.”
“While talking about the long future they hope Keeping Up With The Kardashians has ahead they admitted that they joke about North West getting married in a future episode and that at one point they joked that Jenner would even...”
“Can she share everything else she thinks will happen over the course of KUWTK?”


"It'll be interesting to see if things end up going this way."
“… There is also a child who has obviously happened... "
"Considering how close the relationship between Kardashian and the Jenner sisters is, Kardashian knows her youngest sister very well, and it's not surprising that she can predict such a thing."
“…… At the same time, it pointed out that the upcoming 15th season may include Jenna's pregnancy and the birth of Tommy. Kardashian's guess is almost 100% accurate
"As e!"
"What just happened."
"We all looked at each other and said," Oh, Shh! "
"We used to say, 'season 17, Kelly has kids,'" Kim said at the conference
"When it comes to the long future, they want to keep up with the kardashians. They admit that they joked that northwest would get married in a future episode, and they joked that Jenna would even..."
"Can she share what she thinks will happen in the kutke process?"



Number  113
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Call me.”This post has been updated.”
“...community.”
“The Olympic gold medalist who has been an outspoken activist for transgender rights, told radio host John Catsimatidis that she is interested in the “the political side of activism” and “would look for a senatorial run.”“Can I do a better job from the outside?” said Jenner, a lifelong Republican.”
““Kind of working the perimeter of the political scene, being open to talking to anybody?”
“Or are you better from the inside, and we are in the process of determining that.”
“Yeah but I would look for a senatorial run When asked whether Jenner is seriously considering a run and if she would run as a Republican or an independent her publicist Alan Nierob told CNN Monday that there are no further details to report at this time This comes after...”
“...wrestling star and actor Dwayne The Rock Johnson said that he would consider running for president in 2020 musician Kid Rock insisting last week that his tweet about running for the Senate is no joke and in perhaps the most viral moment of celebrities exploring a run for office Kanye...”
“West declaring a 2020 presidential bid during his speech at the 2015 MTV Video Music Awards...”
“I have had a ton of emails and texts asking me if this website is real… https://t.co/RRVgISDFeq The answer is an absolute YES.”
“...pic.twitter.com/uYCUg6mjW1 — Kid Rock (@KidRock) July 12, 2017After meeting with then-President-elect Trump in December, West tweeted, “#2024,” causing fans to speculate whether he’s delaying a run for president and whether he is serious about running at all.”


"Call me." This post has been updated
"Community"
The outspoken Olympic gold medalist for transgender rights told radio presenter John katsim matidis that she was interested in "the politics of radicalism," would seek to run, "and" can I do better from the outside? Lifelong Republican Jenner said
"It's a bit like working on the political stage, opening up to anyone?"
"Or you look better from the bottom of your heart, and we're fixing that."
"Yes, but when asked if Jenner is seriously considering running, if she will run as a Republican or an independent, I will consider running for the Senate. Her spokesman, Alan nileb, told CNN on Monday that there are no more details to report at this time. This is after... "
“…… Wrestling star and actor Dwayne rock Johnson said he would consider running for president in 2020. Musician Kidd rock insisted last week that his comments on twitter about running for the Senate were no joke, and perhaps the most viral moment for celebrities to explore running for president, Kanye... "
"West announced running for president in 2020 in 2015 MTV Music Video Awards speech..."
"I've received a lot of emails and text messages asking me if this website is real https://t.co/RRVgISDFeq The answer is absolutely yes. "
“... pic.twitter.com/uYCUg6mjW1 -Kid Rock (@ kidrock) on July 12, 2017, after meeting with trump, the then president-elect, in December, West wrote on twitter that "#2024" caused fans to speculate whether he delayed running for president and whether he really wanted to run. "



Number  114
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“...pic.twitter.com/FNiQHOh1pI — Kensington Palace (@KensingtonRoyal) May 14, 2017”
“Image Credit: FameFlynetWe hope that everyone who attended yesterday’s Party at The Palace had a great day!”
“Apparently, the Duchess of Cambridge is still rather upset at her husband for humiliating her with his very public and embarrassing child-like behavior this year.”
“Kate Middleton has put her husband Prince William on a short leash ever since he was caught partying and drinking with topless models during a disastrous ski trip to Verbier, Switzerland earlier this year.”
“While Kate herself managed to go on an all-girls ski trip with her sister Pippa Middleton during that same time, there were no embarrassing videos of her dancing at a nightclub or drinking at bars released on social media.”
“The last thing Kate Middleton wants is to see her husband, the future King of England, party with models or dance like a fool for the world to see.”
“Even though she’s been trying to hide her frustrations with William by putting a smile on her face in public, their relationship behind closed doors is a different story.”
“The Duchess is hoping that with the right kind of counseling sessions, she can slowly but surely learn how to trust William again.”
“To make matters worse, the Duke and Duchess of Cambridge have been trying their best to show the world that their marriage is absolutely fine.”
“But, a lot of critics say that the harder they try to appear normal, they end up looking both insincere and staged.”


“... pic.twitter.com/FNiQHOh1pI -Kensington Palace (@ Kensington Royal) May 14, 2017 "
Photo source: we hope everyone who attended the palace party yesterday has a wonderful day
"It's clear that the Duchess of Cambridge is still quite upset about her husband's childish behavior, which publicly humiliates and embarrasses her this year."
Kate Middleton has been strict with her husband, Prince William, since she was found drinking with nude models on a disastrous ski trip to Verbier, Switzerland, earlier this year
"Although Kate herself managed to have an all girl skiing trip with her sister Pippa Middleton at the same time, there was no embarrassing video of her dancing in a nightclub or drinking in a bar on social media."
"The last thing Kate Middleton wants to see is her husband, the future king of England, partying with models, or dancing like a fool for the world to see."
"Although she has been trying to hide her dissatisfaction with William by smiling in public, their relationship is another matter."
"The Duchess hopes that with proper counseling, she can slowly but surely learn how to trust William again."
"To make matters worse, the Duchess of Cambridge have been trying their best to show the world that their marriage is absolutely wonderful."
"But many critics say that the more they try to behave normally, the less sincere and pretentious they are."



Number  115
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“According to CBS, it was the largest weekday protest the city has seen in 15 years.”
“This breach of royal protocol led to outrage on Twitter as people called out the president for his lack of awareness.”
“During the visit, Trump appeared to breach royal protocol by walking ahead of the Queen and awkwardly stopping in front of her.”
“The president was warned against making this particular faux pas last week by former royal butler Grant Harrold.”
“People on social media were outraged by Trump's lack of awareness.”
“You can't say he wasn't warned.”
“Last week, former royal butler Grant Harrold spoke to ITV News about all the ways Trump could offend the Queen on his controversial visit to the UK.”
“One piece of advice was to always let the Queen take the lead when walking around — but it would seem the tip fell on deaf ears.”
“In a truly cringe-worthy viral clip, President Trump is seen breaking etiquette by walking in front of the Queen and then blocking her off when he stops, forcing Her Majesty to manoeuvre around him.”
“Trump was visiting Queen Elizabeth II at Windsor Castle (where Meghan Markle and Prince Harry were married) and took afternoon tea with the royal after they inspected the Coldstream Guards.”


"According to CBS, this is the largest weekday protest in the city in 15 years."
"This violation of Royal etiquette caused outrage on twitter because people accused the president of lacking consciousness."
"During the visit, trump walked in front of the queen and stopped awkwardly in front of the queen, which seemed to violate Royal etiquette."
"Last week, grant Harold, the Royal Butler, warned the president not to make this particular mistake."
"People on social media are angry about Trump's lack of awareness."
"You can't say he wasn't warned."
"In an interview with ITV last week, grant Harrod, the former British Royal housekeeper, talked about all the ways in which trump might offend the queen during his controversial visit to the UK."
"One suggestion is to always let the queen take the lead when walking around - but it seems to go unheeded."
"In a really cringe worthy viral fragment, President trump is seen as disobedient, walking in front of the queen, then blocking the queen when he stops, forcing her majesty to maneuver around him."
"Trump was visiting Queen Elizabeth II at Windsor Castle (where Megan Marcel married Prince Harry) and having afternoon tea with the royal family after they visited the frigid guards."



Number  116
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“In addition, this also proves that everyone’s favorite sparkly vampire most definitely does not have a “type.””
“Lucky for Rob, his new gal pal also seems to shun the spotlight.”
“That is not a typo.”
“And, no, we did not mean to write Kristen Stewart all you Twilight superfans.”
“Rob and his new cutie chanteuse, whose real name is Tahliah Barnett, have been quietly dating for about a month, according to a report, with Rob doing what he does best and flying under the radar with this major coupling news.”
“The biggest sighting of the two together was walking around NYC and even then they were sure to keep a distance from one another.”
“Rob is a pro.”
“As everyone in the whole entire world knows, Rob was previously one half of Robsten with Miss Stewart, reigning as one of, if not the, most photographed and written about celebrity couples in the world for a few years, much to their mutual and very visible displeasure.”
“The two were the romantic leads in a giant movie franchise, traveling the world together and walking red carpets nonstop for roughly four years.”
“They even got a dog.”


"In addition, it also proves that there is definitely no 'type' of our favorite shining vampire."
"Rob is lucky that his new girlfriend seems to have dodged the spotlight as well."
"It wasn't a typo."
"And, no, we didn't mean to write about all your Twilight fans for Kristen Stewart."
"It's reported that rob and his new cute chantez (real name Talia Barnett) have been quietly dating for about a month, and rob has done what he's best at, which is a big news event that has attracted a lot of attention."
"The biggest time they've ever been together is a walk in New York, and even so, they're sure to keep their distance."
"Rob is a professional."
"People all over the world know that rob and miss Stewart used to be half of Robsten. In recent years, rob is one of the most photographed and written celebrity couples in the world, which makes them very dissatisfied and obvious."
"These two are romantic characters in a big movie series. They travel around the world together and walk on the red carpet for about four years."
"They even have dogs."



Number  117
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“For more details on Kylie’s wedding, pick up the latest issue of Life & Style, on newsstands now.”
“We can’t even imagine how he’ll react to news that she’s married!”
““She a superstar / She got it bad for me / If I hang up, she call right back to me / You cut her legs off / She crawls right back to me / I call it playboy tenacity,” he sings.”
“The rapper seemingly disses the reality star in his new song “Playboy”, alluding to the fact that she’s super clingy.”
“He’s trying to play it cool, but it’s obvious that he’s really into her and he really spoils her, which she loves, obviously.”But Kylie’s ex, Tyga, appears to be having a hard time accepting the duo’s relationship.”
““They literally can’t keep their hands off each other when they are together — they’re always kissing and holding hands.”The source continued, “She thinks he’s so hot and he thinks she’s the sexiest girl out there.”
““They’re really sweet together and you can see they really dig each other,” a source previously told Hollywood Life.”
“The brunette beauty and her rapper beau have been glued to each other’s sides since they began dating just a couple of months ago.”
“EXCLUSIVE: Kylie Jenner Showers Travis Scott With Gifts, Loves Being His Sugar Mama“The reason Kylie didn’t tell Kris or most of her family about the wedding was because she knew they’d all panic and react negatively,” the insider adds.”
“Kylie feels like she’s grown, and this is her way of breaking off from the family — especially from [momager] Kris,” the insider explains.”


"For more details about Kelly's wedding, please read the latest issue of life and fashion at the newsstand
"We can't even imagine his reaction to the news of her marriage!"
He sang, "she's a superstar / she's very bad to me / if I hang up, she'll call me right back / you cut off her leg / she'll climb back to me right away / I call it playboy."
The rapper seems to belittle the reality TV star in his new song playboy, implying that she is super clingy
"He wanted to be cool, but obviously he really liked her, he really spoiled her, obviously she loved her." But Kelly's ex boyfriend, TEGA, seems to have a hard time accepting the relationship
"When they're together, they really can't take their hands off each other - they always kiss and hold hands." The source went on, "she thinks he's sexy, he thinks she's the sexiest girl."
"They're really sweet together, and you can see they're really sarcastic," one source told Hollywood Life earlier
"The brunette and her rapper boyfriend have been sticking together since they started dating a few months ago."
"Exclusive: Kelly Jenner gives Travis Scott gifts and loves to be his sweet mother." Kelly didn't tell Chris or most of her family about the wedding because she knew they would panic and react negatively
"Kelly feels like she's grown up, and that's her way out of the family, especially [mom] Chris," the person familiar with the matter explained



Number  118
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
““Nicole tried to put a ban...”
“He’s been staying at a five-star hotel in La.” The source adds that the main cause of their arguments is Keith’s growing friendship with John Mayer , which may be surprising to fans.”
“Now, an insider tells Life & Style , “Keith has moved out of the family home he shares with Nicole after a string of arguments.”
“Reports as early as May 2017 cite their marriage as being on the rocks — a sentiment that only continued to escalatewell into the new year.”
“Tensions between the two have been building for quite some time.”
“While it's common for long-term couples to work things out, in the case of Keith and Nicole, sadly, things seem to be beyond repair.”
“With the news of Nicole Kidman and Keith Urban heading for splitsville — after 12 years of marriage — love in Hollywood is officially dead.”
“Another one bites the dust!”


"Nicole tried to ban..."
"He's been staying in a five-star hotel in Los Angeles." The source added that the main reason for their quarrel was Keith's growing friendship with John Mayer, which may surprise fans
"Now, an insider told life and fashion magazine," Keith moved out of the house he shared with Nicole after a series of quarrels
"As early as may 2017, it was reported that their marriage was on the rocks - a sentiment that lasted until the new year."
"The tension between the two has been going on for quite some time."
"Although it's common for long-term couples to solve problems, it's sad that Keith and Nicole's situation seems irreparable."
"With the news that Nicole Kidman and Keith Urban are going to split sville after 12 years of marriage, Hollywood's love affair is officially over."
"Another bit of dust!"



Number  119
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“"... She can tell me to f*** off all she wants.”
“You jumped that ship as soon as you did Diane Sawyer and attacked my mum', and instead, [she] tells me to 'get a life' and 'shut up' and I'm like, 'you shut up and you get a f***ing life.”
“I mean, just f*** you, Bruce."”
“"I honestly wish I never met this man.”
“"He can go f*** himself," she cries down the phone to a deadpan Kim.”
“October 2015: Season 10 of Keeping up with the Kardashians shows Kris' reaction to the Vanity Fair interview and she is, shall we say, more explicit with her wording.”
“Let's focus on the actual cause here and not drag my mum through the mud."”
“In our opinion you don't even need to mention my mum.”
“Caitlyn tells Khloe sent her "tough" text messages, to which Khloe responds: "I said we don't care what you're doing... we want to be there and support you but we don't think that entails you speaking negatively about my mum.”
“...show, I Am Cait, Khloe is seen visiting Caitlyn where she takes issue with her comments about Kris.”


"... she can tell me what she wants to do."
"As soon as you killed Diane Sawyer, you jumped out of the boat and attacked my mother." instead, (she) told me to "live" and "shut up." I said, "shut up and you'll live."
"I mean, it's just you, Bruce."
"I wish I had never met this man."
"He can go on his own," she called to the expressionless Kim on the phone
"October 2015: Season 10" follow the kardashians "shows Chris's reaction to the vanity fair interview, and we can say that her wording is more explicit."
"Let's focus on the practical reasons and don't drag my mother down."
"In our opinion, you don't even have to mention my mother."
Caitlin told Chloe to send her a "tough" text message, and Chloe responded, "I said we don't care what you're doing... We want to be there to support you, but we don't think that means you have to say negative things to my mom. "
“… Show, I'm Kate, Chloe was seen interviewing Caitlin and she commented on her Chris questions



Number  120
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“#Irma2017 @IMKristenBell...”
“While many were able to make it out of Miami, thousands of others have been misplaced.”
“Last night, "Extra's" AJ Calloway caught up with Rihanna, who expressed sadness over Hurricane Irma.”
“She said, "My family is safe, Barbados is very safe right now.”
“It breaks my heart to see what is happening in the rest of the Caribbean, my neighboring islands.”
“You feel helpless when it's a natural disaster.”
“You have no control and these are islands that I have been to and love… it's so sad.”While attending a show at New York Fashion Week, Heidi Klum told “Extra” on Thursday, "It is horrible what is happening.”
“I hope that everyone will be safe.”
“People are evacuating.”
“I have some friends in Miami, I know that they are leaving right now… it's devastating.”Earlier this week, Emmy Rossum said at a PaleyFest TV Preview event, “It's upsetting, especially coming on the heels of Harvey.”


“# Irma2017@IMKristenBell …”
"While a lot of people were able to leave Miami, thousands were misplaced."
"Last night," special police "AJ Calloway caught up with Rihanna, and she expressed her sorrow for hurricane IRMA."
"My family is safe, Barbados is safe now," she said
"I'm sad to see what's happening in the rest of the Caribbean, my neighboring islands."
"When there is a natural disaster, you feel helpless."
"You can't control it. These are the islands I've been to and loved It's pathetic. " Heidi Klum told extra on Thursday at a show at New York Fashion week that "what happened was terrible."
"I hope everyone is safe."
"People are evacuating."
"I have some friends in Miami and I know they're leaving now It's devastating. " "It's very sad, especially after Harvey," Amy Rosen said earlier this week at a Paley Fest TV preview



Number  121
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“This latest claim is yet to be verified, and if there is tension between the trio, the stars will likely keep their personal matters out of the prestigious event on Sunday.”
“The three will all attend the Oscars and the women are said to have discussed boundaries for the occasion that could result in a “showdown” between Jen and Angelina.”
“The claims have only intensified ever since Jennifer Aniston and her husband of two years, actor Justin Theroux, called it quits recently.”
“While Brad Pitt and Angelina Jolie continue to work their way through a very challenging time, involving their own divorce and custody battle over their six children, the pair has been constantly linked to various rumored new loves.”
“Despite Pitt having been falsely linked to a list of beauties, Jennifer Aniston has remained the most frequent female celeb to be rumored as spending time with the heartthrob.”
“Now the focus is on how Angelina Jolie is reacting to the rumored reconciliation between Pitt and his former wife, Aniston.”
“Reports swirl that Angelina and Jen are gearing up for a showdown over the Allied star and that Pitt is “freaking out” over the drama that his and Aniston’s supposed closeness has resulted in.”
“New Idea shares alleged details relayed by a source on the lengthy love triangle between the three.”
“The insider relays that Jen and Angelina have already spoken about the big night that will see the trio in the same room, along with anyone who’s anyone in Hollywood and film.”
““Word is Jen and Angie had a major discussion about the Oscars.”


"This latest statement has yet to be confirmed. If the relationship between the three people is tense, the stars are likely to exclude their private affairs from the grand event on Sunday."
"All three will attend the Oscars, and it is said that the two women discussed the boundaries of the occasion, which could lead to a 'showdown' between Jennifer and Angelina."
"It's only after Jennifer Aniston and her husband, actor Justin serrux, who have been married for two years, recently announced that they are breaking up," he said
"Although Brad Pitt and Angelina Jolie continue to struggle through a very challenging period, including their own divorce and custody dispute of six children, they have been associated with all kinds of rumored new lovers."
"Although Pitt has been wrongly associated with a series of beautiful women, Jennifer Aniston is still the most widely rumored female celebrity to spend time with her sweetheart."
"The focus now is Angelina Jolie's reaction to the rumored reconciliation between Pitt and his ex-wife Aniston."
It has been reported that Angelina and Jennifer are preparing for a showdown on allied star, while Pete is "Crazy" about the drama caused by his so-called intimate relationship with Aniston
"Newidea shared the details of what a source said was a long love triangle between the three."
"According to people familiar with the matter, Jennifer and Angelina have talked about the big night of seeing three people in the same room, as well as anyone in Hollywood and the film industry."
"I heard that Jane and Angie had a big discussion about Oscar."



Number  122
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“"I swear, I got very lucky, man."”
“News of the 42-year-old actor and venture capitalist.”
“"I have the world's greatest husband," the Four Good Days actress gushed to E!”
“More than seven years and one failed friends-with-benefits pact later Kunis, 36, is thankful for the curveball.”
“But several years down the road, after keeping in sporadic touch thanks to AOL Instant Messenger, there was a surprise plot twist.”
“And she certainly never dreamed her real life first kiss with the man she thought of as "the Calvin Klein model" was actually her first with her future husband.”
“While playing somewhat hapless lovers Jackie Burkhart and Michael Kelso on That '70s Show in the late '90s, 14-year-old Kunis could not have been less interested in her 19-year-old costar.”
“Their first few chapters were admittedly rocky.”
“Because while it's true their marriage is just hitting the five-year mark today, their love story is some two decades in.”
“In actuality, it's unlikely that their bliss is related to the newness of their marriage.”


"I swear, I'm lucky, man."
"News about the 42 year old actor and venture capitalist."
"I have the greatest husband in the world," the actress of four good days gushed
"More than seven years later, a failed friend with welfare pact, and then 36 year old Kunis, thanks to curveball."
"But a few years later, with the help of AOL Instant Messenger, there was a surprising turn in the plot after maintaining sporadic contact."
"Of course, she never dreamed that her first kiss in real life with the man she thought was Calvin Klein's model was actually her first kiss with her future husband."
"Kunis, 14, played some unfortunate couples Jackie Burkhart and Michael Kelso in the 1970s show in the late 1990s, but she was not interested in her 19-year-old partner at all."
"Their first chapters were really tough."
"Because although their marriage has just reached the goal of five years today, their love story has passed about 20 years."
"In fact, their happiness is unlikely to be related to the freshness of their marriage."



Number  123
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“– Kristen Stewart, via @glamourmag #AskHerMore #Cannes2018 pic.twitter.com/OCnhzggoTk — Miss Representation (@RepresentPledge) May 14, 2018Not to mention all the wonderful photos of Stewart and Cate Blanchett that people are dying over.”
“Kristen Stewart taking her heels off at Cannes is a m o o d pic.twitter.com/w4yRt2pqoS — Jade Budowski (@jadebudowski) May 14, 2018"If you’re not asking guys to wear heels and a dress, then you can’t ask me either."”
“Many people love Stewart’s move — and how could they not?”
“Does he have to wear heels?” It can work both ways.’That same year, Julia Roberts also went barefoot.”
“You cannot come in.” Then [I’m going to say], “Neither is my friend.”
“‘It has become really obvious that if [a man and I] were walking the red carpet together and someone stopped me and said, “Excuse me, young lady, you’re not wearing heels.”
“She told Vanity Fair in 2016: ‘Things have to change immediately.”
“‘Things need to change’Stewart has talked about Cannes’ antiquated rules before.”
“But when Stewart decided it was time for the shows to come off, that’s exactly what she did.”
“It’s no joke — women were turned away from a screening of Carol in 2015 because their shoes’ heels weren’t tall enough.”


– Kristen Stewart, through @ glamourmag # askhermore # cannes2018 pic.twitter.com/OCnhzggoTk -Miss representative (@ representantprevent) May 14, 2018, not to mention all the wonderful photos of people dying of Stewart and Kate Blanchett. "
"It's great that Kristen Stewart took off his high heels in Cannes pic.twitter.com/w4yRt2pqoS -Jade budowski (@ jadebudowski) May 14, 2018 "if you don't ask men to wear high heels and skirts, then you can't ask me either."
"A lot of people like Stewart's behavior - why don't they?"
"Does he have to wear high heels? "It can run in both directions." That same year, Julia Roberts went barefoot
"You can't come in." So (I'll say), "my friends can't come in either."
"Obviously, if (a man and I) walk on the red carpet together and someone stops me and says, 'I'm sorry, miss, you're not wearing high heels.'"
"She told Vanity Fair in 2016:" things have to change right now. "
"Things need to change" Stewart has talked about Cannes' outdated rules before
"But that's what Stewart did when she decided it was time for the show to end."
"It's no joke - in 2015, women were excluded from the screening of Carol because the heels of their shoes were not high enough."



Number  124
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“And both knowing that the reality of that was a big thing, something that was going to take a lot of serious consideration."”
“And it took until, really, the end of the shoot for us, I think, to realize that it might mean something more than we’d earlier allowed ourselves to believe.”
“We just became kind of a pair.”
“...lot of real teamwork...”
“Whether it was shooting a scene or arguing about a scene or gun practice or dance class or doing stunts anything we had to do with each other we just found a lot of joy in it together and a...”
“I think a few months in I realized, 'God, I can’t wait to get to work.'”
“...partnership that kind of just suddenly happened...”
“Angelina later described falling for Brad while filming the movie during an interview with Vogue Because of the film we ended up being brought together to do all these crazy things and I think we found this strange friendship and...”
“May 2004Brad Pitt and Angelina Jolie meet on the set of Mr. and Mrs. Smith, and sparks fly/explode all over the place—specifically, all over Brad's marriage.”


nan


Empty follow up sentence
“No one is entitled to her body, and she can cover it up should she want to.”
“Also, just because Rihanna wore an outfit that covered her midsection doesn't automatically confirm a pregnancy.”
“However, calling a woman pregnant — or assuming she is because of some kooky signs or because she's covering up her stomach — is body shaming.”
“There's obviously nothing wrong with being pregnant, and if Rihanna truly is carrying a baby, then that's great!”
“...you wouldnt go up to a heavier set woman and ask when shes due bc it’s disrespectful, so why do it to Rih knowing her weight is already an insecurity of hers?”
“...theres nothing wrong with Rihanna being pregnant, but its kind of rude to assume it bc shes gained some weight.”
“All the pregnancy accusations are just as bad as fat shaming, FYI.”


"No one has the right to have her body, and she can cover it up if she wants to."
"And just because Rihanna is wearing a suit that covers her abdomen doesn't automatically confirm that she's pregnant."
"However, calling a woman pregnant - or assuming she's pregnant because of some strange sign, or because she's covering her stomach - is a physical shame."
"There's nothing wrong with pregnancy. If Rihanna really holds the baby, that's great!"
“…… You don't walk up to a woman with a heavier figure and ask when she was born, which is disrespectful. So why should you know that her weight is already a kind of insecurity for her? "
“…… There's nothing wrong with Rihanna being pregnant, but if she gains weight, it's a bit rude
"All the accusations of pregnancy are as bad as the stigma of obesity, just for reference."



Number  126
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
““She is in love with her puppy.”For more on your favorite celebrities, pick up the new issue of Life & Style on stands now!”
““He thinks Selena won’t be able to take care of Charlie as well as he will because of her schedule,” the source says, adding that Selena isn’t listening — and she won’t give up Charlie without a fight.”
“But now that she’s feeling better, Sel is getting back to work on an untitled project with controversial filmmaker Woody Allen and that’s why Abel thinks he should be the one to have custody of Charlie.”
“Selena got Charlie just days after she announced that she had spent the summer recovering from a kidney transplant as a result of her battle with lupus, so it seems like Charlie helped her get through that health scare.”
“But it seems like Abel has grown attached to Charlie too, and he shared photos of the adorable dog on his Instagram story before their split.”
“It also seemed like they shared custody of the pup even though Selena is the only one who had been spotted with Charlie in public.”
“(Photo Credit: Getty Images)Back in September — just one month before their split — Selena, 25, and Abel, 27, were spotted together at an NYC pet shop and they seemed to have picked out the puppy together.”
“...s determined to keep it Selena Gomez gave her dog Charlie a kiss while on set of her untitled film project...”
“Sources exclusively reveal to Life Style that Sel thinks she should keep their Cavalier King Charles Spaniel pup Charlie and so does Abel Selena is angry says the source because she feels like it was more of a gift from Abel to her than a mutually adopted pet so she...”
“It’s been almost two months since she split from her ex-boyfriend The Weeknd (real name: Abel Tesfaye) and even though they’ve both moved on, there’s one major thing that the former couple is still fighting about — the dog that they adopted while they were still together!”


"She's in love with her little dog." To learn more about your favorite celebrities, come to the stands and see the new issue of life and fashion
"He doesn't think Serena can take care of Charlie as he does because of her schedule," the source said, adding that Serena won't listen - she won't give up on Charlie without a fight
"But now that she's feeling better, Searle is back on an untitled project with controversial filmmaker Woody Allen, which is why Abel thinks he should have custody of Charlie."
"Serena got Charlie the day after she announced that she had a kidney transplant to fight lupus, so it looks like Charlie helped her through the health scare."
"But it seems that Abel also has feelings for Charlie. Before he broke up, he shared a picture of this lovely dog on instagram."
"Although Selena is the only one found with Charlie in public, they seem to share custody of the dog."
(photo source: Getty Images) as early as September, a month before their breakup, Serena, 25, and Abel, 27, were found together in a New York pet store. It seems that they were picking puppies together. "
“… She's determined to keep it Selena Gomez gives her dog Charlie a kiss while in the setting of her untitled movie project
"Exclusive sources revealed that life style, Searle thought that she should keep their Knights Charles King Hound Puppies Charlie and Abel Selena were angry sources said, because she felt that this was a gift more from Abel than a shared pet, so she..."
"It's almost two months since she and her ex boyfriend (real name: Abel tesfaye) broke up this week. Although both of them have moved, there's one big thing that they were still arguing about - the dog they adopted when they were still together!"



Number  127
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“With reporting by Brody Brown...”
““I look at the way she she loves Stormi and takes care of her.”
““It’s like nursery school — there are so many babies!” Kris Jenner, 62, tells Us Weekly exclusively in the new issue.”
“The momager was of course referring to her nine grandchildren.”
“The Kardashian-Jenner crew grew quite a bit in last few months.”
“Kim Kardashian welcomed her third child — a daughter named Chicago — on January 15.”
“Then Kylie Jenner and Khloe Kardashian became first-time moms (They have daughters Stormi, 5 months, and True, 3 months, respectively.)”
“Kris marvels at how Kylie has adjusted to parenthood.”
““Kylie is more calm than I was,” she tells Us.”
“She doesn’t go anywhere without her.” The businesswoman is equally in awe of Khloe — through she never doubted the Good American denim cofounder’s mothering skills.”


"Brody Brown's report..."
"I look at her, and I look after her."
"It's like kindergarten - too many children! "Chris Jenner, 62, told us exclusively in the new issue of the magazine."
"Mom means her nine grandchildren, of course."
"Kardashian Jenner's team has grown a lot in the past few months."
"On January 15, Kim Kardashian welcomed her third child, a daughter named Chicago."
Later, Kelly Jenner and Carol Kardashian became the first mothers (they have 5-month-old daughter Tommy and 3-month-old daughter truer, respectively)
"Chris was surprised at how Kelly adapted to parenting."
"Kelly is much calmer than I am," she told us
"She can't go anywhere without her." The businesswoman was also in awe of Khloe because she never doubted the parenting skills of the great American cowboy co-founder



**Something goes wrong**
““Kris Jenner has assured her girls that everything will be OK. Whatever happens, the family will be there to support them.”For more on this, pick up the latest issue of In Touch — and for more exclusive content sign up for our newsletter!”
““Instead, their love lives are all in tatters.” But don’t worry, mama Kris will be there for her girls.”
““The arrival of three babies should be an exciting time for the sisters,” said the Kardashian insider.”
“From lack of commitment and disinterest to selfish behavior and different priorities, all three sisters are struggling to accept the truth, multiple insiders told In Touch exclusively.”
“3 this winter via surrogate.”
“Meanwhile, Khloé, 33, is pregnant with her first child with her boyfriend, NBA player Tristan Thompson, 26, while Kim, 37, and husband Kanye West, 40, are expecting baby No.”
“Kylie, 20, — who is about five months along and recently sported her baby bump on Snapchat — is expecting with boyfriend Travis Scott.”
“Sisters Kylie Jenner, Khloé Kardashian, and Kim are all preggo — and are all having baby daddy drama, too.”
“She shared a picture of her mom sporting blonde hair and wrote, “Caption this… Mine is [single white female].”It’s no wonder Kris and Corey headed to Splitsville, after all, the Kardashian/Jenner matriarch certainly has her hands full — she’s reportedly expecting three grandbabies in early 2018.”
“Kim Kardashian has since confirmed her mother’s breakup on Instagram.”


"Chris Jenner assured her daughters that everything would be all right. No matter what happens, the family will support them. "For more information, please click on the latest issue of contact - for more exclusive content, please log in to our newsletters!"
"On the contrary, their love life is ruined." But don't worry, mother Chris will be with her daughters. "
"The arrival of the three babies should be an exciting time for the sisters," Kardashian insiders said
"From a lack of commitment and interest to selfish behavior and different priorities, the three sisters are trying to accept the truth, a number of insiders told us."
"Through surrogacy this winter."
"Meanwhile, heloe, 33, is pregnant with her first child with her boyfriend, NBA player Tristan Thompson, 26, and Kim, 37, and her husband, Kanye West, 40."
"Kelly, 20, five months old, recently played with her little bump on snapchat and is looking forward to her boyfriend Travis Scott."
"Kelly Jenner, Carol Kardashian and the Kim sisters are pregnant, and they're all playing dad."
She shared a picture of her mother with blonde hair and wrote, "this My name is (single white female) No wonder Chris and Corey are going to springsville. After all, Kardashian / Jenner's female parent must be very busy - she is reported to have three granddaughters in early 2018. "
"After that, Kim Kardashian confirmed her mother's breakup on instagram."



Number  129
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Now errybody keep your eyes on Sel's ring finger in case they get hitched in secret.”
““All she cares about is her love for Justin and their future.”We are absolutely DYING over this news.”
““Selena’s [plan] was always to marry in her mid-20s,” one insider reveals to the mag.”
““She wants a white dress, thousands of colourful roses and her very best friends for bridesmaids," they said which very well could be referring to Taylor Swift!”
“"She wants a wedding — the bigger, the better,” the insider says.”
“The source adds that while Justin is happy to just elope, Sel wants something a bit more lavish to celebrate their love.”
“She doesn’t want to waste another precious second."”
“An insider told Life & Style magazine that “they’re making plans to get married and start a family as soon as possible.”“Selena’s health scare has given her more reason to live than ever.”
“God.”
“My.”


"Now the wrong people put your eyes on Searle's ring finger in case they get married secretly."
"She only cares about her love for Justin and their future." We will definitely die for the news
"Selena's [plan] always gets married in her 20s," a person familiar with the matter told the magazine
"She wants a white dress, thousands of colorful roses and her best friend as a bridesmaid," they said, probably referring to Taylor Swift! "
"She wants a wedding - the bigger the better," the person familiar with the matter said
"The source added that while Justin was happy to elope like this, Searle wanted something more luxurious to celebrate their love."
"She didn't want to waste another precious second."
"They are making plans to get married as soon as possible," a person familiar with the matter told life and fashion magazine "Serena's health scare gives her more reasons to live than ever before."
"God."
"Mine."



Number  130
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“ Thank you also to my friends, family and my very large team for all your support and Love!””
““I am deeply grateful to all those in Malawi who helped make this possible, and I ask the media please to respect our privacy during this transitional time.”
“Madonna was hit with a series of “uncomfortable questions” by a judge before she was granted permission to adopt her 4-year-old twin girls from Malawi, the presiding judge said in court documents obtained by The Associated Press on Wednesday, February 8.”
““The petitioner is a professional performer and I guarded myself against the danger of her merely reciting a well-rehearsed speech by asking her some rather uncomfortable questions to which she gave very candid answers,” Judge Fiona Mwale said in her ruling, explaining her reasons for approving the adoption.”
“After pressing Madonna, 58, to explain her intentions in adding two more little ones to her brood of four, Judge Mwale said she was satisfied that the girls would be in good hands with the Material Girl.”
“There is no doubt that the petitioner can offer the infants not only the best education money can buy but also guidance with a high likelihood of ensuring that the two infants grow to be self sufficient adults Judge Mwale said adding that she is satisfied that Madonna is motivated...”
“...by her desire to offer a home love protection and guidance to the infants In the court documents Judge Mwale addressed prior controversies surrounding Madonna s adoptions in Malawi...”
““In determining her motives, I questioned the petitioner at length about the impact of her decision which could be construed as robbing Malawi of its most precious resource, its children,” the judge wrote.”
“As previously reported, Madonna filed for adoption in High Court in Malawi on January 25 but tried to keep the process under wraps until a final decision was made.”
“The Queen of Pop issued a statement denying her adoption to Us Weekly that same day claiming that she was in Malawi to check on the children s hospital in Blantyre According to the AP she has already raised 7 5 million for a pediatric surgery ward at Queen Elizabeth...”


"I also thank my friends, family and my huge team for their support and love!"
"I am very grateful to all those in Malawi who have helped to achieve this goal, and I ask the media to respect our privacy during this transitional period."
Madonna was asked a series of "disturbing questions" before she was allowed to adopt her 4-year-old twin Malawian daughters, the trial judge said in court documents obtained by the associated press on Wednesday, February 8
"The petitioner is a professional performer, I protect her from her own danger, she just recited a well rehearsed speech, asked her some very uncomfortable questions, and she gave a very frank answer," judge Fiona mwale explained her reasons for adoption in her ruling.
"After putting pressure on Madonna, 58, to explain her intention to add two more of her four children, judge mwaller said she was satisfied that the girls would be taken good care of by the material girl."
"There is no doubt that petitioners can not only provide the best education that money can buy for babies, but also provide guidance to ensure that the two babies grow up to be self-sufficient adults. Judge MWAL added that she was satisfied with Madonna's enthusiasm... "
“…… Judge MWAL hopes to provide protection and guidance for the baby's family love in court documents, thus resolving the previous dispute over Madonna's adoption in Malawi... "
"In determining her motives, I asked the petitioner in detail the impact of her decision, which may be interpreted as depriving Malawi of its most valuable resource, namely children," the judge wrote
"As mentioned earlier, Madonna filed an application for adoption with the high court of Malawi on January 25, but Madonna tried to keep the adoption process secret until a final decision was made."
"Queen Pope issued a statement to us weekly on the same day, denying her adoption, claiming that she was inspecting Blantyre children's Hospital in Malawi. According to the associated press, she has raised 7.5 million yuan for the pediatric operation ward of Queen Elizabeth Hospital..."



Number  131
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Kylie hadn't even started seeing her baby daddy-to-be, Travis Scott until April ... which is around the time we know she got pregnant.”
“You see what looks like a bump ... thing is ... we did some digging and it was apparently shot at a Golden Globes party they attended 11 months ago.”
“There's this new clip that's been making the rounds showing Kylie and Kendall in their silver and orange dresses.”
“Play video content EXCLUSIVEA video that's surfaced online showing what looks like a very pregnant Kylie Jenner has got to be a fake, 'cause it's from January ... long before she got pregnant.”


"It wasn't until April that Kelly began to see her father to be, Travis Scott... Just when we knew she was pregnant. "
"What do you look like a lump... The thing is... We did some digging, apparently at the Golden Globes party they attended 11 months ago
"There's a new clip that shows Kelly and Kendall in their silver and orange dress rounds."
"Play the video content exclusive video. A video on the Internet shows that Kelly Jenner, who looks very pregnant, must be fake, because it started in January... Long before she got pregnant. "



**Something goes wrong**
“Anything is possible, right?”
“Could Kanye persuade her to change her mind?”
““Right now, she has no intention of leaving [Tristan] at all,” a source told us.”
“From what we’ve recently learned — EXCLUSIVELY — Khloe won’t be dumping Tristan, so Kanye may want to pump the breaks on cheerleading for Khloe to take Lamar back.”
“Poor Khloe — our hearts ache for her and her newborn daughter.”
“Maybe then, she wouldn’t have had to experience the heartbreak Tristan recently put her through.”
“Hmm… If you ask us, he’s definitely making it clear that he wishes Khloe had given Lamar another chance.”
“Kanye raving over Khloe’s ex-husband just days after the world discovered Tristan had allegedly cheated on his then-pregnant girlfriend?”
“Kanye didn’t mention Tristan nor how he allegedly cheated on Khloe, but the timing of this tweet couldn’t be more suspicious.”
“Twitter this past week...”


"Everything is possible, isn't it?"
"Can Kanye persuade her to change her mind?"
"Now, she's not going to leave (Tristan)," a source told us
"As far as we know recently - exclusive - Khloe won't abandon Tristan, so Kanye may want to increase the rest time on the cheerleading team and let Khloe take Lamar back."
"Poor Khloe - we feel sorry for her and her newborn daughter."
"Maybe that way, she won't have to go through the sad things that Tristan recently let her go through."
"Well If you ask us, he must be very clear. He wants Khloe to give Lamar another chance. "
Just a few days after the world discovered that Tristan was suspected of cheating on his then pregnant girlfriend, Kanye was still yelling for Chloe's ex husband? "
"Kanye didn't mention Tristan, or how he cheated Khloe, but the timing of this tweet can't be more suspicious."
"Twitter last week..."



Number  133
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“1 celebrity crush.”For more exclusive celebrity news, pick up the latest issue of In Touch, on newsstands now!”
“Magazine reported that the Fight Club hunk was “ready to move on” with Margot.”
“At the Hollywood Film Awards on Sunday, Nov. 5 in LA, Margot, 27, excitedly approached Angelina Jolie to introduce herself.”
“But instead of a warm reply, Angie “curtly replied, ‘I know who you are’ and turned her back on Margot,” an insider exclusively tells In Touch.”
“According to the source, the Australian-born beauty “looked shocked.” Jealousy may be to blame.”
“When Margot starred in 2015’s The Big Short alongside Angelina’s ex Brad Pitt, “rumors swirled about Brad crushing on Margot and that Angelina had tried to stop Brad from casting Margot in the film,” says the insider.”
“(Photo Credit: Splash)The source says that the mom-of-six — who shares Maddox, 16, Pax, 13, Zahara, 12, Shiloh, 11, Vivienne, 9, and Knox, 9, with Brad, 53 — can’t shake her resentment toward the Suicide Squad actress.”
““It was clear from Angelina’s reaction to Margot that she still holds a grudge,” the source says.”
“Back in November 2016, not long after Angelina, 42, filed for divorce from Brad, OK!”
““He thinks she’s the hottest girl in Hollywood right now,” a source said at the time.”


"1 celebrity infatuation". For more exclusive celebrity news, listen to the latest issue of in touch right now at the newsstand! "
The magazine reported that the fight club's handsome guy is ready to "move on" with Margot
"On Sunday, November 5, at the Hollywood Film Awards in Los Angeles, Margot, 27, excitedly approached Angelina Jolie to introduce herself."
"But Angie didn't answer enthusiastically, but" simply, "I know who you are" and recited her to Margot, "a person familiar with the matter said exclusively in contact magazine
According to sources, the Australian born beauty "looks shocked." Jealousy may be the culprit
"When Margot and Angelina's former Brad Pitt starred in the 2015 blockbuster," it was rumored that Brad had a crush on Margot, who Angelina had tried to prevent from playing in the film
"(photo source: splash) the source said the mother of six - Maddox, 16, parks, 13, Zahara, 12, Shiloh, 11, Vivian, 9, Knox, 9, and Brad, 53 - couldn't get rid of her resentment for the suicide group actresses."
"It's clear from Angelina's reaction to Margot that she still has a grudge," the source said
"Back in November 2016, shortly after Angelina, 42, filed for divorce from Brad, OK!"
"He thinks she's the sexiest girl in Hollywood right now," a source at the time said



Number  134
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Magazine in June that the decision regarding who would move in to the residence had "not yet been finalized."”
“A palace spokesperson told Hello!”
“The complex has 21 rooms, slightly topping the size of William and Kate's, but few details are available other than its overall size.”
“The two used to be one enormous set of rooms until they were divided in the 1950s.”
“Apartment 1 is a large complex of rooms in the main palace building, much like like William and Kate's home at 1A.”
“The Old Stables recently received a $493,000 renovation in preparation for the move.”
“Moving vans were spotted outside of Kensington Palace and are reportedly going to relocate the Duke and Duchess to the Old Stables, a smaller residence on Kensington Palace grounds.”
“The Sun had previously reported that the couple offered to vacate the property to make way for Prince Harry and Meghan Markle, though this plan did not come to fruition in light of their move to Windsor.”
“They have called the apartment home since 1972.”
“Getty ImagesThe Duke of Gloucester, one of Queen Elizabeth II's cousins, and his wife, the Duchess of Gloucester, were the last to reside in Apartment 1.”


A June magazine said the decision on who will move into the house "has not been finalized"
"Hello from the palace spokesman
"The complex has 21 rooms, slightly better than William and Kate's, but there are few details other than the overall size."
"The two rooms used to be a huge suite until they were separated in the 1950s."
"Apartment 1 is a large comprehensive room in the main building of the palace, much like William and Kate's home in 1a."
"The old stables recently received a decoration fee of 493000 yuan to prepare for the relocation."
"A moving van was found outside Kensington Palace and it is reported that they will move the Duke and Duchess to the old stables, a smaller residence in Kensington Palace."
The sun had previously reported that the couple had offered to vacate their property to make way for Prince Harry and Megan markel, but the plan did not materialize considering their move to Windsor
"They've been calling this apartment home since 1972."
Getty Elizabeth II's cousin, the Duke of Gloucester, and his wife, the Duchess of Gloucester, were the last to live in apartment 1



Number  135
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“* pops in Linkin Park CD, weeps gently *Jet fuel can't melt steel beams, y'all.”
“Now Life & Style is taking things a step further and claiming the couple just couldn't stay away from eac other any longer, and are now recreating the early 2000s like a 3 Doors Down cover band.”
“Obviously, Affleck eventually moved on to Bennifer 2.0, but the specter of J-Lo forever haunted his marriage like some big-bootied Ghost of Christmas past.”
“At this point, it's been over a year since Affleck split from Jennifer Garner after a decade of marriage, but new rumors about the causes of the separation still seem to surface about once a week.”
“Given the high-profile nature of her relationship with Ben, perhaps it's not surprising that Lopez is often the subject of those rumors.”
“Yes the tabloids have been persistent in their claims that Affleck and Lopez are getting back together with some even going so far as to report that Garner gave Affleck the boot after she found out he was still in...”
“...communication with Jen One...”
“Several of the less-reliable outlets have claimed that Affleck and Lopez are simply waiting for the dust to settle from his divorce (and her recent breakup with Casper Smart) that the OG Bennifer is back.”
““With J.Lo suddenly single and Jennifer Garner preparing to officially file for divorce from Ben, the former couple have been busy reconnecting,” claims an article in the latest issue of L&S.”
“Sure, sources from both camps have flat out denied the rumor, with one rep dismissing the report as "stupid," but we prefer to live in a world where true love will always find a way - and it's always 2001.”


"* pop up in Lincoln Park CD, cry softly * jet fuel can't melt steel beam, you guys."
"Now life and fashion goes a step further, claiming that the couple can't live without EAC any more, and now they're like a three door cover band back in the early 21st century."
"It's clear that Affleck finally chose benefactor 2.0, but the ghost of Jerome haunts his marriage forever, just like the ghost of a big fight lippin in the past Christmas."
"At this point, it's been more than a year since Affleck and Jennifer Garner split up after 10 years of marriage, but new stories about why they split seem to surface every week."
"Given the high-profile nature of her relationship with Ben, it may not be surprising that Lopez is often the subject of those rumors."
"Yes, the tabloids insist that Affleck and Lopez are getting back together. Some even report that Ghana fired Affleck after he found out he was still at home..."
“… Communication with Zhenyi... "
"Some unreliable media claim that Affleck and Lopez are just waiting for the dust to settle on his divorce (and her recent breakup with Casper smart) and that Ogg benniver is back."
An article in the latest issue of L & s magazine said: "with J. Rowe suddenly single and Jennifer Garner preparing to formally divorce Ben, the former couple have been busy reconnecting."
"Of course, sources from both camps flatly denied this rumor, and one representative called the report" stupid ", but we prefer to live in a world where true love always finds its way out - and always in 2001."



**Something goes wrong**
“"They were very happy together and kissing," an onlooker told us.”
“Selena looked beachy in a white dress and wavy hair, while Bieber focused all of his attention on her, going shirtless in a pair of shorts, a hat and a towel around his shoulders.”
“On the second day of their vacation, photos showed the couple hugging and holding each other close while engaged in what appeared to be a passionate conversation.”
“SelGo and the Biebs couldn't keep their hands off one another while hanging out by the pool and soaking up the sun.”
“The couple traveled to Jamaica together earlier this week to attend Jeremy Bieber's wedding with Chelsey Rebelo...but the newlyweds weren't the only ones celebrating their love during the tropical trip.”
“Selena Gomez and Justin Bieber are in love, and they don't care who knows it!”


A bystander told us, "they're happy together and they kiss."
"Selena looks slovenly in a white dress and curly hair, while Bieber focuses all her attention on her, shirtless, wearing shorts, a hat and a towel around her shoulders."
"On the second day of their holiday, the photos showed the couple hugging each other as they had a seemingly passionate conversation."
"When selgo and the biebers are sunbathing by the pool, they can't leave each other."
"The couple went to Jamaica earlier this week for the wedding of Jeremy Bieber and Chelsea Ribeiro But the newlyweds are not the only ones celebrating their love on a tropical trip
"Serena Gomez and Justin Bieber are in love. They don't care who knows!"



Number  137
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
““She refused to do it in Washington.”For much more on the Trumps, pick up the new issue of Us Weekly, on stands now!”
“...rare occasions when they sleep in the same city...”
“With the press corps photographers snapping away, the 46-year-old Slovenia-born stunner smiled for the cameras as the billionaire, 70, awkwardly reached for her hand and clutched the tips of her fingers.”
“Once the obligatory photo op was complete, she, Donald and their 11-year-old son, Barron, boarded Marine One, POTUS’ helicopter, which whisked them away to their Palm Beach, Florida, estate, Mar-a-Lago.”
“Aboard the chopper — and away from the public eye — Melania dropped the act.”
“And Donald’s hand.”
““Melania,” a family source alleges in the new issue of Us Weekly, “does not keep hidden from everyone around her how miserable she is.”That includes the presi­dent himself.”
“Multiple sources claim that the former fashion model who s currently living 200 miles away from Washington D C in NYC s Trump Tower while Barron finishes the school year refuses to share a bed with Donald even on the...”
““They have separate bedrooms,” says another Trump insider.”
“Melania escorted Akie Abe, the Japanese prime minister’s wife, around Palm Beach in February, but “only because she was going to be at Mar-a-Lago already,” according to the family source.”


"She refused to do it in Washington." To learn more about trump, see the new issue of American weekly, standing in the stands now
“… They rarely sleep in the same city... "
"The 46 year old Slovenian stuntman smiles at the camera as photographers from the press corps take photos, and the 70 year old billionaire reaches for her fingertips in embarrassment."
"When the compulsory photo taking operation was completed, she, Donald and their 11 year old son Barron boarded Portos' Navy one helicopter, which quickly took them to Palm Beach, Florida, marago's manor."
"On the helicopter - away from public view - Melania gave up the show."
"And Donald's hand."
"Melania," a family source declared in a new issue of us weekly, "didn't hide how miserable she was from the people around her." This includes the president himself
"According to a number of sources, the former fashion model currently lives in the trump building in New York, 200 miles from Washington, D.C., while Barron has completed the school year and refuses to sleep with Donald, even in..."
"They have separate bedrooms," said another trump insider
Melania escorted Akie Abe, the prime minister's wife, around Palm Beach in February, but "just because she's already going to mar-a-lago," according to family sources



Number  138
Source test case:  ['Opinion']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Kyle Harris Stitchers Noah Centineo The Fosters Tyler Posey Teen Wolf Choice Summer TV Actress ChoiceSummerTVActress Aisha Dee The Bold Type Cierra Ramirez The Fosters Hilary Duff Younger Holland Roden Teen Wolf Maia Mitchell The Fosters Shelley Hennig Teen Wolf...”
“2 RJ Cyler Power Rangers Taylor Lautner Scream Queens Choice Summer TV Show ChoiceSummerTVShow America s Got Talent Beat Shazam The Bold Type The Fosters So You Think You Can Dance Teen Wolf Choice Summer TV Actor ChoiceSummerTVActor Cody Christian Teen Wolf David Lambert The Fosters Harry Shum Jr Shadowhunters...”
“2Luke Evans – Beauty and the BeastMadelaine Petsch – RiverdaleMalcolm Barrett – TimelessChoice Scene Stealer (#ChoiceSceneStealer)Camila Mendes – RiverdaleColin O’Donoghue – Once Upon a TimeJosh Gad – Beauty and the BeastMichael Rooker – Guardians of the Galaxy Vol.”
“...of the Caribbean Dead Men Tell No Tales Choice Hissy Fit ChoiceHissyFit Anthony Anderson Black ish Dan Stevens Beauty and the Beast Kurt Russell Guardians of the Galaxy Vol...”
“STYDIA Holland Roden Dylan O Brien Teen Wolf Choice Liplock ChoiceLipLock Chris Pine Gal Gadot Wonder Woman Dan Stevens Emma Watson Beauty and the Beast Jennifer Morrison Colin O Donoghue Once Upon a Time Matthew Daddario Harry Shum Jr Shadowhunters Melissa Benoist Chris Wood Supergirl Orlando Bloom Keira Knightley Pirates...”
“Apa Riverdale Lili Reinhart Riverdale Millie Bobby Brown Stranger Things Ryan Destiny Star Choice TVShip ChoiceTVShip BELLARKE Eliza Taylor Bob Morley The 100 BUGHEAD Lili Reinhart Cole Sprouse Riverdale EMISON Shay Mitchell Sasha Pieterse Pretty Little Liars KARAMEL Chris Wood Melissa Benoist Supergirl MALEC Matthew Daddario Harry Shum Jr Shadowhunters...”
“...is Us Finn Wolfhard Stranger Things K J”
“Choice TV Villain ChoiceTVVillain Cory Michael Smith Gotham Grant Gustin The Flash Janel Parrish Pretty Little Liars Josh Segarra Arrow Mark Pellegrino Supernatural Teri Hatcher Supergirl Choice Breakout TV Show ChoiceBreakoutTVShow Famous in Love Riverdale Star Stranger Things This is Us Timeless Choice Breakout TV Star ChoiceBreakoutTVStar Chrissy Metz This...”
“#LongLiveQueenRhea)Scroll down for the full list of Teen Choice nominees — you can also click here to read the first wave — then drop a comment: Who/what will you root for when the ceremony airs Sunday, Aug. 13 on Fox?”
“(And can we take a minute to process Teri Hatcher scoring a nom for Choice TV Villain?”


"Kyle Harris sewing needle Noah centineo foster Taylor Percy junior wolf choose summer TV actress draft isadi bold cierra Ramirez foster Hilary Duff young Holland Roden junior wolf Maya Mitchell foster Shelley Henny junior wolf..."
"2 RJ sailor electric Ranger Tyler Lautner screams queen chooses summer TV show choicesummer TVshow American talent beat Shazam's bold type of foster care, so you think you can dance young wolf chooses summer TV actor choicesummer tvactor Cody Christian young wolf David Lambert fosters little Harry Shum Shadow Hunter..."
"2luke Evans – beauty and bestmadelaine petsch – Riverdale Malcolm Barrett – choicescenesetealer Camila Mendes – riverdalecolin O'Donoghue – once upon a time Josh GAD – beauty and bestmichael Rooker – guardian of the galaxy Vol."
“… The dead in the Caribbean can't speak to choose hissy fit choicehissy Anthony Anderson black Dan Stevens beauty and the beast Kurt Russell guardian's Galaxy roll... "
"Stydia Holland Roden Dylan o Brien: the choice of Teen Wolf liplock choiceliplock Chris pine gal gadot Dan Stevens Emma Watson beauty and the beast Jennifer Morrison Colin o Donoghue once upon a time Matthew Daddario Harry Shum Jr Shadow Hunter Melissa Benoist Chris wood Supergirl Orlando Bloom Kayla Knightley pirate..."
"APA Riverdale Lili Reinhart Riverdale Millie Bobby Brown the stranger, Ryan destiny star chooses tvship bellarke Eliza Taylor Bob Morley the 100 bad Lili Reinhart Cole cruise Riverdale emison Shay Mitchell Sasha pieterse beautiful little liar karamel Chris wood Melissa Benoist super girl malec Matthew dadrio Harry Shum Jr Shadow Hunter..."
"Are we strangers, Finn wolfhard?"
Colley Michael Smith, Gotham, grant Gustin, jeanel Parrish, the pretty little liar, Josh Segara, mark Pellegrino, the supernatural, Terry Hatcher, the super girl, the talent show, the talent show, the talent show, the talent show, how to be famous in love, Riverdale star, the stranger's business Eternal talent show "talent show" talent show "star talent show" Chris Metz: "this..."
"Long live queen Rhea) scroll down to see the complete list of teen Nominees - you can also click here to read the first wave of nominations - and delete a comment: who / what will you dedicate to when fox broadcasts the awards ceremony on Sunday, August 13?"
"Can we take a minute to deal with Teri Hatcher's nickname for" select TV villain "



Number  139
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Tell us below!”
“Do you still have hope for him and Rihanna getting back together one day?”
“Chris always had high hopes for their future together and even though there are only rumors that she could be pregnant with some other guy’s baby, he is still pretty upset and sad to hear about it.”
“He feels like that should be his baby.”
“He always hoped it would be him having a family with Rihanna and he regrets how things ended between them,” a source close to Chris tells HollywoodLife.com EXCLUSIVELY.”
“Chris [Brown] is angry, hurt and kind of heartbroken after hearing Rihanna was looking pregnant at the Grammys .”
“They were each other’s first real love and he still misses her.always had high hopes for their future together and even though there are only rumors that she could be pregnant with some other guy’s baby, he is still pretty upset and sad to hear about it.”
“He always hoped it would be him having a family with Rihanna and he regrets how things ended between them,” a source close to Chris tellsEXCLUSIVELY.”
“We had no clue Chris Brown, 28, was still so hung up on Rihanna, 29.”


"Tell us next!"
"Do you still hope that he and Rihanna can get back together one day?"
"Chris always had high hopes for their future together. Although there were only rumors that she might be pregnant with another man's child, he was very sad to hear that."
"He thinks it should be his child."
"He always hoped that he and Rihanna had a family, and he regretted the ending between them," a source close to Chris told reporters
"Chris (brown) was angry and sad to hear that Rihanna looked pregnant at the Grammy Awards
"They are each other's first love, and he still misses her. He has high hopes for their future together. Although there are only rumors that she may be pregnant with another man's child, he is still very sad to hear this news."
"He always wanted to have a family with Rihanna, and he regretted the ending," a source close to Chris said
"We didn't know that Chris Brown, 28, was so obsessed with Rihanna, 29."



Number  140
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“‘We are talking about hundreds of species of fish.’”
“‘There is now a huge trade in lesser-known species that have not been assessed.”
“People don’t know what they are buying.”
“Professor Stefano Mariani, of Salford University, who presented the evidence at the Fisheries Society of the British Isles Symposium, said: ‘This is about transparency.”
“Some labelled as mackerel turned out to be either Indian mackerel, which is found in the Red Sea and Polynesia, or hilsa shad, a type of tropical herring mostly found around in the Indian Ocean.”
“...was actually redfish a cold water Atlantic species...”
“Some 3 3 per cent of fish sold by supermarkets which have sophisticated tracing systems are not what they seem And research of grocery shops and markets found fish labelled as red snapper a tropical fish used in Caribbean cooking...”
“Some 3.3 per cent of fish sold by supermarkets, which have sophisticated tracing systems, are not what they seem.”
“A tenth of fish products across 31 sushi bars and restaurants were not as labelled.”
“Sushi restaurants, supermarkets and grocers are mislabelling fish and could even be serving up threatened species, a study has found.”


"We're talking about hundreds of fish."
"There's a huge deal of little-known species that has not been evaluated."
"People don't know what they're buying."
Professor Stefano Mariani of the University of Salford presented the evidence at a seminar of the British Isles Fisheries Association, saying: "it's about transparency."
Some of the fish labeled mackerel turned out to be either Indian mackerel found in the Red Sea and Polynesia or a tropical herring found near the Indian Ocean
“… In fact, redfish is a cold Atlantic species... "
"About 3% of the fish sold in supermarkets have complex tracking systems, and these fish are not what they look like. Studies of grocery stores and markets have found that the fish labeled red snapper is a tropical fish used in Caribbean cooking..."
"About 3.3% of the fish sold in supermarkets are not what they seem to be. Supermarkets have perfect tracking systems."
"One tenth of the fish products in 31 sushi restaurants and restaurants are not labeled."
Sushi restaurants, supermarkets and grocery stores mislabel fish and may even supply threatened fish, a study has found



Number  141
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“You may be able to find more information about this and similar content at piano.io...”
““They’ve been over each other for longer than they were ever together,” a source, with knowledge of Pitt and Aniston's current relationship, told the outlet then.”
“While most of the new articles reiterate what was reported initially after the split that Aniston wasn t planning on being single again but still believes in love that their relationship had been on its last legs for a while...”
“...that a Brad Pitt Jen reconciliation is highly unlikely one of the wilder new details is straight from Us Weekly...”
“Apparently, Jennifer Aniston kept Post-Its that Brad Pitt wrote her when they were married.”
“And Justin Theroux found them, a source said!”
““He stumbled upon old Post-it notes Brad had written,” the source explained.”
““Sweet little Post-its like, ‘You looked nice tonight’ or ‘Miss you already.’” These little notes supposedly had a big impact on their relationship.”
““Jen assured him they weren’t a big deal, but Justin wasn’t thrilled…Justin had moments of insecurity like that.”People really tried to shoot down the reports that Brad-Jen 2.0 could happen last week.”
““Now you add six kids on his side and each of them having their own assorted battle scars into the mix?”


"You can find more information about this and similar content at: piano.io..."
"They've been together longer than ever," a source familiar with Pitt and Aniston's current relationship told the Wall Street Journal
"Although most of the new articles restate the initial report after the breakup that Aniston does not intend to be single again, she still believes that their love has come to the last period of time..."
“… Brad Pitt Jen reconciliation is highly unlikely. A wilder new detail is directly from us weekly... "
"Obviously, Jennifer Aniston has been posting that Brad Pitt wrote to her when they got married."
"Justin seru found them," a source said
"He came across an old note written by Brad," the source explained
"Cute little posts, such as' you look good tonight 'or' I miss you so much '" These little pieces of paper are said to have a great impact on their relationship
"Jen assured him it wasn't a big deal, but Justin wasn't excited Justin has had such unsafe moments. " People are really trying to refute reports that Brad Jan 2.0 might have happened last week
"Now you have six children beside him, each with his own battle scars?"



Number  142
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Sound off in the comments.”
“For her part, the source adds, “Lindsay gets that there will be holidays and birthdays to share, but Ben and Jen’s friendship is unnerving.” Is Lindsay in the right here regarding Ben’s relationship with his ex, or is she overreacting?”
“The source also claims that Ben is sober, healthy, and “in a really good place” minus the tension with Lindsay.”
“The source said that although Ben is not reconciling with his wife, he did indicate how proud he is of how hard they work at their relationship, and that he’ll always choose Jen’s wishes for their family over everything else.”
““She ultimately blew up at Ben, telling him she’s confused about his intentions and yelling, ‘It’s either her or me!’” It seemed his response was not so reassuring.”
“Article continues below advertisement“Jen and the kids stayed in a hotel, but when she showed up to Ben’s rental, Lindsay was furious,” the source claimed.”
“The two enjoyed some quality time together before Jen decided to show up with their children, which brought Lindsay right back to reality.”
“Lindsay decided to move past Ben’s indiscretion by flying to Hawaii where he is filming the upcoming movie Triple Frontier.”
“...stay she couldn t shake the feeling that every time things seem to be going well something happens to remind her that Jen and the kids come first according to the source...”
“Lindsay who has a 5 year old daughter from a previous relationship understands that Ben needs to be there for his children says the source but she found it strange that he went to the marital home and spent the night Even though she tried to brush off his overnight...”


"Voice in comments."
For her, the source added, "Lindsay knows there will be holidays and birthdays to share, but Ben and Jane's friendship is disturbing." Is Lindsay here talking about Ben's relationship with her ex, or is she overreacting? "
"The source also claimed that Ben was sober and healthy," in a very good place "minus tension with Lindsay
"The source said that although Ben would not reconcile with his wife, he did say how proud he was of their emotional efforts and that he always chose Jan's best wishes to their family above all else."
"She finally lost her temper with Ben, told him she was confused about his intentions, and yelled," either she or I! "His answer doesn't seem so reassuring."
The article continues in the following ad: "Jane lives in a hotel with the children, but when she appears in Ben's rental, Lindsay is angry," the source claims
"Before Jane decided to show up with her children, they had a good time together, which brought Lindsay back to reality."
"Lindsay decided to abandon Ben's indiscretion and fly to Hawaii, where he was filming the upcoming film triple frontier
“…… Staying, she can't get rid of the feeling that every time things seem to be going well, there will always be something to remind her that, according to the source, Jane and the children are the first... "
"Lindsay has a 5-year-old daughter. She had a relationship before. She knew that Ben needed to take care of his children there, but she found it strange that he went to the marriage home for the night, even though she tried to refuse him to spend the night..."



Number  143
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“AdvertisementLive with Kelly and Ryan, starring Kelly Ripa and Ryan Seacrest, airs weekday mornings in syndication around the country.”
“He said that we should afford people the opportunity for truth and find out the facts before hanging someone out to dry.”
“Now, her incredible chemistry with Strahan’s replacement, Ryan Seacrest, is undeniable, but in the midst of the sexual misconduct allegations against him, Ripa is feeling betrayed and torn about standing beside him.”
“Could these skeletons in Seacrest’s closet force Ripa to leave the popular morning show?”
“According to Life & Style, in the era of the #MeToo and #Time’sUp movements every business is playing it safe, and that means things could change at Live, especially if ratings start to drop and big names start to avoid the show.”
““[Kelly’s] waiting to see what happens with Ryan.”
“But [either way] this is a dark period for her,” reveals an insider.”
““She’s pissed…Kelly feels blindsided.”
“The last thing she needs is celebrities boycotting.”
“Everyone is on pins and needles.”At this point, Ripa and Seacrest are still interviewing A-listers on the show, but that wasn’t the case when he was on the Oscar red carpet earlier this month.”


"Kelly and Ryan live," starring Kelly Ripa and Ryan Seacrest, was broadcast in syndicates across the country
"We should give people a chance to know the truth and find out before we dry them out," he said
"Now, her incredible chemical reaction with Strahan's successor, Ryan Seacrest, is undeniable, but Ripa feels betrayed and painful standing beside him in the sexual misconduct charges against him."
"Can these skeletons in Seacrest's wardrobe force Ripa out of this popular morning show?"
"According to life & style, in the super era of 'metoo' and 'time', every company is winning, which means that the situation of live broadcasting may change, especially if the ratings start to decline and the big brands start to avoid TV dramas."
"(Kelly) wait and see what happens to Ryan."
"But (in any case) it was a dark period for her," one insider said
"She was angry Kelly felt stupid
"The last thing she needs is a celebrity boycott."
"Everyone is on pins and needles." At this time, Ripa and Seacrest are still interviewing A-list stars on the show, but not when he made the red carpet debut at the Oscars earlier this month



Number  144
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“"If Kenyan Muslim Frederick Douglass had released his birth certificate, we wouldn't be fighting in a Civil War now!”
“You may be able to find the same content in another format, or you may be able to find more information, at their web site.”
“"Had Andrew Jackson been a little bit later, you wouldn’t have had the Civil War" @realDonaldTrump told @SalenaZito.”
“...pic.twitter.com/Zb8OQaDqyq — Edward-Isaac Dovere (@IsaacDovere) May 1, 2017Listen to the exchange here:This content is imported from Twitter.”
“Here's Trump's full answer on "swashbuckler" Andrew Jackson and the Civil War: "Why could that one not have been worked out?"”
“This content is imported from Twitter.”
“Another hint: "states' rights."”
“Hint: slavery.”


"If Frederick Douglas, a Kenyan Muslim, had released his birth certificate, we would not have fought in the civil war now!" "
You can find the same content in other formats on their website, or you can find more information
"@ realDonaldTrump told @ salenazito that if Andrew Jackson was late, you wouldn't have a civil war."
“... pic.twitter.com/Zb8OQaDqyq -Edward Isaac dovere (@ isaacdovere) listen in on May 1, 2017 here: this content was imported from twitter. "
Here's trump's complete answer to "the arrogant man" Andrew Jackson and the Civil War: "why hasn't this problem been solved?"
"This content was imported from twitter."
Another tip: "the right of the state."
"Tip: slavery."



Number  145
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Tell us!”
“Rihanna is a passionate woman and is extremely attracted to him.”“When they were together he treated her like a princess and she loved that,” our insider revealed.”
“If Hassan Jameel doesn’t step up, Rihanna has several other eligible bachelors jumping at the chance to date her.”
“We’ve EXCLUSIVELY learned that at least 8 hunky guys are dying to wine and dine RiRi!”
“Rihanna, 29, is a hot commodity!”
“The Barbadian beauty sparked romance rumors with Hassan Jameel when they were spotted passionately making out in Spain on June 27, but it looks like their romance has cooled down.”
“If the suave billionaire doesn’t step up to the plate and get serious with RiRi, he might have some competition!”
““Rihanna has at least 8 other guys just dying to be her man so if Hassan isn’t up to the challenge she is ready to move on,” a source close to the singer tells HollywoodLife.com EXCLUSIVELY.”
““She likes him for sure, but she ain’t falling head over heels yet or anything.”
“But they are both busy and if he doesn t have time to shower her with love and affection she will totally ghost on him Rihanna was last spotted stepping out for a bite to eat at Georgio Baldi in...”


"Tell us!"
"Rihanna is a passionate woman and very attractive to him." "When they were together, he treated her like a princess, and she liked that," our insider revealed
"If Hassan Jamil doesn't come forward, Rihanna and several other eligible bachelors will also take the opportunity to date her."
"We've learned that at least eight handsome guys are salivating for wine and food!"
"Rihanna, 29, is a hot commodity!"
"On June 27, when the Barbados beauty was photographed making love in Spain, it triggered a romantic rumor with Hassan Jamil, but it seems that their relationship has cooled down."
"If this gentle billionaire doesn't stand up and take Lili seriously, he may have some competitors!"
"Rihanna has at least eight men who are eager to be her man, so if Hassan is not up to the challenge, she is ready to move on," a source close to the singer told reporters
"Of course she likes him, but she's not completely in love with him."
"But they are very busy. If he doesn't have time to pour love and affection into her, she will be totally infatuated with him. The last time Rihanna was found out was in "George Baldi is going out to eat."



Number  146
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“7:15 a.m. Wednesday, Sept. 27: Updated with newspaper announcement.”
“"Congrats to the couple!”
“Looks like Ygritte and Jon Snow were meant to be, after all.”
“Game of Thrones co-stars Rose Leslie and Kit Harington are engaged.”
“The news was confirmed with an engagement announcement placed in The Times of London on Wednesday.”
“The announcement reads: "The engagement is announced between Kit, younger son of David and Deborah Harington of Worcestershire, and Rose, middle daughter of Sebastian and Candy Leslie of Aberdeenshire."”
“There’s going to be a Game of Thrones wedding pic.twitter.com/8UGGMCh9GH — Elliot Wagland (@elliotwagland) September 27, 2017The couple first sparked rumors about their offscreen romance in 2012 when they were spotted having a dinner date in London.”
“Leslie, 30, and Harington, 30, reportedly split a year later, before getting back together in 2014.”
“The duo didn't make their first public appearance together as a couple until the Olivier Awards in London in 2016.”
“Harington opened up about falling in love with Leslie during an interview with L'Uomo Vogue, saying, "If you’re already attracted to someone, and then they play your love interest in the show, it becomes very easy to fall in love."”


"Wednesday, September 27, 7:15 a.m.: updated newspaper announcement."
"Congratulations to the couple!"
"It seems that igritte and Jon Snow are destined after all."
"Game of Thrones" co stars Ross Leslie and kit Harrington are engaged
"The news was confirmed by an engagement announcement published in the London Times on Wednesday."
"David's youngest son kit and Deborah Harrington of Worcestershire, as well as Sebastian of Aberdeen and rose, the middle daughter of Katie Leslie, have announced their engagement," the announcement said
"There will be a power game at the wedding pic.twitter.com/8UGGMCh9GH -Elliot wagland (@ elliotwagland) on September 27, 2017, when the couple were photographed having dinner in London in 2012, they first sparked rumors about their off screen romance
"It is reported that 30-year-old Leslie and 30-year-old Harrington broke up a year later and got back together in 2014."
"It wasn't until the Oliver prize was held in London in 2016 that the two made their first public appearance as lovers."
"In an interview with fashion's L'uomo, Harrington made it public about falling in love with Leslie." if you've been attracted to someone and they play you in the show, it's very easy to fall in love, "he said



Number  147
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Journalism', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“'Needless to say, she takes everything she does seriously.'”
“'Charlize is usually very skittish about becoming serious with anyone, but she is also an intense, take-no-prisoners woman,' the insider revealed.”
“And it appears that Charlize Theron and Alexander Skarsgard have rekindled their relationship nearly six years after first dating, according to Life & Style.”
“Charlize, 42, and Alexander, 41, are trying to keep things 'private' but have reportedly been 'flirting on set' of their new film, political comedy Flarsky.”
“Alexander Skarsgard has rekindled his relationship with Charlize Theron nearly six years after first dating, according to Life & Style; seen in January'They're keeping it as private as they can, but it's hard to hide,' an insider revealed.”
“'They are both thrilled that this romance is back on.'”
“The power couple were first rumored to be dating back in 2012, but their short romance ended after 'just a few dates' with each going their separate ways.”
“'The first time they laid eyes on each other all those years ago, there was an attraction,' the source said.”
“'They've stayed in touch since the first go-round,' the insider noted before adding that Skarsgard has met her adopted kids, Jackson, six, and August, two.”
“Star power Charlize 42 and Alexander 41 are trying to keep things private but have reportedly been flirting on set of their new film political comedy Flarsky seen in May She has stayed single since her 2015 break up with Sean Penn 57 while Skarsgard and ex Alexa Chung 34”


"Needless to say, she takes everything she does seriously."
"Charlize is usually very uneasy about getting along with anyone seriously, but she is also a passionate, non serving woman," the person familiar with the matter said
Nearly six years after their first date, Charlize Theron and Alexander scarsgarde seem to be back in love, life and fashion magazine reported
"Charlize, 42, and Alexander, 41, are trying to keep it a secret, but they are reported to be" flirting "on the set of the new film political comedy flarsky."
According to life & style; in January this year, Alexander Skarsgard and Charlize Theron resumed their relationship nearly six years after their first date, and a person familiar with the matter revealed that they maintained a personal relationship as much as possible, but it was hard to hide it
"They're all excited about a repeat of the relationship."
"The first rumor about this powerful couple dates back to 2012, but their short-term relationship ended after 'a few dates' and they went their separate ways."
"The first time they met so many years ago, there was an attraction," the source said
"They've been in touch since the first time they met," the source said, adding that scarsgarde had met her adopted children, Jackson, 6, and Auguste, 2
"42 year old star Charlize and 41 year old Alexander are trying to keep a secret, but it is reported that they flirted in the new film Flarsky in May. After breaking up with Sean Pam 57 years in 2015, she remained single, and she was 34 years old.



Number  148
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Comment below, let us know!”
““The location is also a short drive, only a mile or two, from Angelina’s new home with the kids, in Los Feliz, so the rendezvous spot is both convenient and necessary.”Tell us, HollywoodLifers — What do YOU think about Brangelina’s meeting place?”
““Their secret meet up spot is by a pet store, a short drive from Brad’s home, where Angelina used to live with all of the kids when they were still a family,” the source explained.”
“It may only be for a few minutes, but it sounds like they are definitely coming face-to-face occasionally.”
“What’s more interesting about Brad and Angelina’s exchange point is that the source confirmed they’ve been seeing each other.”
“We’re keeping our fingers crossed!”
“Hopefully, one day, Angelina will be able to return to the home in order to pick up her children or even join them for a family dinner.”
“...figured a way around it...”
“In order to avoid the painful uncomfortable situation Angelina and Brad have compromised by setting up this meeting point near the home It s really sad to hear that Angelina is having trouble coping with her former family home but we re glad to hear that she and Brad have...”
““Angelina has a lot of memories which make her feel emotional and she can no longer bear the sight of the home where she raised her children,” the source explained.”


"The comments are as follows, let us know!"
"It's only a mile or two from Angelina and the children's new home in Los Feliz, so it's a convenient and necessary meeting place." Tell us, Hollywood stars - what do you think of the meeting place for brengelina? "
"The secret meeting took place in a pet shop, a short drive from Brad's home, where Angelina used to live with all her children when they were still a family," the source explained
"It may only be a few minutes, but it sounds like they will meet face to face occasionally."
"What's more interesting about Brad and Angelina's exchange point is that the source confirmed that they had been meeting."
"We pray to God!"
"I hope that one day, Angelina can go home to pick up her children and even have family dinner with them."
“… Find a way around it... "
"To avoid pain and discomfort, Angelina and Brad compromised and set up a meeting point near their home. It's really sad to hear that Angelina is having trouble dealing with her former home, but we're glad to hear that she and Brad have... "
"Angelina has a lot of memories, which makes her feel emotional and she can't stand the home where she raised her children anymore," the source explained



Number  149
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Cowardly assault.””
“Shame on the airport cops.”
““Shame on @United who broke customer trust + instigated this.”
““This could be me or you next time,” Selma director Ava DuVernay wrote on Twitter.”
“We are also reaching out to this passenger to talk directly to him and further address and resolve this situation.”The news and troubling videos sparked widespread criticism of the airline, including by many in Hollywood.”
“Our team is moving with a sense of urgency to work with the authorities and conduct our own detailed review of what happened.”
“I apologize for having to re-accommodate these customers.”
“Another video, recorded after the initial incident, shows the man bleeding and repeating, “Just kill me.”In a statement posted to Twitter, United CEO Oscar Munoz said, “This is an upsetting event to all of us here at United.”
“When he refused to give up his seat, police officers boarded, pulled him screaming from his seat, and dragged him by his arms through the aisle — a scene that horrified other passengers, according to videos taken by witnesses and posted on the internet.”
“The airline manager would not relent, and the man yelled that he was being targeted because he was Chinese, a passenger told the Post.”


"A cowardly attack."
"The airport police are a shame."
"It's shameful that @ United has destroyed the trust of customers and incited all this."
"It could be me or you next time," Selma director Ava Duvernay tweeted
"We are also contacting the passenger to have a direct dialogue with him to further solve this problem." The news and the disturbing video triggered widespread criticism of the airline, including from many Hollywood people
"Our team is working with the authorities with a sense of urgency to conduct our own detailed review of what happened."
"I'm sorry I had to relocate these clients."
"Another video was recorded after the first accident, showing the man bleeding and repeating," kill me. " "It's a disturbing thing for all of us at United," Manchester United CEO Oscar Munoz said in a twitter statement
"When he refused to give up his seat, the police got in, pulled him from his seat, screamed, and then dragged him across the aisle with their arms - a scene that shocked other passengers, according to a video taken by witnesses and posted on the Internet."
A passenger told the post: "the airline manager refused to let go. The man said loudly that he was Chinese, so he was targeted."



Number  150
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Tell us what you think in the comments below!”
“The two both had their own part in the plan and “Kim wanted to set the record straight with Taylor and Kanye once and for all.”
“HollywoodLife.com EXCLUSIVELY learned the couple’s carefully thought out plan behind their video release, and it was all ‘to defend her family.’ Get the scoop here!”
“The phone call Kim, 35, released on her Snapchat between Taylor, 26, and Kanye, 39, was no random action.”
“In fact, the reality star and the fashion designer tag-teamed the entire thing.”
““Kim and Kanye discussed everything about the Taylor Swift video before releasing it.”
“Kanye was in on the plan to release the tape as was Kim‘s entire team of lawyers, managers and publicists.”
“Everything Kim did was carefully planned, timed and calculated for maximum effect,” a source tells HollywoodLife.com.”
“Although it could have been seen as an attack on the “Bad Blood” singer, it was all in the name of defense for the pair.”
“This was not something Kim did spontaneously or without discussing it with her husband, or the people she leans on for support and guidance.”


"Please let us know what you think in the comments below!"
"Both of them have their own part in the plan." Kim wants to completely correct the mistakes of Taylor and Kanye
"Hollywood life.com learned exclusively about the couple's carefully thought out plans after the release of the video, all of which are to" protect her family. ". Come and get the scoop
"Kim, 35, didn't post a random call on snapchat between Tyler, 26, and Kanye, 39."
"In fact, reality TV stars and fashion designer tag worked together on the whole thing."
"Kim and Kanye discussed everything before releasing Taylor Swift's video."
"Kanye and Kim's entire lawyers, managers and PR team are involved in the plan to release the video."
A source told reporters: "everything Kim Jong Il has done has been carefully planned, timed and calculated to achieve the maximum effect." Hollywood life. "
"Although this may be seen as an attack on the" bad blood "singer, it's all for their defense."
"It's not something Kim Jong Il does spontaneously or without discussing with her husband or the support and guidance she relies on."



Number  151
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Did it get you in the holiday spirit?”
“Gwen just dropped her first ever holiday album You Make It Feel Like Christmas, on Oct. 6 and as the season draws closer, she’s going to be everywhere in support of it.”
“We’ve got EXCLUSIVE details on why she might have to bail on the festivities this year.”
“Blake Shelton, 41, and Gwen Stefani, 48, have always made holidays together a big priority in their relationship.”
“In 2016 they spent Thanksgiving at his Oklahoma ranch and rang in Christmas at her LA home.”
“They were hoping to do turkey day at his country pad again, but she might have to skip out on the festive meal.”
““Gwen had the best time with Blake and his family last year at Thanksgiving and she would love to do it all over again.”
“Last year she promised that she’d be back again for this Thanksgiving, but she might have to break her promise.”
“She’s got so much work on her plate all month, it’s going to be very hard for Gwen to pull it all off,” a source close to the singer tells HollywoodLife.com EXCLUSIVELY.”
““It’s crunch time for promoting her Christmas album, she’s got so many interviews lined up she’s even doing a meet and greet in LA on Black Friday.”


"Does this give you the spirit of the festival?"
"Gwen just released her first ever holiday album" you make it feel like Christmas "on October 6, and as the season approaches, she will support it everywhere."
"We've got exclusive details about why she was bailed out at this year's celebration."
"Black Shelton, 41, and Gwen Stefani, 48, have always made a holiday together a top priority in their relationship."
"In 2016, they spent Thanksgiving on his farm in Oklahoma and called at her home in Los Angeles for Christmas."
"They wanted to have another turkey day at his country house, but she might have to skip the holiday dinner."
"Gwen had the best time with Blake and her family last Thanksgiving, and she wanted to do it again."
"Last year she promised to come back for Thanksgiving this year, but she may have to break her promise."
A source close to Gwen told reporters: "she has too much work in a month, Gwen can hardly complete all the work." Exclusive to Hollywood life
"It's a critical time to sell her Christmas album, she's arranged so many interviews, even a meeting in Los Angeles on Black Friday."



Number  152
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
““Stuff like that is against the rules, but they don’t really enforce it that much.””
““When I was there, a guy working in the laundry raped two cho-mos [child molesters],” David said.”
“...bars...”
“Prison might just be Joe Giudice‘s worst nightmare.”
“RadarOnline.com has exclusively learned that the 43-year-old Real Housewives of New Jersey star has to wait 41 long months before he can hookup with his wife Teresa or any other woman… without getting in trouble.”
““Conjugal visits are not permitted at the Bureau’s institutions,” a spokesperson for the Office of Public Affairs at the Federal Correctional Institution in Fort Dix, New Jersey told Radar—where Joe is currently locked up.”
“Former Fort Dix inmate and prison expert Earl David confirmed to Radar that conjugal visits are “absolutely forbidden!”Joe—who was often spotted out with other women while Teresa did her own time—could change his tune, though, behind bars.”
“According to David, men do have sex with other men in the prison, but it’s against the rules.”
“If the inmates get caught doing the dirty, they get sent to solitary confinement for up to four months, he said.”
““The cho-mos were actually raped, but I did see them again.”David claimed that situations like this took place every few months while he was at Fort Dix.”


"Things like this are against the rules, but they don't really enforce that much."
"When I was there, a man working in a laundry raped two child molesters," David said
“… Bar... "
"Prison may be Joe Judith's worst nightmare."
“ RadarOnline.com The 43 year old New Jersey star "real housewife" will have to wait 41 months to socialize with his wife, Theresa, or any other woman Without getting into trouble. "
A spokesman for the Public Affairs Office of the federal penitentiary in dixburg, New Jersey, told the radar where Joe is currently being held
Former dixburg prisoner and prison expert count David confirmed to radar that husband and wife visits are "absolutely forbidden! "Joe is often found with other women, while Theresa is in her own time, but in prison, Joe can change his tune."
"According to David, men do have sex with other men in prison, but it's against the rules."
"If prisoners are found guilty, they will be held in solitary confinement for up to four months," he said
"The chomos were actually raped, but I saw them again." David says that happens every few months when he's at dixburg



Number  153
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“It seems that Ariana Grande and Pete Davidson’s relationship has fans interested, and they may want to get used to their names making headlines as their romance continues.”
“The red flags are everywhere and Ariana refuses to see any of it,” an insider told the outlet.”
“The Dangerous Woman singer and her fiance have had a whirlwind romance and got engaged after only dating for a few weeks.”
“However, according to tweets from her former boyfriend Big Sean’s Twitter account, the singer has been cheating on her boyfriend with him.”
“According to a July 7 report by Gossip Cop, it seems that rapper Big Sean’s Twitter account was hacked over the weekend.”
“The hacker posted a series of explicit comments, which included profanity and the n-word, before tweeting that Ariana Grande had been cheating on Pete Davidson with her ex-boyfriend the “whole time.”The tweet started a firestorm among fans via Twitter.”
“The rumors that Ariana had been cheating on Pete began to circulate and the tweet garnered over 5,000 retweets and 8,000 likes in only about 15 minutes.”
“Fans were talking about the surprising post so much that “Big Sean” even became a trending topic on the social media site.”
“If fans only saw the one tweet from the rapper’s account it could look like a legitimate claim.”
“However, those who bothered to go back and read all of Big Sean’s tweets could see that his account had been hacked, which is something that has happened to multiple celebrities in the past.”


"The relationship between Ariana Grande and Peter Davidson seems to have aroused fans' interest, and as the relationship continues, they may want to get used to their name making headlines."
"Red flags are everywhere and Ariana refuses to see any," an insider told the media
"The dangerous singer had a whirlwind relationship with her fiance and was engaged after only a few weeks of dating."
"However, according to twitter information on her ex boyfriend big Sean's Twitter account, the singer has been cheating on her boyfriend."
"According to gossip police on July 7, rap singer Sean's Twitter account appears to have been hacked at the weekend."
The hackers made a series of explicit comments, including blasphemy and n-words, and then tweeted that Ariana Grande "has been" unfaithful to her ex boyfriend Pete Davidson. This tweet set off a storm among fans through Twitter
"The rumor that Ariana cheated Peter began to spread, and the microblog received more than 5000 forwarding and 8000 likes in just 15 minutes."
"Fans are talking about this amazing post so much that" big Sean "has even become a hot topic on social media sites."
"If fans only see a tweet on the rapper's account, it may seem like a reasonable statement."
"However, those who bother to go back to see big Sean's microblog can see that his account has been hacked. This is what happened to many celebrities in the past."



Number  154
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Email us at tips@radaronline.com, or call us at (866) ON-RADAR (667-2327) any time, day or night.”
“Do you have a story for RadarOnline.com?”
“Inside Lambert's Ruthless Revenge Against Blake Shelton Singer bringing ex-husband to new lows by beating him at his own country music game.”
“Country songbird Miranda Lambert is flying high — and bringing ex-husband Blake Shelton to a new low — now that her dirt-dishing new album is a smash hit!”
“The 33-year-old Texas firecracker led all performers in nominations for this year’s Country Music Association Awards with nods for her album The Weight of These Wings and her tell-all hit songs Vice and Tin Man.”
“Meanwhile, Blake, now cuddling with platinum-blond pop doll Gwen ­Stefani, was shut out for the second year in a row!”
““Miranda can’t keep from smiling these days,” a friend says.”
““She ­suffered at Blake’s hands, but now the world is coming up roses and that pain of l­osing her man has faded into the rearview mirror.”
““And that she’s beating Blake at his own country music game, it just makes it all the sweeter.”
“She’s laughing all the way to the bank.”The album airs her dirty laundry about Blake jilting her.”


"Email us tips@radaronline.com , or call the (866) radar (667-2327) at any time. "
"Do you have a story to tell RadarOnline.com ？”
"Lambert's ruthless revenge on Blake Sheldon Singh has pushed him to a new low by beating his ex husband in his country music competition."
Country singer Miranda Lambert is flying high, taking her ex husband Blake Sheldon to a new low, and now her new album is very popular
"The 33 year old Texan firecracker is nominated for this year's Country Music Association award with all the performers, her album" the weight of these wings "and her talk about all the hit songs" vice and tin man. "
"Meanwhile, Blake, now holding a platinum blonde pop doll Gwen Stephanie, has been turned away for the second year in a row!"
A friend said, "Miranda has been laughing a lot lately."
"She suffered in black's hands, but now the world is recovering, and the pain of the man who lost her is gone in the rearview mirror."
"She beat Blake in his own country music competition, which made everything sweeter."
"She laughed all the way to the bank." This album plays her dirty words about Blake abandoning her



Number  155
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Sheen admits he showered her with money and gifts during their less than two-month-long relationship, however he adds that she not only extorted from him but also stalked him.”
“In his documents Sheen says that Jane Doe is completely making that up.”
“Sheen is responding to the lawsuit filed anonymously last summer by a woman who says he had unprotected sex with her before revealing he’s HIV positive.”
“The actor called out his accuser and exposed her as a “hooker” who is extorting him after sleeping with many other men, reports TMZ.com.”
“Charlie Sheen has slammed the woman who filed a lawsuit against him over unprotected sex.”


"Sin admitted that he gave her a lot of money and gifts in their less than two month relationship, but added that she not only blackmailed him, but also followed him."
"In his papers, sheen said the anonymous was completely fabricated."
"Last summer, a woman filed a lawsuit anonymously, saying that he had unprotected sex with her before revealing that she was HIV positive. Xin responded to the lawsuit."
According to reports, the actor called out the plaintiff and revealed that she was a "prostitute" who blackmailed him after sleeping with many other men TMZ.com Website. "
"Charlie Sheen attacked the woman who sued him for unprotected sex."



Number  156
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Rest in peace, MTM.””
“A fighter.”
“...tweeting Mary Tyler Moore was a dear friend and a truly great person...”
“I will miss my Miss Dorothy so much but I m comforted to know that the joy she brought us all will be everpresent in her many films and television shows Moore s friend Larry King also expressed his condolences...”
“She was brave, kind, generous and an activist for many causes,” Andrews continued.”
“'”“She was a joy to work with, her talent was monumental.”
“Miss Dorothy!”
“Whenever we bumped into each other, people must have thought us nuts…screaming across some shopping aisle in a supermarket or yelling to each other down the corridors of CBS…’Millie!”
“Ever since that time, we never referred to each other again as Julie and Mary.”
“...on the film Andrews said and laughed our way through the production...”


"Rest in peace, MTM."
"A soldier."
“… Tweet that Mary Taylor Moore is a good friend and a really great person... "
"I'll miss my miss Dorothy very much, but I'm glad to know that the joy she brings to all of us will always appear in many of her movies and TV shows, and Moore's friend Larry King also expressed his sorrow..."
Andrews went on: "she is brave, kind, generous and active in many undertakings."
"'" it's a pleasure to work with her, and her talent is immortal. "
"Miss Dorothy!"
"Whenever we run into each other, people will think we are crazy Screaming in one of the supermarket aisles, or yelling in the CBS hallway "Millie!"
"After that, we'll never call each other Julie and Mary again."
“… In the movie, Andrews says, "and laughs at our way through production..."



Number  157
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Fingers crossed one of them is Orlando and Katy’s!”
“His answer?”
“The only thing that would make Orlando and Katy a cuter couple than they already are is a baby — and it sounds like Orlando is all for the idea.”
“Instagram’s new Ask Me Anything feature may be the best thing the app has come up with!”
“Without it, we may never have known that Orlando Bloom, 41, wants more kids.”
“Although he has a son named Flynn with his ex Miranda Kerr the actor has been dating Katy Perry 33 on and off since 2016 and now it s looking like they may be ready to take things to the...”
“...next level...”
“Well, Orlando is at least.”
“After posting on his Insta story, “I’m waiting to go to set ask me a question,” one fan asked if he wanted to have kids.”
““Yes I love being a dad.”As if his answer wasn’t sweet enough, Orlando even posted it with a smiling selfie.”


"Pray that one of them is Orlando and Katie's!"
"His answer?"
"The only thing that makes Orlando and Katie a cuter couple than they are now is a child - it sounds like Orlando fully supports the idea."
"Instagram's new" ask me anything "feature is probably the best thing the app has ever launched!"
"Without it, we may never know that Orlando Bloom, 41, wants more children."
"Although he and his ex boyfriend Miranda Cole have a son named Flynn, the actor has been dating 33 year old Katie Perry intermittently since 2016, and now it seems that they may be ready to take things to the next stage
“… Next level... "
"Well, at least in Orlando."
"I'm waiting to go to the set and ask me a question," one fan posted on insta He asked himself if he wanted children
"Yes, I love being a dad." It seems that his answer is not sweet enough, Orlando even posted a smiling self portrait



Number  158
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Email us at tips@radaronline.com, or call us at 800-344-9598 any time, day or night.”
“...out more movies...”
“Scary New Signs Burnt-Out Jennifer Could Be Headed For A BreakdownFalling Apart!”
“Scary New Signs Burnt-Out Jennifer Could Be Headed For A Breakdown Lawrence is 'desperate to take a year off acting' after strip club scandal.”
“Burnt-out Jennifer Lawrence could be headed for a breakdown on the heels of her explosive strip club scandal, RadarOnline.com has learned exclusively.”
“Pals fear J Law s had enough of the limelight and is desperate to take a year off acting Despite her desires for a much needed break sources claim deep down she knows she can t have one Jennifer still has two major movies to promote next year Red Sparrow...”
“...and X Men Dark Phoenix but she s got nothing scheduled after that snitches the informant adding For the first time she will have many months in a row off However as desperately as she needs this her handlers are said to be pressuring her to read scripts and churn...”
““She’s tired and burnt out,” the insider reveals to Radar.”
“Do you have a story for RadarOnline.com?”


"Email us tips@radaronline.com , or call 800-344-9598 at any time. "
“… See more movies... "
"There's a terrible new sign that Jennifer may be on the verge of collapse!"
"There are new and frightening signs that Jennifer may collapse, and Lawrence is' eager to take a year off 'after the strip club scandal."
"After the strip club scandal, the exhausted Jennifer Lawrence may collapse, RadarOnline.com He's completely learned the website. "
"Friends are worried that J law s has had enough of the spotlight, and although she is eager to have a much-needed break, she can't wait to take a year off to act. It's said that deep down in her heart, she knows that she can't have a movie. Next year, there are two important movies to promote "red sparrow"
“… And X-Men Dark Phoenix, but she didn't get any arrangements after the snitch added that the first time she would have many months in a row, but as urgently needed for this, her handler is said to be under pressure for her to read scripts and stir... "
"She's tired and exhausted," the person familiar with the matter told radar
"Do you have a story to tell RadarOnline.com ？”



Number  159
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“(To watch Hayes’ track record, click here) Wall Street has been keeping quiet on all things KREF, and the only other recent review also recommends a Buy.”
“We expect increased capital deployment to support earnings power and dividend coverage, and could potentially warrant an increase in the dividend as the macroeconomic outlook improves.” To this end, Hayes gives KREF a Buy and sets a $19.50 price target that indicates ~6% growth from current levels.”
“At the end of October, the company released 3Q20 earnings (the last reported quarter), showing $22.4 million in total revenue, for a 13% year-over-year gain.”
“The company has over $2 billion invested in 49 separate loans, 95% of which are senior mortgage loans.”
“Ares boasts a diversified portfolio – featuring office space, apartments, hotels, and mixed-use properties – mainly across the Southeast and West.”
“Ares Commercial Real Estate (ACRE) The first dividend pick we are looking at is Ares Commercial Real Estate, a company focused on the commercial real estate mortgage sector.”
“We are talking about at least 9% here.”
“These are stocks that the analyst initiated Buy ratings on, pointing out their high dividend yield.”
“Against this backdrop, we’ve opened up the TipRanks database to get the latest stats on Hayes’ CRE choices.”
“Hayes commented...”


(to see Hayes's track record, click here) Wall Street has been silent about everything about Craig, and the only recent comment suggested buying
"We expect that the increase in capital allocation will support profitability and dividend coverage, with dividends likely to increase as the macroeconomic outlook improves." To this end, Hayes bought kref and set a target price of $19.50, which indicates that the price is about 6% higher than the current level. "
"At the end of October, the company released its third quarter (last quarter) results, with total revenue of $22.4 million, up 13% year-on-year."
The company has more than $2 billion invested in 49 separate loans, 95% of which are senior mortgages
"Ares has a diversified portfolio of office space, apartments, hotels and multi-purpose properties, mainly in the southeast and West."
"Ares commercial real estate (acre) the first dividend option we focus on is ares commercial real estate, a company focused on the commercial real estate mortgage industry."
"We're talking about at least 9%."
"Analysts give buy ratings on these stocks, pointing to their high dividend yield."
"In this context, we have opened the tipranks database to get the latest data selected by Hayes cre."
"Hayes commented



Number  160
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Proceeds from her single, which failed to make the charts, reportedly went to fund St. Jude’s Children’s Research Hospital.”
““No, I’d never (make another single), that was just for fun, and for charity,” she said at the time.”
“In 2012 Kardashian was quoted as saying that she would never try to launch a singing career.”
“The song gained practically no traction.”
“Most people probably don’t.”
“Remember the reality star’s single, “Jam (Turn It Up),” from 2011?”
“Still, it’s not that she hasn’t tried before.”
“That’s the whole point, isn’t it?”
“Now, we say wishful thinking because embarking on such a venture would just give folks the opportunity to write even more about Kardashian (raising our hands over here, too).”
“According to The Sun, the newlywed has enlisted the help of husband Kanye West as well as vocal and songwriting coaches to help her break into the industry.”


It is reported that the income from her single, which did not make it to the charts, was used to fund St Jude's children's research hospital
She said at the time, "no, I never (take another picture), it's just for fun, it's also for charity."
"In 2012, Kardashian said that she would never try to start her own singing career."
"The song has little appeal."
"Most people may not."
"Remember the 2011 reality TV star's single jam (open)"
"But it's not that she hasn't tried before."
"That's the point, isn't it?"
"Now, we're talking about wishful thinking, because starting such an adventure will only give people the opportunity to write more about Kardashian (and raise their hands here as well),"
"According to the sun, the newlyweds have been helped to break into the industry by her husband Kanye West and vocal and songwriting coaches," he said



Number  161
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“In 2015, after much speculation, the couple announced that they were separating.”
“They have three children together: Violet Anne, born in 2005, Seraphina Rose Elizabeth, born in 2009, and Samuel Garner, born in 2012.”
“They got engaged on her 33rd birthday and wed in the Caribbean in 2005 while Garner was pregnant with the couple’s first child.”
“Garner began dating Affleck, who co-starred in the film “Daredevil”, in 2004, a year after her split from first husband Scott Foley.”
“Wife Jennifer Garner is the Golden Globe-winning star of the hit TV drama “Alias” and has other film and TV credits that include “Daredevil”, “13 Going on 30”, “The Odd Life of Timothy Green” and “Dallas Buyers Club”.”
“Affleck directed the critically-acclaimed film “Argo” in 2012, winning a Golden Globe and Academy Award for Best Picture.”
“He was also chosen to play Batman in the 2016 “Batman v Superman: Dawn of Justice”.”
“Affleck is the Academy Award winner for Best Original Screenplay for “Good Will Hunting” and starred in films including “Armageddon”, “Pearl Harbor”, “Changing Lanes”, “The Town” and the 2014 adaptation “Gone Girl”.”
“Ben Affleck is an American actor, director and screenwriter who has been married to wife, actress Jennifer Garner, since 2005.”


"In 2015, after much speculation, the couple announced that they were going to live apart."
"They have three children: Violet Anne, born in 2005, Seraphina rose Elizabeth, born in 2009, and Samuel Garner, born in 2012."
"They got engaged on her 33rd birthday and married in the Caribbean in 2005, when Ghana was pregnant with the couple's first child."
Ghana has been dating Affleck since 2004. A year after his first husband Scott Foley broke up, Affleck and Affleck co starred in the film the expendables
Her wife, Jennifer Garner, is the Golden Globe winner of the hit TV series alias. She also owns other films and TV works, including the expendables, 13:30, Timothy Green's weird life and Dallas buyers club
In 2012, Affleck directed the highly acclaimed film Argo, which won the Golden Globe Award and the Academy Award for best picture
"He was also selected to play Batman in Batman versus Superman: Dawn of justice in 2016."
"Affleck won the Oscar for best original screenplay for good will hunt, starring in films such as doomsday, Pearl Harbor, changing lanes, small town and the 2014 adaptation of the lost girl
Ben Affleck, an American actor, director and screenwriter, has been married to his wife and actress, Jennifer Garner, since 2005



Number  162
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Journalism', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“HollywoodLifers, do you think Selena and Abel are a good match?”
“She kind of gives me a lot of, like, maternal advice.” It’s so adorable that Jen is looking out for Selena’s love life and giving her amazing support.”
“Hollywoodlife.com has the EXCLUSIVE details of how Jennifer Aniston has reached out to the singer to follow her heart and forget about the haters.”
“So sweet!”
“While Selena Gomez, 24, seems to be getting piled on about her new relationship with The Weeknd, 26, her idol Jennifer Aniston, 47, is coming to the rescue with love advice.”
““Jennifer has been one of Selena’s biggest supporters.”
“She’s been encouraging Selena to follow her heart and ignore the haters,” a source tells HollywoodLife.com EXCLUSIVELY.”
““Jennifer thinks if anyone deserves to be happy, it’s Selena.”
“She knows Selena wouldn’t hurt a fly and doesn’t think she shouldn’t hide her relationship with The Weeknd because of negative backlash,” our insider adds.”
“Selena definitely hasn t been shy about how much she adores The Weeknd real name Abel Tesfaye as she was draped all over him in a loving PDA show after their romantic dinner Jan 10 at Santa Monica s exclusive...”


"Holly bug, do you think Serena and Abel are a good match?"
"She gave me a lot of, like, maternal advice." it's lovely. Jennifer is following Serena's love life and giving her amazing support. "
"Hollywood life has the exclusive details of how Jennifer Aniston contacts the singer, follows her heart and forgets hatred
"Great!"
"While Selena Gomez, 24, seems to be talking about her new relationship with 26, her idol, Jennifer Aniston, 47, comes to the rescue with love advice."
"Jennifer has always been one of Selena's biggest supporters."
"She has been encouraging Serena to follow her heart and ignore those who hate her," a source told reporters Exclusive to Hollywood life
"Jennifer thinks that if anyone deserves to be happy, it's Serena."
"She knows that Selena won't hurt a fly and doesn't think she should hide her relationship with the weekend because of her negative reaction," our insider added
"Serena will never be shy. She adores her real name Abel tesfayer a week ago, because after the romantic dinner in Santa Monica on January 10, she threw herself on him in a PDA show full of love..."



Number  163
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“If only we could convince them to star in a reality show about their classy beef.”
“...commoner she d be sympathetic to how Meghan is struggling but Kate feels threatened by Meghan s popularity the insider reveals...”
“These reports were inevitable of course, but they've been somewhat more vicious and persistent than we anticipated.”
“Insiders (or people purporting to be insiders, or tabloid columnists writing as imaginary insiders) claim that Meghan has breached royal protocol several times in her six weeks as a Duchess.”
“Naturally, these folks insist that the Queen is not happy with Meg's performance thus far.”
“Kate Middleton, on the other hand, is reportedly loving every minute of it.”
“A source tells the never-reliable Star magazine that Kate has been “gleefully watching Meghan’s blunders from the sidelines.”Those blunders include such egregious offenses as wearing a dress that didn't cover her shoulders.”
“Oh, and let's not forget the time that Meghan tried to hold Harry's hand in public!”
“We're still clutching our pearls over that one.”
“Apparently Kate is supposed to be helping Meghan out with all this confusing nonsense but when the time came to lend a hand to her fellow lapsed peasant she was all like nah You d think that as a fellow...”


"If only we could persuade them to do a reality show about their delicious beef."
“… Ordinary people, she will sympathize with Megan's struggle, but Kate thinks Megan's popularity, insider disclosure and threat... "
"These reports are inevitable, of course, but they are more vicious and lasting than we expected."
Insiders (or people who call themselves insiders, or tabloid columnists who write as fictional insiders) claim that Megan repeatedly violated Royal etiquette during her six weeks as duchess
"Of course, these people insist that the queen is not satisfied with Meg's performance so far."
"On the other hand, Kate Middleton is reported to love every minute of it."
A source told the unreliable star magazine that Kate "has been watching Megan's mistakes with delight." These mistakes include heinous crimes such as wearing skirts that don't cover your shoulders
"Oh, don't forget the time Megan took Harry's hand in public!"
"We're still holding pearls on it."
"Obviously, Kate should help Megan solve these confusing nonsense, but when it comes time for her to lend a helping hand to her fellow farmers, she seems to be no, you think as a companion..."



Number  164
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“OUCH”
“Ryan Reynolds, Blake Lively and Ed were all spending time with Taylor while Lindsay was not allowed anywhere near her.”Mean girls!”
“Taylor’s dressing room was where all the cool kids were hanging out.”
““Ed Sheeran was kind enough to stop and take pictures with Lindsay but Taylor Swift wanted nothing to do with her.”
“She was left to just wander around backstage,” sources tell Straight Shuter.”
“All the musical artists had their own dressing rooms but Lindsay wasn’t performing.”
“There was a big room backstage to hold Katie Holmes and the other celebrity presenters but Lindsay wasn’t presenting or introducing anyone.”
““Lindsay just turned up and no one really knew what to do with her.”
“Lindsay didn’t have a ticket so instead hung out backstage with everyone except Taylor Swift.”
“Taylor Swift Bans Lindsay Lohan: EXCLUSIVELindsay Lohan surprised everyone when she just turned up uninvited to Jingle Ball at Madison Square Garden.”


"Ouch"
Ryan Reynolds, Blake Lively and ED are all with Taylor, and Lindsay is not allowed near her
"Taylor's dressing room is where all the cool kids are."
"Ed Sheeran kindly stopped to take a picture with Lindsay, but Taylor Swift didn't want to have anything to do with her."
"She can only hang out backstage," the source told straight Shuter
"All the music artists have their own dressing rooms, but Lindsay doesn't perform."
"There's a big room backstage for Katie Holmes and other celebrity hosts, but Lindsay didn't introduce anyone."
"Lindsay has just arrived. No one really knows what to do with her."
"Lindsay didn't have tickets, so everyone was hanging out backstage except Tyler swift."
"Tyler swift banned Lindsay Lohan: everyone was surprised when she came uninvited to the jingle ball in Madison Square Garden."



Number  165
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“This latest story is similarly bogus.”
“Gossip Cop also debunked the site’s tall tale about Aniston trying to make Theroux look like Pitt.”
“We previously busted the webloid for falsely claiming Theroux warned Pitt to stay away from Aniston.”
“...ridiculous Of course this isn t the first time Gossip Cop has had to call out CDL for concocting a nonexistent love triangle between the stars...”
“...the outlet s report being entirely baseless Gossip Cop still checked in with a rep for Pitt who exclusively assures us the story is totally false The actor s reason for not attending the Academy Awards had absolutely nothing to do with Aniston or Theroux and the claim otherwise is...”
“...that he just wanted to avoid seeing Jennifer Aniston with her husband Justin Theroux The unreliable webloid further claims Obviously had Brad gone to the Oscars he would have felt some regret when he saw his ex wife happily married to another man when he was single and depressed Despite...”
“Pitt produced Best Picture winner Moonlight but the site purports that he didn t attend the awards show because he couldn t bear the spotlight so he stayed home skulking Without a single source to back up its claim the repeatedly discredited website adds There s also a high chance...”
“We’re told it’s “totally false.”“Brad Pitt Skips 2017 Oscars After Angelina Jolie Divorce: Couldn’t Bear To See Ex Jennifer Aniston Happy With Justin Theroux?” blares a new Celeb Dirty Laundry headline.”
“Gossip Cop can exclusively debunk this claim.”
“Postby Guest » Mon Mar 06, 2017 2:43 am(Getty Images)Brad Pitt did NOT skip the 2017 Oscars because he wanted to avoid seeing Jennifer Aniston and Justin Theroux, despite a bogus webloid report.”


"This latest story is also false."
"The scandal police also exposed the rhetoric on the website about Aniston trying to make Ruth look like Pete."
"We've previously revealed that nerd lied that seru warned Pete to stay away from Aniston."
“…… Ironically, this is not the first time that the gossip police have called CDL for fabricating a nonexistent love triangle between stars... "
“… The media reports are totally groundless rumors. The police are still in contact with one of Pete's representatives. He exclusively assures us that the story is completely wrong. The reason why the actors don't attend the Oscars has nothing to do with Aniston or Cyrus, otherwise it is said that... "
“… He just wanted to avoid seeing Jennifer Aniston with her husband Justin Cyrus. The unreliable webworm further claimed that it was obvious that if Brad went to the Oscars, when he saw his ex-wife happily married another man when she was single, he would feel some regret, even though he was very depressed... "
"Pete produced the best picture award winner moonlight, but the website claimed that he did not attend the award ceremony because he couldn't stand the spotlight, so he stayed at home and hid, without a single source to support his claim. The website added that there was also a high chance..."
"We were told it was" totally wrong. " "After Angelina Jolie's divorce, Brad Pitt skipped the 2017 Oscars: can't bear to see former Jennifer Aniston and Justin Cyrus happy together? "Bragging about a new celebrity's dirty clothes title."
"The gossip police can completely expose this statement."
"On Monday, March 6, 2017, at 2:43 a.m. (Getty Images), Brad Pitt didn't skip the 2017 Oscars because he wanted to avoid seeing Jennifer Aniston and Justin Cyrus, despite a false weblog report."



Number  166
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“[Images via...”
“— JustinBieberCrew.com (@JBCrewdotcom) May 29, 2015If i ever see a RT on my TL from @HollywoodLife you’re getting automatically blocked i don’t want to see any of their nonsense anymore.”
“Among the claims Bieber found so “ridiculous” in the site’s subsequent report was a quote from a so-called “source” which alleged, “[Justin and Selena’s] pastors are pretty much all married and they married very young.”
“The pair were also reportedly seen at Hillsong Church in Los Angeles on May 24.”
“...meet in Los Angeles on Wednesday May 27”
“...he s defending their church which is important not only to him but her too Laura PraiseNDream May 29 2015 In typical Hollywood Life fashion the blog exploited Bieber and Gomez s Internet igniting joint appearance in a Snapchat story posted by Pastor Rich Wilkerson Jr from a church related...”
“...he wasn’t being mean to her at all.”
“— Irene (@Tanziirene) May 29, 2015selena stans need to chill.”
“...it suck on that HollywoodLife...”
“Whether the blog intends to remove the rest of its extensive Jelena content remains to be seen.”


"[image passed..."
“—  justinbiebercruw.com Website (@ jbcrewdotcom) on may 292015, if I see RT on the TL of @ Hollywood life, you will be automatically blocked. I don't want to see their nonsense any more. "
"In a subsequent report on the website, Bieber found that one of the so-called" absurd "statements was to quote a so-called" source "saying that" almost all the priests (Justin and Selena) were married, and they were very young when they got married. "
"It is reported that on May 24, they were also seen at the hillsson Church in Los Angeles."
“… Meeting in Los Angeles on Wednesday, May 27 "
“… He is defending their church, which is very important not only to him, but also to her. On May 29, 2015, Laura presendrem, with a typical Hollywood lifestyle, took advantage of the Internet of Bieber and Gomez to make a joint appearance in a church related snapchat story published by rich Wilkerson Jr
"He was not mean to her at all."
"- Irene (@ tanziirene) May 29, 2015 Selena stans needs to calm down."
“… It's very attractive to people in Hollywood... "
"It remains to be seen whether the blog intends to delete the rest of its massive Jelena content."



Number  167
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“He was a special man.”
“He helped spark my interest in classic films.”
“He knew movies.”
“He came on my podcast.”
“2017 I went on his tcm show...”
“I will miss him dearly Here a sampling of remembrances from friends colleagues and many others I LOVED HIM SO MUCH IS BROKEN I KNEW HE WOULDNT COME BACK BUT STILL HOPED IT HASNT BEEN THE SAME WITHOUT HIM NOR WILL IT EVER BE RIP BOBBY Cher cher March 6”
“He brought so much joy to people around the world by sharing his knowledge and love of film.”
“Robert was an endearing and talented man.”
““I have wonderful memories of being interviewed by him and answering his insightful questions.”
“Saint told Deadline in a statement...”


"He's a special person."
"He helped stimulate my interest in classic movies."
"He knows movies."
"He's on my podcast."
"In 2017, I participated in his Chinese medicine Exhibition..."
"I'll miss the memories of his friends, colleagues and many other people here. I love him so much that I know he won't come back, but I still hope it won't be the same without him, and it will never be rip Bobbie shell on March 6."
"By sharing his knowledge and love of movies, he has brought so much happiness to people all over the world."
"Robert is a lovely genius."
"I have good memories of accepting his interview and answering his insightful questions."
"The sage told me in a statement the deadline..."



Number  168
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“A second insider countered that The Weeknd (real name Abel Tesfaye) “trusted Selena, but he really didn’t trust Justin.””
“But Selena always had feelings for Justin,” a source told Us at the time.”
“In her cover story for the magazine’s December 9 issue, she opened up for the first time about her amicable split from The Weeknd and reigniting her on-off relationship with Justin Bieber.”
““Something that I’m really proud of is that there’s such a true friendship [between us],” the “Bad Liar” singer, 25, said of her October breakup with The Weeknd, 27, whom she dated for 10 months.”
““I truly have never experienced anything like that in my life.”
“We ended it as best friends, and it was genuinely about encouraging and caring [for each other], and that was pretty remarkable for me.”As for Bieber, 23, entering her life once again, Gomez said, “I’m 25.”
“I’m not 18, or 19, or 20.”
“I cherish people who have really impacted my life.”
“So maybe before, it could have been forcing something that wasn’t right.”
“But that doesn’t mean caring for someone ever goes away.”That goes for “people in general,” she added.”


A second insider retorted that weekend (real name Abel tesfield) "trusted Serena, but he really didn't trust Justin."
"But Serena always had feelings for Justin," a source told us at the time
"In the cover story of the magazine on December 9, she disclosed for the first time her friendly breakup with the weekend and rekindled her off and on relationship with Justin Bieber."
"What I'm really proud of is that [we] have such a sincere friendship," the 25-year-old "bad liar" singer said of her breakup with weeknd, 27, who she dated for 10 months, in October
"I really have never experienced such a thing."
"We ended it with our best friend, which was sincere encouragement and care, which was quite amazing to me." As for Bieber, 23, entering her life again, Gomez said, "I'm 25."
"I'm not 18, I'm not 19, I'm not 20."
"I cherish the people who really influence my life."
"So, maybe before, it might have been forcing others to do something wrong."
"But that doesn't mean caring about a person is gone forever." She added, "that's what most people do."



Number  169
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“David Letterman: Retired Host Risks Fortune On Gambling Obsession“Dave is a legend in the TV business and will be fighting with Stephen Colbert and Jimmy Fallon to get the biggest and most interesting guests.””
“He will only interview people he wants to talk with, and no one better tell him to shave his beard,” a tattletale whispered to The National ENQUIRER’s own Rob Shuter.”
“He has made it clear that if he returns he will do it his way.”
““Dave is refusing to shave his beard.”
“David Letterman is returning to TV with a new six-episode series on Netflix, but the talk show legend won’t look like his old self!”


"David Letterman: Retired host takes a gamble." David is a TV legend who will compete with Stephen Colbert and Jimmy Fallon for the biggest and most interesting guests
"He only interviews people he wants to talk to, and no one tells him it's best to shave," one tweeter whispered to rob Schutter of the national inquirer
"He has made it clear that if he comes back, he will do it his way."
"Dave refused to shave."
David Letterman will launch a new six episode series on Netflix, but the talk show legend will no longer be like him



**Something goes wrong**
“Longoria wore a white dress designed by best friend Victoria Beckham and her hair was styled by Ken Paves.”
“...in Valle de Bravo Mexico a lakeside town roughly 88 miles from Mexico City...”
“He is probably one of the first men I ve dated that has been older and established and basically a grown up It is so nice to be arm in arm with someone who is your equal Image zoom Credit Barcroft Media The pair got married in a sunset ceremony...”
““I want to yell from the highest mountaintop about everything that goes on with us because I’m so happy and excited to be with a person as kind as Pepe is,” said Longoria.”
“!’ ” Longoria spent the next two-and-a-half years getting to know the father of three, who proposed to her on December 15, 2015 during a trip to Dubai.”
“I thought, ‘Who is this guy?”
““He was so charismatic, charming, sweet and funny.”
““He was the most handsome man I’d ever seen,” Longoria said of the president of Latin media brand Televisa.”
“The second time she met Bastón, she said, “It was like the cliché angels singing and there was a glow around him and it was immediate chemistry.”The pair went on a four-hour lunch date the very next day.”
“Image zoom Credit: Dave Benett“I had no memory of meeting him the first time, but we had immediate sparks,” Longoria, 42, said.”


"Longoria is wearing a white dress designed by her friend Victoria Beckham and her hair is designed by Ken Pavis."
“… In Mexico's Bravo Valley, a lakeside town, about 88 miles from Mexico City... "
"He's probably one of the earliest men I've ever dated. He's old and basically grown up. It's great to be able to hold hands with someone who looks like you. Barkroft media, they got married at the sunset ceremony... "
"I want to shout what happened between us on the top of the mountain, because I feel very happy and excited to be with Pepe," Longoria said
"!" langlia met the father of three in the next two and a half years, and he proposed to her while traveling in Dubai on December 15, 2015. "
"Who is this guy, I think?"
"He's charming, charming, cute, funny."
"He's the most handsome man I've ever met," Longoria said of the president of the Latin media brand Televisa
"The second time I saw Baston, she said," it's like an old angel singing. There's a kind of light around him, and there's a chemical reaction immediately. "The next day, they had a four hour lunch date."
"I don't remember seeing him for the first time, but we had a spark right away," Longoria, 42, said



Number  171
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“...of death has been confirmed...”
“MORE Louis Theroux reveals the one topic he won t investigate because he s too darn scared MORE TOWIE s Gemma Collins admits she had unprotected sex with James Arg Argent in a bid to get pregnant MORE George Michael s funeral can finally take place now that his cause...”
“Ed Sheeran hangs out with his best friend Taylor Swift’s ex Tom HiddlestonThe 26-year-old singer has confessed that being best friends with Taylor Swift allowed him to get close to (read: have sex with) lots of beautiful women, particularly when he was supporting her on tour.”
“Suffolk-born Ed, who counts Selena Gomez and Ellie Goulding among his former conquests, seems beyond grateful to Taylor for this, which might explain the ‘arts and crafts’ Christmas presents he sends to her.”
“WTF.”
“Ed with Taylor and Selena, one of which he’s been romantically linked to, last year (Picture: Getty)Ed told Rolling Stone of his wingwoman: ‘Taylor’s world is celebrity.”
“I was this 22-year-old awkward British kid going on tour with the biggest artist in America, who has all these famous mates.”
“‘It was very easy [wooing the ladies].”
“I would often find myself in situations just kind of waking up and looking over and being like, “How the f**k did that happen?”.’AdvertisementAdvertisementGushing further about Taylor, Ed added: ‘She would be there if everything ended for me.”
“Taylor is kind of an anomaly in that sense.”


“… The news of death has been confirmed... "
"More Louis seru revealed a topic that he would not investigate, because he was too scared. More Tovey Gemma Collins admitted that she had unprotected sex with James Arkin. In order to get pregnant, more funerals of George Michael could finally be carried out, and now his career..."
"Ed Sheeran is with his best friend, Tyler Swift's former Tom sidleston. The 26 year old singer admitted that being best friends with Taylor Swift allowed him to get close to a lot of beautiful women, especially when he supported her on tour
"Ed, who was born in Suffolk, counts Serena Gomez and Ellie gulding as one of his former trophies. He seems to be very grateful to Taylor for this, which may explain the" crafts "Christmas gift he gave her."
“WTF。”
"Ed has a romantic relationship with Tyler and Selena, one of them. Last year (photo: Getty) ed told rolling stone his girlfriend: 'Tyler's world is a celebrity.'"
"I'm a clumsy 22-year-old British kid, touring with the biggest artist in the United States, and he has so many famous partners."
"It's easy."
"I often find myself in such a situation, just waking up, looking, and saying," how does f * * k happen? Ed went on to talk about Taylor, adding: "if it's all over for me, she'll be there."
"In that sense, Taylor is a different kind of person."



Number  172
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“I think he killed himself with drugs and alcohol and buried himself in an addiction to hide the fact that he didn’t feel what he was projecting on the outside.”
“I wish I could feel that way.’ Well, I don’t think Chris Farley did feel that way.”
“"I always had thought my strongest ability was improvisational comedy," he says.”
“Slowly he worked to at least make these roles funnier.”
“"I looked like the guy—like Johnny in The Karate Kid, you know?"”
“What do you mean?”
“Physically, I looked like an asshole."”
“"Looking back, I think I know why.”
“He’s had a quick shower and has lit a cigar—some combination of late-morning pleasure and character prep for his next movie, The Magnificent Seven.”
“That was my bread and butter for a long time," he says.”


"I think he committed suicide with drugs and alcohol and buried himself in a drug addiction to cover up the fact that he didn't feel what he was projecting."
"I wish I could feel that way." Well, I don't think Chris Farley feels that way
"I always thought my greatest ability was improvisation," he said
"Slowly, he at least tried to make the characters more interesting."
"I look like Johnny from the karate kid, you know?"
"What do you mean?"
"Physically, I look like an asshole."
"Looking back, I think I know why."
"He took a shower, lit a cigar, and combined the joy of the morning with the preparation for the role in the next movie," the seven. "
"That was my livelihood for a long time," he said



Number  173
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Within weeks she would announce that she'd left husband of 13 years, Gavin Rossdale.”
“...going through the exact same thing...”
“Stefani his Voice cohort who he d paid little notice to throughout their first season together in 2014 I mean she was on the show high five and good to see ya he recalled approached him and whispered she was...”
“But after he and his fellow country powerhouse, 34, revealed the end of their four-year marriage in 2016, a surprising thing happened.”
“Yeah, going through his second divorce in a decade—this time from Miranda Lambert, the woman who'd loudly proclaimed such a separation wasn't an option—was admittedly not great.”
“Beyond being 100 percent authentic, the union, says the five-time Country Music Association Male Vocalist of the Year, is quite simply the best thing that ever happened to him.”
“...on by any claims that it s not the real deal...”
“His relationship with Stefani once brushed off by skeptics as a sure to be short lived rebound or so over the top that it simply must be fake has rolled past the two and a half year mark and right...”
“No doubt, though, he'll be celebrating more than just turning 42.”


"In a few weeks, she will announce that she has left Gavin Rossdale, her husband of 13 years."
“… Going through exactly the same thing... "
"Stefani was his dubbing partner. In their first season together in 2014, he paid little attention to her. I mean, she was on high five. It's nice to meet you. He recalled that he approached him and whispered that she was..."
"But after he and his 34 year old colleague revealed that their four-year marriage ended in 2016, a surprising thing happened."
"Yes, this time he divorced Miranda Lambert for the second time in ten years, and the woman who declared that such separation was not a choice was undeniably not great."
"In addition to 100 percent authenticity, the league, the five time country music association male singer of the year, said it was the best thing that ever happened to him."
“…… If someone says it's not a real deal... "
"His relationship with Stephanie was once thought by skeptics to be a short-term rebound, or surpassing the peak, which must be false, but now it's two and a half years, right..."
"But there's no doubt he's celebrating more than 42."



Number  174
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Email us at tips@radaronline.com, or call us at 800-344-9598 any time, day or night.”
“After this Longoria scandal, what will love-struck Holmes think?”
“Katie Holmes’ boyfriend Jamie Foxx was just caught partying with A-lister beauty Eva Longoria, RadarOnline.com has learned!”
“As Naughty Gossip reported, the duo was spotted getting very flirty during a private dinner with friends in New York City!”
““Jamie Foxx was having a night out with his besties, Jay Pharoah and Eva Longoria!”
“Jamie and Jay started off the evening together at Le District before the pair headed off to Eva Longoria’s dinner at Meatpacking District celebrity hotspot, Megu,” an eyewitness told Straight Shuter.”
“As Radar readers know, Holmes, 38, and Foxx, 49, have been an item ever since her divorce from Tom Cruise, 55, was finalized in 2012.”
“While they had been hiding their love for years, the duo finally went public!”
“Foxx has been caught in various cheating scandals as of late, prompting fans to believe he may not be that serious about his longtime girlfriend.”
“Longoria, 42, is also attached – and possibly pregnant!”


"Email us tips@radaronline.com , or call 800-344-9598 at any time. "
"What would Holmes think after the langelia scandal when he was hit by love?"
"Katie Holmes' boyfriend Jamie fox has just been caught hanging out with Eva Longoria, RadarOnline.com The website has learned! "
According to mischievous gossip, they were found to be very flirtatious when they had a private dinner with friends in New York
"Jamie Fox and his good friends Jay Farrow and Eva Longoria were out all night!"
"Jamie and Jay set out together at le district in the evening, and then they went to Eva Longoria dinner at megu, a celebrity hot spot in the meat processing zone," a witness told Reuters
Readers of radar magazine know that Sherlock Holmes, 38, and fox, 49, have been the focus of attention since her divorce from Tom Cruise, 55, in 2012
"Although they concealed their love for many years, they finally made it public!"
"Fox has been involved in all kinds of cheating scandals recently, which makes fans believe that he may not take his old girlfriend so seriously."
Langlia, 42, is in a relationship and may be pregnant! "



Number  175
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Veranda Unveils The couple's real-estate portfolio has five properties around the world — a "home they bought in 2012 in L.A.'s Brentwood neighborhood, a Manhattan apartment, a Hamptons estate and a mansion in London's upscale Belsize Park neighborhood, which they bought from Kate Winslet in 2004.”
“Real Estate:The couple's kitchen in their Los Angeles home.”
“So every year these guys go out on tour, they will sell out giant arenas and will make tons of money.”
“"With musicians like Coldplay it depends on touring, which is where they make the big money.”
“News.”
“Facebook/The Voice "Chris Martin is clearly the bigger earner in the relationship," Dorothy Pomerantz, L.A. bureau chief for Forbes, told E!”
“Chris Martin:Chris Martin, who makes most of his money off concert tours, just joined NBC's "The Voice."”
“Let's break it down.”
“So where's all the dough coming from?”
“14 with $64 million.”


Veranda announced the couple's real estate portfolio, and they own five properties around the world - a "house they bought in Brentwood, Los Angeles, in 2012, an apartment in Manhattan, a Hampton estate and a high-end bell Park in London Park, which they bought in 2004 from Kate Winslet. "
"The real legacy: the couple in the kitchen of their Los Angeles home
"So every year when these guys go out on tour, they sell the colossal arena and make a lot of money."
"For musicians like Coldplay, it depends on the tour, and the tour is where they make a lot of money."
"News."
Dorothy Pomerantz, President of Forbes Los Angeles, is accepting e
"Chris Martin: Chris Martin, who makes most of his income from concerts, just joined NBC's" the voice "
"Let's break it down."
"And where did the money come from?"
"14 years, 64 million dollars."



Number  176
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Email us at tips@radaronline.com, or call us at (866) ON-RADAR (667-2327) any time, day or night.”
“Do you have a story for RadarOnline.com?”
“We pay for juicy info!”
“But this time things spiraled out of control, and Jen flipped out,” a source tattled to Radar.”
““It was a stupid argument — the kind of disagreement most couples have.”
“The vicious bust-up at their Bel-Air mansion on Dec. 14 was “the fight to end all fights,” according to the informant — who saw a furious Justin storm out and head to a luxury hotel.”
“An insider claimed the incident sent the two hurtling toward a $225 million divorce.”
“...had spent two and a half months apart...”
“But this kind of behavior is not exactly going to help them get their relationship back on track As Radar previously reported exclusively according to a source the duo s two year marriage was on the brink and erupted in a face to face showdown over the holidays after they...”
““It’s just Jen’s latest way of controlling him,” claims the informant.”


"Email us tips@radaronline.com , or call the (866) radar (667-2327) at any time. "
"Do you have a story to tell RadarOnline.com ？”
"We pay for interesting information!"
"But this time it's out of control, Zhan suddenly out of control," a source told radar
"It's a stupid argument - most couples have such differences."
"On December 14, the fight they had at the bellelle mansion was" the fight to end all the fights, "according to the source, who saw the angry Justin rush out to a luxury hotel
"An insider said the incident quickly led to a $225 million divorce."
“…… Two and a half months apart... "
"But this kind of behavior can't completely help their relationship get back on track. As radar reported exclusively before, according to a source, their two-year marriage was on the verge of breaking up, and a face-to-face showdown broke out during the holiday, and then they..."
"It's just Jane's latest way of controlling him," the source claimed



Number  177
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“According to Radar Online, the Olympic gold medalist’s gal pal has been “begging” for a child — and Caitlyn hasn’t necessarily turned down the idea to grow her brood once again.”
“The 68-year-old is said to be thinking about adopting a baby with rumored girlfriend Sophia Hutchins.”
“...on the brain...”
“Now that Caitlyn Jenner is finally living life as her authentic self word has it the reality star is planning to expand her family by adopting a new baby Caitlyn Jenner may already be the parent of six kids and six grandchildren but it seems like she still has baby...”
“Is that the pitter-patter of tiny footsteps we hear in the distance?”


"According to radar online, the Olympic gold medalist's girlfriend has been" begging "for a child - and Caitlin may not refuse to raise a child again."
"The 68 year old is said to be considering adopting a child with his rumored girlfriend, Sophia Hutchins."
“… In the brain... "
"Now that Caitlin Jenner has finally lived her real life, the reality TV star is planning to expand her family by adopting a new baby. Caitlin Jenner may have been the parent of six children and six grandchildren, but she still seems to have children..."
"Is that the little step we heard in the distance?"



Number  178
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“In the process, the scammers would ask victims to surrender their personal identification documents, bank cards and passwords.”
“During the ceremony the woman and the man signed a real marriage document file photo After signing the marriage certificate the woman said she was told by the alleged scammer that they could ask the mayor to void the marriage record She was given a week of free training in...”
“The 21-year-old woman, who has not been named, said she was told to play the role of a bride in a mock wedding in Fuzhou, Fujian province to complete her training to become a wedding planner.”
“However, during the ceremony in June, she and a man of similar age signed a genuine marriage certificate at a local government office and were officially married.”
“The young woman from Hong Kong (centre) has claimed that she was scammed into marrying a complete stranger in Fuzhou city, mainland China during a simulated weddingShe only realised she had been tricked upon returning to Hong Kong, where a friend told her it was a marriage scam.”
“Due to lack of evidence that a crime had taken place, the Hong Kong police were unable to step in.”
“The victim therefore sought help from the Hong Kong Federation of Trade Unions (FTU).”
“Wearing a mask, baseball cap and dark sunglasses, the woman told reporters at a press conference on Monday that she applied for a Facebook listing for a makeup artist apprenticeship in May.”
“The job offered an enticing monthly salary of HKD14,000 (£1,385) with free training and required no work experience, according to Apple Daily.”
“However, during the interview, the alleged scammer convinced her to apply for a wedding planner position instead, telling her that she could earn more money that way.”


"In this process, the swindler will ask the victim to hand over his personal identity card, bank card and password."
"At the wedding, the woman and the man signed a real marriage document file photo. After signing the marriage certificate, the woman said that the alleged swindler told her that they could ask the mayor to cancel the marriage record, and she was given a week of free training... "
"The 21-year-old woman, who did not give her name, said that at a simulated wedding in Fuzhou, Fujian, she was told to play the role of bride, complete her training and become a wedding planner."
"However, at the wedding in June this year, she and a man of the same age signed a real marriage certificate in the local government office and officially married."
The young woman from Hongkong claimed that she was tricked into marriage to a completely unknown person in Fuzhou, Chinese mainland. She realized that she was cheated back to Hongkong. A friend told her that it was a marriage fraud.
"Due to the lack of evidence that the crime has occurred, the Hong Kong police can not intervene."
"The victims therefore sought the help of the Hong Kong Federation of trade unions."
"The woman, wearing a mask, baseball cap and sunglasses, told reporters at a news conference on Monday that she applied for a Facebook list of makeup artist apprentices in May."
According to the apple daily, the job pays as much as 14000 Hong Kong dollars (1385 pounds) a month and offers free training without any work experience
"However, during the interview, the alleged swindler persuaded her to apply for a wedding planning position instead, telling her that she could make more money."



Number  179
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“For the latest celebrity news and interviews, subscribe to our new podcast "In Case You Missed Us" below!”
“For access to all our exclusive celebrity videos and interviews – Subscribe on YouTube!”
“Finalizing the divorce has been a long process because of it.”For more on Garner and Affleck’s post-divorce relationship, pick up the new issue of Us Weekly, on stands now!”
““Jen is hesitant to sign off until she’s certain that the kids will be in the best hands at all time.”
““The one thing she’s not flexible on is sobriety,” the source tells Us.”
“They both want what’s best for the kids and have made a commitment to see that through.”While the estranged couple filed for divorce in 2017, the paperwork has yet to be finalized, partially due to Affleck’s past struggles with alcohol abuse.”
“She tends to find out about things, and Ben is very open with her.”
““She wants him to be honest and he usually is.”
“According to the insider, “Ben understands and has honored her request.”“They’re good friends,” the source adds.”
“As a result, the source notes that one of reasons the Love, Simon actress does not want the Saturday Night Live producer around her kids is “the fact that Ben had an affair with her.”However, the exes are keeping the peace.”


For the latest celebrity news and interviews, subscribe to our new podcast "in case you miss us" below
"To access all of our exclusive celebrity videos and interviews, subscribe on YouTube!"
"The final determination of divorce is a long process, because it's not easy." More about the relationship between Ghana and Affleck after their divorce, pick up a new issue of American weekly, in the stands
"Jane is hesitant to sign until she is sure that the children are always in the best care."
"One thing she's inflexible about is being sober," the source told us
"They all want what's best for their children and promise to stick to it." Although the separated couple filed for divorce in 2017, the paperwork has yet to be finalized, in part because Affleck has been fighting alcoholism in the past
"She likes to know something, and Ben is very honest with her."
"She wants him to be honest, and he's usually honest."
"According to people familiar with the matter," Ben understood and respected her request. "They are good friends," the source added
As a result, the source pointed out that one of the reasons why the heroine of love Simon didn't want the producer of live on Saturday night to be with her children was "the fact that Ben had an affair with her.". However, the ex girlfriends remained silent



Number  180
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“They know everything about each other, and she’s happier than ever.” We’re just glad Eissa is okay!”
““She’s comfortable with him.”
““Janet’s taking it slowly, but yes, she and Jermaine are dating,” an insider recently In Touch.”
“Now, Janet is allegedly dating her ex-boyfriend Jermaine Dupri, whom she previously dated from 2002 until 2009.”
““She thought he had become too controlling during the pregnancy and she had already allowed him to dictate her appearance and even the way she performed at concerts,” a source told Page Six.”
“It was subsequently reported that Janet felt like a “prisoner” in her own marriage.”
“We are in court and the rest is in God’s hands,” Janet told her concerned fans at the time.”
““I just want to keep it real for you guys for a second — yes I separated from my husband.”
“Janet and Wissam previously married in 2012 and split in April 2017, just three months after Eissa was born in January 2017.”
““[She was] terrified by his behavior and locked herself in a bathroom, so she could contact Janet,” he told the news outlet.”


"They know everything about each other, and she's happier than ever." We're just happy that Asha's OK! "
"She's comfortable with him."
"Janet takes her time, but yes, she and Jermaine are dating," said a recent insider
"Now, Janet is said to be dating her ex boyfriend Jermaine Dupree, who dated from 2002 to 2009."
A source told page 6: "she thinks he became too restrained during pregnancy and she has allowed him to dominate her appearance, even the way she performs at concerts."
"It was later reported that Janet felt like a prisoner in her marriage."
"We're in court, the rest is in God's hands," Janet told fans she cared about at the time
"I just want to be real for you for a second - yes, my husband and I are separated."
"Janet and vissam married in 2012 and broke up in April 2017, only three months after Asha was born in January 2017."
"(she) was frightened by his behavior and locked herself in the bathroom so she could contact Janet," he told the news media



Number  181
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Email us at tips@radaronline.com, or call us at 800-344-9598 any time, day or night.”
“Do you have a story for RadarOnline.com?”
“We pay for juicy info!”
“West’s music career is currently on hold after he quit the Tidal music streaming service amid a messy legal battle with Jay-Z.”
“To make matters worse Kardashian is still recovering from her infamous Paris robbery as she tries to juggle being a mom, reality star and managing her business empire.”
““She’s basically settled for a sexless marriage, while Kanye mopes around hoping for a miracle.”Kim, 36, stood by her 40-year-old husband when he went through a very public meltdown late last year, but the marriage never seemed to recover.”
“Kim’s telling people she doesn’t have the time or energy to keep the spark alive in the bedroom anymore with two young kids and another on the way.”
“An insider told Radar: “Kim booted Kanye to the spare room blaming his snoring, but there’s way more to it than that.”“The truth is that they’ve lost that spark and never recovered it.”
“The news comes as a blow after they called off a potential divorce earlier this summer, and had been doing couple’s therapy.”
“Kim Kardashian and Kanye West are no longer sleeping in the same bed, RadarOnline.com can reveal.”


"Email us tips@radaronline.com , or call 800-344-9598 at any time. "
"Do you have a story to tell RadarOnline.com ？”
"We pay for interesting information!"
"Due to a legal dispute with Jay-Z, West withdrew from the Chaozhou music streaming service, and his music career is now on hold."
"To make matters worse, Kardashian is still recovering from her infamous Paris robbery, trying to be a mother, a reality TV star and run her own business empire."
"She has basically accepted a asexual marriage, while Kanye is depressed, hoping for a miracle." Kim, 36, stood by his 40 year old husband at the end of last year after a public breakdown, but the marriage never seemed to recover
"Kim told people that she didn't have the time and energy to keep the spark alive in her bedroom, two children and another on the way."
"Kim kicked Kanye into the spare room and accused him of snoring, but that's more than that," an insider told radar "The fact is that they have lost their spark and never recovered."
The news that they cancelled a possible divorce agreement earlier this summer and have been doing psychotherapy for the couple is a blow to them
"Kim Kardashian and Kanye West no longer sleep in the same bed, RadarOnline.com Website "I can reveal."



Number  182
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Says the insider, “They’ve been hanging out the past few weeks.”For the latest news on other hot couples, pick up the new issue of Us Weekly, on stands now!”
““And they were in a private room.”The insider says Hadid has been spending a lot of time with the Tampa, Florida-born basketball pro, who once romanced her pal Kendall Jenner.”
““It was a big crew,” notes an onlooker.”
“...lost to the New York Knicks...”
“The sought after model she enjoyed a brief dalliance with rapper Drake in October and the 25 year old University of Missouri alum joined his teammate Brandon Ingram models Hailey Baldwin and Camila Morrone singer Justine Skye and other pals at NYC s Zuma December 12 after the Laker s...”
““They are slowly starting to hang out again.”But now the 21-year-old stunner, who’s walked the runway for Balmain, Chanel and Marc Jacobs, has started “hooking up” with Los Angeles Laker guard Jordan Clarkson, an insider claims in the new issue of Us Weekly.”
““They text nonstop and are totally in love,” the source told Us Weekly at the time.”
“In November, a source revealed the model was “still talking” to ex The Weeknd, 27.”
“A new suitor is courting Bella Hadid.”


"They've been together for the past few weeks," the person said For the latest news about other lovers, let's take a look at the new issue of American weekly
"They're in a private room." People familiar with the matter said Hadid spent a lot of time with the Tampa, Florida born professional basketball player, who had fallen in love with her friend Kendall Jenner
"It's a huge team," one bystander said
“… Lost to the New York Knicks... "
"The sought after model briefly flirted with rapper Drake in October last year, and the 25-year-old University of Missouri alumni met with teammate Brandon Ingram, model Hailey Baldwin and singer Justine of Camilla Morrone on December 12 Skye) and other friends played for the Lakers in Zuma, New York... "
"They're starting to interact slowly again." But now the 21-year-old stuntman, on the shows for balman, chanel and mark Jacobs, has begun to "hook up" with Los Angeles Lakers guard Jordan Clarkson, an insider said in a new issue of us weekly
"They text all the time and fall in love," the source told us at the time
"Last November, a source revealed that the model was" still talking to her ex girlfriend "during the week of the 27th
"A new suitor is pursuing Bella Hadid."



Number  183
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Wow, and he’s a senator?”Kennedy did not respond to a request for comment from Gossip Cop.”
“Tell me, does he have a family member or friend with a former addiction problem?”
“How dare he associate Lindsay with this case?”
““His comment and analogy was inappropriate, slanderous and unwarranted.”
““Dina and I are seeking legal counsel for Lindsay regarding the slanderous comments and unprofessional behavior of Senator John Kennedy,” Michael Lohan said.”
“Her father told the celebrity website Gossip Cop that he and his ex-wife plan to take legal action against Kennedy.”
“...with drugs and alcohol...”
“Kennedy added You realize to many Americans right now that looks like we re giving Lindsay Lohan the keys to the minibar Smith paused for a moment before responding I understand your point The Mean Girls star originally of Cold Spring Harbor and Merrick has spoken about her past struggles...”
““Why in the world should you get a no-bid contract right now?” Sen. Ben Sasse (R-Nebraska) asked Smith.”
“The deal could reap profits for the company as a result of the hack.”


"Wow, he's a senator? "Kennedy did not respond to requests for comment from the gossip police."
"Tell me, did any of his family members or friends ever have a drug problem?"
"How dare he associate Lindsay with this case?"
"His comments and analogies are inappropriate, defamatory and groundless."
"Dina and I are seeking legal counsel for Lindsay to defend Senator John F. Kennedy's libel and unprofessional behavior," Michael Rohan said
"Her father told celebrity website gossip police that he and his ex-wife planned to take legal action against Kennedy."
“… Drugs and alcohol... "
"Kennedy added that you now realize that many Americans think it's as if we're going to give Lindsay Lohan the key to the mini bar. Smith pauses for a moment and then replies," I see what you mean. It turns out that the mean girl star of Cold Spring Harbor and Merrick talked about her past struggles... "
"Why on earth do you want to get a non-standard contract now? "Nebraska Senator Ben Sasser asked Smith."
"Due to hacker attacks, this deal may bring profits to the company."



Number  184
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“HollywoodLifers, do you think Kylie and Travis will wait until after the baby is born to finally acknowledge that they’re parents?”
“Who would have thought these two would be the opposite.”
“We’ve got EXCLUSIVE details on how he’s learning how to change diapers from Kim and Kourtney Kardashian.”
“Kylie Jenner, 20, is reportedly due to deliver her first child in just a few months and that’s giving baby daddy Travis Scott, 25, time to learn some hands-on infant care.”
“While most new fathers wouldn’t want to go near stinky diapers, the rapper is willing to give it a try and getting some help from moms Kim, 37, and Kourtney Kardashian, 38.”
““Travis has asked Kim and some of the other mothers in the Kardashian family how to change diapers, bottle feeding advice and other tips to help him prepare for the arrival of his new baby.”
“As the due date approaches, Kylie is happy with Travis’s commitment to be a hands on daddy and she is impressed with the steps he is taking to prepare himself for the arrival of their baby,” a source close to the Kardashians tells HollywoodLife.com EXCLUSIVELY.”
““Travis has reached out to his own family, but it has also given him a chance to connect with Kim and Kourtney who have been helpful with advice and what not to do.”
“While Kourtney has given Travis and Kylie a list of which all organic and natural products with their sensitive baby, Kim was a little more casual with her advice.”
“Kim joked with Travis that as long as he gets out of bed in the middle of the night when the baby starts to cry, he is doing more than many husbands do,” our insider adds.”


"Hollywood actresses, do you think Kelly and Travis will wait until their children are born to admit that they are parents?"
"Who would have thought the two would be opposite."
"We had an exclusive report on how he learned how to change diapers from Kim and Courtney Kardashian."
"Kylie Jenner, 20, is reported to be giving birth to her first child in a few months, giving Travis Scott, 25, time to learn some practical baby care."
"While most new dads don't want to get close to smelly diapers, rappers are willing to give it a try and get some help from Mom Kim, 37, and Courtney Kardashian, 38."
"Travis has asked Kim and other Kardashian mothers for diaper changes, bottle feeding advice and other tips to help him prepare for the arrival of a new baby."
"With the due date approaching, Kelly is very happy that Travis has promised to be a father herself. She is deeply impressed by the measures Travis has taken to welcome the arrival of the child," a source close to the Kardashian couple told reporters
"Travis has reached out to his family, but it has also given him a chance to get in touch with Kim and coultney, who have helped with advice and things he shouldn't do."
"Although Courtney gave Travis and Kelly a list of all their sensitive babies' organic and natural products, Kim's advice to her was more casual."
Our insider added: "Kim and Travis joke that as long as he gets up in the middle of the night, when the baby starts crying, he does more than many husbands."



Number  185
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“At the time, the talk show host called herself "the luckiest girl in the world."”
“The talk show host's monologue took a more serious turn -- at least for a little while -- when she shot down the rumors.”
“How do we know?”
“DeGeneres said so herself.”
“The 55-year-old comedian took some time out of her talk show on Wednesday to address rumors that have surfaced in the last several months suggesting she and de Rossi are split-bound.”
“"The other day I was at the hair salon getting these extensions put in," DeGeneres joked.”
“"And there were tabloids all over the hair salon... and on one of them, Portia and I were in the top right-hand corner.”
“And I thought, 'Oh that's so sweet, they're honoring us.'”
“But then I read the headline underneath.”
“And it said, 'Ellen and Portia Marriage Crumbles.'”


"At that time, talk show hosts called themselves" the luckiest girl in the world. "
"The talk show host's monologue took a more serious turn - at least for a while - and she refuted the rumors."
"How do we know?"
"That's what DeGeneres himself said."
"The 55 year old comedian spent some time on Wednesday's talk show dealing with rumors that have surfaced in the past few months suggesting that she and de Rossi are going their separate ways."
"The other day I put these extensions in at the hairdresser's," DeGeneres joked
"The hair salon is full of tabloids... One of them, Portia and I are in the upper right corner. "
"I thought," Oh, great, they're respecting us. "
"But then I looked at the title below."
"It says," Ellen and Portia's marriage is broken. "



Number  186
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Tell us below!”
“HollywoodLifers, how do YOU think The Weeknd should propose to Selena?”
“The Weeknd and Selena Gomez may be getting married soon, as HollywoodLife.com has EXCLUSIVELY learned he’s planning an epic proposal.”
““After just a few weeks of dating, The Weeknd already knew that he and Selena [Gomez] had something super special.”
“Abel’s been in love before, and he’s been in lust on a whole bunch of occasions — but his feelings for Selena are in a whole other league.”
“Even though he knew it sounded crazy, the day after his first date with Selena, Abel vowed to [his best friend Lamar Taylor] that he had met the girl he was going to marry.”
“And, the more he’s gotten to know Selena, the more sure of that he becomes,” a source close to The Weeknd tells HollywoodLife.com EXCLUSIVELY.”
“OMG!”
“Isn’t that just the sweetest thing you’ve ever heard?!”
“We’re dying.”


"Tell us next!"
"Holly bugs, how do you think you should propose to Selena this weekend?"
"The weekend and Selena Gomez may be getting married soon. Hollywood life already knows that he is planning an epic proposal."
"After just a few weeks of dating, people this weekend already know that he and Selena (Gomez) have something super special."
"Abe has been in love before. He has desires on many occasions, but his feelings for Selena are totally different."
"Although Abel knew it sounded crazy, the day after his first date with Selena, he swore to (his best friend Lamar Taylor) that he met the girl he was going to marry."
"Moreover, the more he knows about Serena, the more confident he will be," a source close to the weekend told reporters
"My God
"Isn't that the sweetest thing you've ever heard?"
"We're going to die."



Number  187
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“According to the outlet, the famous couple reached a custody settlement, in which they agreed to Affleck having joint custody of their three children, and a property settlement.”
“TMZ was first to report that the star checked into a treatment facility after Garner went to his Pacific Palisades home to sit down with him.”
““Lindsay had been supporting Ben’s sobriety and going to meetings with him.”
“She had him in meditation and they were doing it together,” a source close to the former couple told the outlet.”
““His recovery was something that was very important to both of them."”
“And though Shookus stood by Affleck s side for a little more than a year according to the source it became increasingly more complicated for her to keep up with her then boyfriend as he reportedly entered a more aggressive downward spiral during in the last few months of their...”
“...relationship...”
“Sadly, the Emmy Award-winning producer decided that it was best for her to take a step back from their relationship so that the "Argo" actor could focus more on himself and getting better.”
““It was very hard for her to break up with Ben, but she knew he wasn’t getting better and that it was time for her to step aside,” the source said to People.”
““She was trying to stay as close to him as possible so that he would stay on the right path, but ultimately it just wasn’t possible.”


According to media reports, the famous couple reached a custody agreement, agreed to Alfred raise three children together, and reached a property agreement
"TMZ was the first to report that the star went to the Pacific Palisades' home in Ghana, sat down with him and went to a treatment facility."
"Lindsay has always supported ben to stay awake and go to meetings with him."
"She made him meditate and they did it together," a source close to the former couple told the media
"His recovery is important for both of them."
"According to the source, although shokus supported Affleck for more than a year, it became more and more complicated for her to keep up with her then boyfriend, because it was reported that in the last few months of their relationship, he entered a more aggressive decline cycle..."
“… Relationship... "
Sadly, the Emmy winning producer decided it would be better to let her take a step back from the relationship so that the "Argo" actor could focus more on herself and become better
"It's hard for her to break up with Ben, but she knows he's not getting better and it's time for her to step down," the source told people
"She wanted to be as close to him as possible so that he could go the right way, but it was impossible in the end."



Number  188
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Nevertheless, we’re so excited to see what Selena and Justin do for his birthday.”
“Justin Bieber’s 24th birthday will certainly be a special one.”
“We’ve got EXCLUSIVE details on why the singer just wants to spend time with his special lady.”
“For most celebrities, birthdays are meant for blinged out jewelry and flashy cars.”
“But this year, Justin Bieber, who’s b-day is on March 1, is asking for a much more meaningful present.”
“And for those of you wondering if that involves Selena Gomez, you’re correct.”
““Justin gets to be in love and with the girl he has always wanted to be with for his birthday.”
“He doesn’t need any lavish gifts from her, he just wants to spend some alone time with her.”
“Granted if she has anything planned as a surprise for him he will love it because he loves spending any time he can with her.”
“He really is totally invested in their relationship,” a source close to JB tells HollywoodLife.com EXCLUSIVLEY.”


"Still, we're happy to see what Serena and Justin have done for his birthday."
"Justin Bieber's 24th birthday is going to be special."
"We have an exclusive report on why the singer only wants to be with his special woman."
"For most celebrities, birthdays are for jewelry and luxury cars."
"But this year, Justin Bieber's birthday is March 1, and he's asking for a more meaningful gift."
"For those who want to know if this involves Serena Gomez, you're right."
"Justin fell in love with the girl he always wanted to spend his birthday with."
"He doesn't need any luxury gifts from her. He just wants to be alone with her."
"Of course, if she's going to surprise him, he'll like it because he likes to be with her."
"He's really completely involved in their relationship," a source close to JB told reporters



Number  189
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“At the time, an unnamed source told Hollywood Life that Craig didn't want to be seen as a "poor victimized woman."”
“Twitter user @rosechocglam also expressed disdain that Thompson had rarely — if ever — acknowledged his son Prince on social media, "but was happy to pose for a pregnancy announcement with Khloe."”
“They were worried that Khloe would end up heartbroken."”
“"It took a while for the family to accept Tristan.”
“There were several concerns, including that he is another basketball player and also that his ex was pregnant," an unnamed source told People.”
“Read more: Khloe Kardashian says she didn't know Tristan Thompson was in a relationship with Jordan Craig when they started dating"When Khloe first started dating Tristan, her family questioned if it was a good idea.”
“Craig was six months pregnant at the time.”
“ Vest: @AzurraDubai A post shared by ℐℴ ℛđƴ.ℭ (@alleyesonjordyc) on Nov 30, 2016 at 4:21pm PST Nov 30, 2016 at 4:21pm PSTThompson and Khloe stepped out as a couple in September 2016 and even went on vacation together.”
“Going to miss my bump..but the best is yet to come!”
“She said her suspicions were confirmed when she saw paparazzi photos of him and Kardashian together, according to the documents.”


"At that time, an anonymous source told Hollywood life that Craig didn't want to be seen as a 'poor victim woman'," he said
Twitter user @ rosechocglam also disdained Thompson for rarely admitting his son Prince on social media, "but I'm happy to pose with Khloe to announce pregnancy."
"They were worried that Chloe would eventually break his heart."
"It took some time for the family to accept Tristan."
"There are several issues of concern, including that he is another basketball player and that his ex girlfriend is pregnant," a source told people on condition of anonymity
"Read more: Khloe Kardashian said that when they started dating, she didn't know Tristan Thompson had a relationship with Jordan Craig." when Khloe first started dating Tristan, her family questioned whether it was a good idea
"Craig was six months pregnant."
"Vest: @ azurradubai, one by one
"To miss my bumps But the best is yet to come
"The documents show that her suspicions were confirmed when she saw the paparazzi photo of him with Kardashian."



Number  190
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“I love making memories with you,” she captioned a tribute for his 30th birthday last July.”
“You are a light that could outshine the sun.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
“In early March, the country star hinted at a possible breakup when she reflected on pouring her emotions into her music during a concert at the Thompson-Boling Arena in Knoxville, Tennessee.”
“Image zoom Credit John Shearer WireImage I make it my mission every single time I step on the stage that no matter what no matter where I am I want to make you feel everything you could possibly feel Lambert said before performing an acoustic version of her hit Tin...”
“Man as reported by local news outlet Knox News...”
““I want you to feel sad, mad, happy and nostalgic and really pissed sometimes.”
“That’s my favorite.”
“And part of feelings is also heartbreak, unfortunately,” she continued.”
““But fortunately for me, I can use it for my art or whatever.”


"I like to reminisce with you," she wrote in a eulogy for his 30th birthday last July
"You are a light that can shine more brightly than the sun."
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
At a concert at Thompson Boling arena in Knoxville, Tennessee, in early March, the country singer recalled pouring his emotions into his music, suggesting a possible breakup
"Image zooming credit John shearer WireImage I take it as my mission every time I step on the stage, no matter where I am, I want you to feel everything you may feel before Lambert says, execute her acoustic version..."
"The local news media, Knox news coverage..."
"I want you to feel sad, crazy, happy and nostalgic, and sometimes really angry."
"That's my favorite."
"Unfortunately, some of the feelings are heartbreaking too," she continued
"But fortunately for me, I can use it for my art or something."



Number  191
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Back in 2009, the same story flew around Hollywood, but Emma Watson shut it down by saying that Robert Pattinson is just a good friend and a super-nice guy, adding he is great to work with.”
“AdvertisementThis isn’t the first time that rumors have spread about the former co-stars.”
“Then, after the pair presented together at the Golden Globe Awards, reports surfaced that the two went public with their relationship.”
“But, fans will be disappointed to find out that there is no truth to the story, and the claims that Pattinson and Watson are dating are completely false.”
“The problem is, celebrities don’t choose who they present with at an awards show.”
“So, the fact that Pattinson and Watson shared a few minutes on stage together in no way means the two are in a relationship.”
“The pair presented the award for Best TV Movie or Limited Series, which went to HBO’s Big Little Lies.”
“Now, there is a new twist to the rumor, with another publication telling a tall tale about Pattinson propositioning Watson for a one-night stand.”
“#RobertPattinson opens up: "This Halloween I walked into the most extreme, ah, fancy dress party.”
“I was absolutely normcore and it was the most humiliating experience of my life."”


"The same story spread all over Hollywood as early as 2009, but Emma Watson said Robert Pattinson was just a good friend and a super good person, adding that he was very suitable to work with him."
"This is not the first time there has been a rumor about a former co star."
"Later, after the two appeared together at the Golden Globe Awards, it was reported that they had made their love affair public."
"However, fans will be disappointed to find that there is no truth in the story and that Pattinson and Watson are dating completely false."
"The problem is that celebrities don't choose who to be with at the awards ceremony."
"So, Pattinson and Watson spent a few minutes on stage together, which does not mean that they are in love."
"The two presented the best TV movie or limited edition series award, which was won by HBO's little lies."
"Now, rumors have reached a new turning point, and another publication tells a fantastic story about Pattinson's offer of a one night stand to Watson."
Robert Pattinson said, "I went into the most extreme, ah, masquerade party on this Halloween."
"I'm absolutely normal. It's the most humiliating experience of my life."



Number  192
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Or just does he need a good binge?”
“Is The Weeknd juggling some bitter feelings over the breakup?”
“Now, looks like The Weeknd is easing his pain with Eleven & the gang — but is he also taking shots at his ex?”
“You’re not in the Upside Down: Selena Gomez, 25, and The Weeknd, 27, really have broken up following the shocking reveal of her rekindled friendship with ex Justin Bieber.”
“It’s been hard to gauge how the pair are really dealing with the split; Selena looked all smiley with fans hours after the news broke, while Abel was seen dancing his heart out with other girls at the club.”
“Still, we may have gotten our first indication that there is some anger over this breakup, and it’s coming directly from The Weeknd’s Twitter account.”
“Late on Halloween night, he took to his page to share with his fans,” Dodging STRANGER THINGS spoilers is the hardest thing I’ve ever experienced…” Um, REALLY?”
“Harder then breaking up with your girlfriend of 10 months?”
“Interesting…Whether this tweet is a subtle slam at Selena, we couldn’t say.”
“What we have heard is that it was The Weeknd who pulled the plug on his romance with Selener, and that it had nothing to do with JB.”


"Or does he need a good party?"
"Is the weekend struggling with some painful feelings for breaking up?"
"Now it seems that he and gang 11 are easing the pain this weekend, but is he also shooting at his ex girlfriend?"
"You're not turning it upside down: Serena Gomez, 25, and weekend, 27, really broke up after shocking revelations about her renewed friendship with former Justin Bieber."
"It's hard to tell how they dealt with the break-up; hours after the news came out, Serena looked at the fans with a smile on her face, while Abel was seen dancing with other girls at the club."
"Nevertheless, we may have got the first sign that people are a little angry about the break-up, which comes directly from the weekend's Twitter account."
"Late in the night of Halloween, he went to his website to share with his fans," avoiding strangers is the hardest thing I've ever experienced... " Well, really? "
"It's harder than breaking up with a girlfriend of 10 months?"
"Interesting We can't say whether this microblog is a subtle attack on Selena. "
"We heard that it was that weekend that ended his relationship with Selena, and it's not about JB."



Number  193
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Look into it, Kim.”
“Kylie Cosmetics is actually all set to become a billion dollar company within the next few years.”
“Believe it or not -- just kidding, this is pretty easy to believe -- many rumors have been claiming there's just a little bit of bad blood between Kylie and Kim, on account of Kylie's ridiculously fast rise to fame.”
“Well, she was always famous, but it's the fact that she's on track to becoming more famous than Kim that's the problem.”
“Or, OK, the real problem is that more fame equals more money.”
“Kim is reportedly upset that her little sister could become more wealthy than she is, that's what we're getting at here.”
“According to a source close to the family, Kim "takes all the credit" for making her family famous, which is definitely fair.”
“O.J.”
“Simpson would be the only other person who could perhaps take this credit -- after all, he put Robert Kardashian on his legal team for his murder trial, which was the very first time the public heard the Kardashian name.”
“That little tie-in probably had a little to do with our fascination with the family once the reality show started, but actually getting the show picked up?”


"Look, Kim."
"Kelly cosmetics is actually going to be a billion dollar company in the next few years."
"Believe it or not - it's just a joke, it's easy to believe - there's a lot of rumors that there's just a little bit of a bad relationship between Kelly and Kim, because Kelly is surprisingly quick to become famous."
"Well, she's always been famous, but the problem is that she's moving in the direction of being more famous than Kim."
"Or, well, the real problem is that the more famous you are, the more money you have."
"Kim Jong Il is reported to be upset that her sister may become richer than her, and that's what we're going to say now."
"According to a person familiar with the matter, it's absolutely fair that Jin Yan'er takes all the credit for her family's fame."
“O.J.”
Simpson will be the only one who could have won the honor - after all, he brought Robert Kardashian to his lawyers for his murder trial, the first time the public heard Kardashian's name
"That little match may have something to do with our infatuation with family after the reality show started, but it actually made the reality show better?"



Number  194
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“ @claudcraig  A post shared by @ normancook on Jul 1, 2018 at 2:00pm PDT Jul 1, 2018 at 2:00pm PDTSign up here to get INSIDER's favorite stories straight to your inbox.”
“Happy ever forever   wearing custom @reemacra in my dream cape and @jenniferbehr in my hair!..”
“The happy couple documented their nuptials on social media.”
“Cuoco shared a preview of their wedding video on Instagram.”
“The wedding looked magical.”
“Kaley Cuoco is showing more glimpses into her magical wedding to equestrian Karl Cook.”
“On Monday, the "Big Bang Theory" star shared a preview from her wedding video.”
“Edited by Enjet Media, the clip features footage of the venue, the couple getting ready, and the actual ceremony as voice-overs capture the couple's love.”
“"When I look at you, the two words that constantly come to mind are 'unconditional love,'" Cuoco, 32, is heard saying.”
“"There is a rhythm and a pulse to us, like the ocean waves crashing upon the rocks," Cook, 26, says.”


“@ claudcraig@normancook PDT at 2:00 p.m. on July 1, 2018 an article shared by PDT at 2:00 p.m. on July 1, 2018 please log in here and send insider's favorite stories directly to your mailbox. "
"Always happy to wear custom made @ reemacra in my dream shawl and @ Jennifer Behr in my hair!"
"The happy couple recorded their wedding on social media."
"Kuko shared a preview of their wedding video on instagram."
"The wedding looks amazing."
"Kaley cuoco has learned more about her amazing wedding to equestrian Karl cook."
On Monday, the big bang star shared a preview of her wedding video
"This video is edited by anjett media, including the scene of the wedding, the couple's preparation and the actual wedding. The narrator captures the couple's love."
"When I look at you, the two words that come to mind are 'unconditional love'," says Kuko, 32
"We have rhythm and pulse, just like the waves hitting the rocks," cook, 26, said



Number  195
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Jamie Foxx Dumps Katie Holmes After 3 Years TogetherTom Cruise Has A Crush On His 22-Year-Old Assistant Who Looks Like Katie Holmes...”
“RELATED LINKS:New Scientology Tell-All Exposes Crooked Secrets About Tom CruiseBreakup Bombshell!”
“Don’t forget to subscribe to our YouTube Channel.”
“Watch the video above to find out why Tom’s relationship is only looking to get worse with Suri.”
“As Star reported, Tom has gone as many as 1,000 days without seeing Suri due to the ties with his religion and his busy acting schedule.”
“Rob Shuter exclusively reveals the Scientology superstar made his PR team sift through interview requests in order to avoid talking about his relationship with Katie and Suri.”
“...daughter Suri Cruise...”
“Click to email this to a friend Opens in new window Click to share on Facebook Opens in new window Click to share on Twitter Opens in new window It appears Tom Cruise has a lot of demands in Hollywood including banning questions about Katie Holmes and 10 year old...”


"Jamie fox has been together with Katie Holmes for three years. Tom Cruise falls in love with his 22-year-old assistant. He looks like Katie Holmes..."
"Related links: new Scientology tells all who have exposed the improper secrets about Tom Cruise
"Don't forget to subscribe to our YouTube channel."
"Watch the video above and see why Tom and Suri are only getting worse."
According to the star, Tom has not seen Suri for 1000 days because of his religious beliefs and busy performance schedule
"Rob Schutter revealed exclusively that the Scientology superstar asked his PR team to sift through interview requests to avoid talking about his relationship with Katie and Suri."
“… Daughter Suri Cruise... "
"Click to send this email to a friend to open in a new window click to share on Facebook to open in a new window click to share on Twitter to open in a new window it seems that Tom Cruise has many demands in Hollywood, including banning questions about Katie Holmes and 10-year-old children..."



Number  196
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“What do you think about Jesse and Demi reportedly flirting with each other, HollywoodLifers?”
““Hate for you to be disappointed.”
“Jesse Williams cranked up the heat as the hunk Demi Lovato’s ‘Tell Me You Love Me’ music video but these two are reportedly ‘crushing’ on each other!”
“Is Demi Lovato, 25, about to get closer to the body of Grey’s Anatomy star Jesse Williams?”
“Jesse, 36, definitely cranked up the heat in Demi’s “Tell Me You Love Me” video, but it seems this on-screen romance might find happen in real life.”
““Demi is definitely crushing on Jesse, and vice versa,” an insider tells Star magazine.”
““Nothing more than flirting has happened yet, but that might not be the case for long.”Of course, because this is Hollywood, nothing is ever that simple – or that clean.”
“Jesse split from his wife of five years, Aryn Drake-Lee, in April 2017.”
“Rumors of a relationship between him and Friday Night Lights actress Minka Kelly, 37, followed the split, but she didn’t hold back when shutting those down.”
““They’re not [true,]” she wrote on Instagram when a fan asked if the rumors were true.”


"What do you think of Jesse and Demi flirting with each other, Hollywood actress?"
"I hate your disappointment."
"Jesse Williams made a splash in Demi Lovato's tell me you love me music video, but the two are reported to be squeezing each other!"
"Is 25-year-old Demi Lovato approaching the body of Gray's anatomy star Jesse Williams?"
Jesse, 36, did make a splash in Demi's "tell me you love me" video, but this on-screen romance seems to happen in real life
"Demi is absolutely infatuated with Jesse, and vice versa," one insider told Star Magazine
"Nothing has happened but flirting, but it may not last long." Of course, because this is Hollywood, there is nothing simpler and cleaner than flirting
"Jesse broke up with her wife of five years, Arlene Drake Lee, in April 2017."
"Rumors of his breakup with 37 year old actress Minka Kelly followed, but she didn't flinch when she closed them."
"They're not real," she wrote on instagram, when a fan asked if the rumors were true



Number  197
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“AdvertisementIs playing president helping the rapper get over his daily marital problems, or is he practicing for when he actually runs for office?”
“As fans may already be aware, Kanye and Kim’s relationship hasn’t been the best lately, and insiders claim they are sleeping in separate beds.”
“Kanye West’s Oval Office will be less ‘stuffy’ looking and will channel more of the rapper’s personality and his expensive taste.”
“As for the interior design of the office, while it will pretty much replicate the original White House one, the vibe will be different.”
“That being said, sources have told us that Kanye called in a team and asked them to build an Oval Office just for him at home, because why not?”
“We all know that the rapper has a massive ego, but that is not even equaled by the size of his bank accounts.”
“We have learned that the man is currently doing some serious renovations at his and Kim K’s huge mansion in California.”
“Is that a way for the rapper to tell his loyal followers that he will be running for president?”
“It looks like Kanye West will not stop at anything when it comes to reaching his dreams.”
“There’s nothing like some do it yourself work to help you visualize the big picture.”


Is the advertisement playing the role of president, helping rapper overcome daily marriage problems, or practicing when he is really running for office? "
"Fans may have realized that Kanye's relationship with Kim has not been the best recently, and insiders say they sleep in different beds."
"Kanye West's Oval Office will no longer look so" stuffy ", but more convey the rap singer's personality and his expensive taste."
"As for the interior design of the office, although it will largely copy the original white house design, the atmosphere will be different."
"After all, a source told us that Kanye assembled a team and asked them to build an oval office for him at home, because why not?"
"We all know that rapper has a huge ego, but it's not even the size of his bank account."
"We understand that the man is currently doing some serious renovation work on his and kink's luxury home in California."
"Is this a way for a rapper to tell his loyal followers that he will run for president?"
"It seems that Kanye West won't stop anything when it comes to realizing his dream."
"Nothing can help you imagine the big picture better than some do it yourself work."



Number  198
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“And if that sounds positively medieval, then it should tell you something about our “modern” attitudes towards women.”
“This was the very public shaming of a pregnant woman in front of her husband and a crowd of strangers.”
“Thank goodness for these towering heroes of morality.”
“And even if that were the case, the ends wouldn’t justify the means, any more than they did when the person who threatened to leak naked photos of Emma Watson later claimed it was all in the name of a campaign against the internet site 4Chan.”
“No.”
“Is it likely?”
“At a stretch, yes.”
“Is it possible that the flag waver was trying to make a point about sexism in West’s lyrics?”
“The use of West’s lyrics suggests it might have been intended to suggest that Kardashian is herself a gold digger, despite her own enormously successful media and business ventures.”
“The precise intent behind the stunt isn’t clear, though the idea that a man should be threatened or shamed by his partner’s past sexual history is as old as it is misogynistic.”


"If that sounds medieval, it should tell you something about our 'modern' attitude towards women."
"This is a public humiliation of a pregnant woman in front of her husband and a group of strangers."
"Thanks to these noble moral heroes."
"Even so, the purpose can not justify the means, just as the person who threatened to divulge the nude photos of Emma Watson later claimed that it was all in the name of the campaign against 4chan, the Internet website."
"No
"Is it possible?"
"One breath, yes."
"Is it possible for the flag flyers to try to explain sexism in West's lyrics?"
"The use of West's lyrics suggests that it may be a deliberate suggestion that Kardashian is a gold digger herself, despite her own media and business investment being very successful."
"The exact intention behind this stunt is unclear, although the idea that a man should be threatened or humiliated by his partner's past sexual history is both ancient and female averse."



Number  199
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“I think I need a little bit of training and time just to make me feel comfortable to do so.”ICYMI: Liam recently got real about performing at Nickelodeon’s SlimeFest!”
“I feel like you can’t just, I mean I know Harry just walked onto set and was amazing, but I don’t think I have the stuff for that.”
““I’ve always thought about acting and it’s something that I’m really passionate about so I’d like to train first.”
“He revealed that after having his songs in films, he always thought about what it would be like to act, and we think he’d do an awesome job!”
“During a recent appearance on MTV‘s ‘TRL‘, the former One Direction singer got the opportunity to answer some fan questions, and when asked if he ever thought about starting an acting career, Liam gave a surprising answer!”
“We may be seeing Liam Payne on the big screen at some point in the near future!”


"I think I need a little bit of training and time to feel comfortable doing it." ICYMI:Liam It's very real in the performance of Nickelodeon's sleepefest recently
"I don't think you can just, I mean, I know Harry just walked into the set and it's amazing, but I don't think I have that ability."
"I've always wanted to act, which is something I'm very keen on, so I want to train first."
"He revealed that after he had his own songs in the movie, he was always thinking about what the performance would be like, and we thought he would do a great job!"
"Recently, in MTV's TRL program, the former one-way singer was given the opportunity to answer some fans' questions. When asked if he wanted to start his acting career, Liam gave a surprising answer!"
"In the near future, we may see Liam Penn on the big screen!"



Number  200
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
““Of course, the condition has worsened since Caitlyn began wearing heels full-time,” the pal said.”
““Cait’s paying for it now.”
“Wracked with joint pain,is facing knee-replacement surgery — and it’s largely because the sex-swapping celeb still refuses to give up her beloved stiletto high heels , RadarOnline.com can exclusively reveal!”
““Her doctors beg her to give up her stiletto collection, but she refuses!” spilled a pal.”
“Even though doctors warn high heels are a major cause of knee pain, the 68-year-old plastic princess is willing to try anything aside from ditching the knee-busting footwear.”
“Click through for more on the painful story!”
“Sources told Radar the retired athlete’s chronic knee pain dates back to her days as a gold medal winner at the 1976 Olympics.”
“Training to become a world-champion runner, high jumper, long jumper and pole vaulter, an insider said Jenner caused damage to her knees.”
“Her knees stiffen up and ache,” said the source.”
“And for high heel-loving Jenner, that’s no choice at all!”


"Of course, since Caitlin started wearing high heels full-time, her condition has deteriorated," the friend said
"Katie's going to pay now."
"Suffering from joint pain, she is facing knee replacement surgery - mainly because the transsexual celebrity still refuses to give up her beloved high heels, RadarOnline.com The website can be disclosed exclusively! "
"Her doctor begged her to give up collecting stilettos, but she refused! "Knocked over a friend."
"Although doctors have warned that high heels are the main cause of knee pain, the 68 year old plastic princess is willing to try anything other than giving up the broken knee shoes."
"Click to see more about the pain story!"
"The source told radar that the retired athlete's chronic knee pain can be traced back to the day when she won the gold medal at the 1976 Olympic Games."
Jenner injured his knee while training to become a world champion, high jumper, long jumper and pole vaulter, an insider said
"Her knee is stiff and painful," the source said
"And for Jenner, who likes high heels, that's not a choice at all!"



Number  201
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Sign up here to get INSIDER's favorite stories straight to your inbox.”
“Regardless of whether "J-Rod" make it official, there's no debating that Lopez would be a great step mom.”
“They're dancing to Lopez's new single "Dinero."”
“JLo and A-Rod both have two kids from previous marriages, and it seems like they get along well as an extended family.”
“There are a million reasons to envy Jennifer Lopez: her killer body, her business acumen, her impeccable style — the list goes on.”
“And now, thanks to a recent video on her current beau Alex Rodriguez's Instagram account, you can add the fact that she's great with kids.”
“The video shows JLo dancing to her new single "Dinero" with A-Rod's 13-year-old daughter Natasha.”
“It looks like the two are having a great time.”
“Natasha nails the choreography, which probably means that she learned it from JLo herself.”
“...dinero tashi jlo A post shared by Alex Rodriguez arod on Jun 22 2018 at 11 34pm PDT Jun 22 2018 at 11 34pm PDT The video was taken on a boat on what looks like a vacation in Idaho judging from Rodriguez s next two posts which show the...”


"Register here to send insider's favorite stories directly to your in box."
"Whether j-rod is official or not, there is no doubt that Lopez will be a great stepmother."
"They're dancing with Lopez's new single" Di Nero. "
"JLO and A-Rod both have two ex-wife's children. It looks like they get along well as a big family."
"There are millions of reasons to admire Jennifer Lopez: her killer body, her business acumen, her impeccable style - and a lot more."
"Now, thanks to a recent video on her current boyfriend Alex Rodriguez's instagram account, you can add the fact that she gets along well with her children."
JLO and Natasha, A-Rod's 13-year-old daughter, danced together on her new single "dinero," the video shows
"It looks like they had a good time."
"Natasha determined the choreography, which may mean she learned it from JLO herself."
“… A post shared by dinero Tashi JLO Alex Rodriguez arod at 11:34 p.m. on June 22, 2018. A video shot on a boat in Idaho at 11:34 p.m. on June 22, 2018 can be seen from Rodriguez's next two posts... "



Number  202
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“The ceremony will be able to be viewed live in multiple countries around the world.”
“The wedding is set to take place at St. George’s Chapel at Windsor Castle on May 19 at noon local time.”
“It won’t be long until we see exactly who will show up to celebrate Prince Harry and Meghan’s love either.”
“There’s no official word on whether or not the newest of the clan, Prince Louis, will join but we can’t wait to find out!”
“Prince William and Kate Middleon ‘s two children Prince George, 4, and Princess Charlotte, 3, are reportedly set to be a part of Prince Harry and Meghan’s wedding activities.”
“In fact, she may be able to practice the role with some very special children on her big day.”
“...and since Meghan always seems to be great when she s around kids we have a feeling she d be an awesome mother...”
“Meghan would love to fall pregnant on their honeymoon and has told Harry she wants at least four children A royal wedding followed by years of Prince Harry and Meghan s children growing up would be so lovely to see...”
“Meghan and Harry would both like to have a big family, and they plan to start trying straight away!”
“...of the spotlight for a while...”


"The ceremony will be available in many countries around the world."
"The wedding is scheduled to take place at noon on May 19 local time at St. George's Church in Windsor Castle."
"We'll soon know who will show up to celebrate the love between Harry and Megan."
"There's no official word yet on whether Prince Louis, the latest member of the family, will join us, but we can't wait to know!"
Prince William and Kate Middleton's two children, four year old Prince George and three-year-old Princess Charlotte, are reported to be part of the wedding of Harry and Megan
"In fact, she can practice the role with some very special children on her big day."
“…… Since Megan is always great with the kids, we think she'll be a great mother... "
"Megan wanted to be pregnant on her honeymoon and told Harry she wanted at least four children. After a royal wedding, Prince Harry and Megan's children have grown up. It's wonderful... "
"Megan and Harry want to have a big family. They're going to try it right away!"
“… In the spotlight for a while... "



Number  203
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“You may be able to find more information about this and similar content at piano.io...”
“...i stan this we STAN," with Kylie replying to the fan with a few heart face emojis.”
“Sure Justin Bieber and Hailey Baldwin's got engaged, but also, Kylie Jenner has returned to her old face.”
“The signature pout that helped the reality star launch her beauty empire Kylie Cosmetics—featuring the highly-coveted Kylie Lip Kits—is no longer, according to a photo the beauty mogul posted to her Instagram on Sunday.”
“This content is imported from Instagram.”
“You may be able to find the same content in another format, or you may be able to find more information, at their web site.”
“"[S]he looks like the old Kylie here and idk why," one fan commented under the picture of Jenner and her best friend Anastasia Karanikolaou, to which Kylie responded, "i got rid of all my filler," adding two shocked emojis and a smiling face emoji.”
“Another fan praised Jenner for embracing an all natural look, writing, "YESSS KYLIE!!!”
“...you look stunning w more natural looking lips.”
“Instagram/Kylie JennerJenner confirmed that her pumped up pout (which inspired the #KylieJennerChallenge, in which fans would use small cups to plump their lips) was a result of lip injections during an episode of Keeping Up With the Kardashians in 2015.”


"You can find more information about this and similar content at: piano.io..."
“…… I'm for this, we're for it, "Kelly replied with a few faces
"Of course Justin Bieber and Haley Baldwin are engaged, but Kelly Jenner is back."
According to a photo released by the beauty tycoon on its Instagram last Sunday, it helped the reality star star to launch the beauty charm Kylie cosmetics signature pouches with the coveted Kylie lipstick.
"This content was imported from instagram."
You can find the same content in other formats on their website, or you can find more information
"He looks like old Kelly here, why?" one fan commented under a photo of Jenna and her best friend Anastasia karanikolaou Kelly replied, "I took out all the filler words," adding two shock emoticons and a smiley emoticon
Another fan praised Jenner for adopting a completely natural look and wrote, "yes, Kelly!"
“… Your lips look more natural and beautiful. "
"Instagram / Kylie Jenner confirmed that her pouted lips (which inspired Kylie Jenner challenge, fans will fill their lips with small cups) were the result of lip injections in 2015's follow Kardashian episode."



Number  204
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“And like Kutcher, they explain it’s more about their child’s autonomy than safety concerns.”
“And outside of the celebrity circuit, plenty of parents choose to keep their Facebook feeds child-free.”
“Dax Shepard and Kristen Bell are also known for keeping their kids off social media.”
“All babies are cute.”Kutcher and Kunis aren’t alone in their decision to shield their children from the public eye.”
““Can you guess which one is ours, or does it really matter?”
“May your life be filled with wonder, love, laughter, health, happiness, curiosity, and privacy,” he wrote in the post.”
““Mila and I would like to welcome Wyatt Isabelle Kutcher to the world.”
“Shortly after Wyatt’s birth in 2014, he shared several photos of different babies, refusing to identify which one was his daughter.”
“It’s their private life; it’s not mine to give away.”He did almost give it away at the beginning.”
““I think they should have the right to choose that and I actually don’t think that they should have images of them as children that are out there, that somebody could potentially blackmail them with.”


"Like Kutcher, they explained that it's more about children's autonomy than safety."
"Outside the celebrity circle, many parents choose to let their children subscribe to Facebook for free."
"DAX Shepard and Kristen bell are also known for keeping their children out of social media."
"All the babies are lovely." Kutcher and Kunis are not the only ones who have decided to protect their children from the public
"Can you guess which one is ours, or does it really matter?"
"May your life be full of wonder, love, laughter, health, happiness, curiosity and privacy," he wrote in the post
"Mira and I want to welcome Wyatt Isabel Kutcher to this world."
"Shortly after Wyatt was born in 2014, he shared several photos of different babies and declined to say which one was his daughter."
"It's their private life, not mine." At first he almost gave it away
"I think they should have the right to choose. In fact, I don't think they should have their image as children. Some people may use these images to blackmail them."



Number  205
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Mirror Celebs has contacted Anne's rep for an official commnet.”
“If the rumours are true we imagine all she'll be bothered about is trying to get as much sleep as possible.”
“...she said.”
“Video Loading Video Unavailable Click to play Tap to play The video will auto-play soon 8 Cancel Play now(Image: Splash)"I'm thinking about that [the paparazzi] because I really want to have a baby, and my husband and I are like, 'Where are we gonna live?'"”
“Anne also admitted that she and Adam had been trying to decide where to live once they have children as she wants to keep their offspring out of the spotlight.”
“I can't wait to meet them."”
“I think about it all the time, though it's a silly thing to think about because the kind of mother I'll be depends on the kind of children I have.”
“I want to be a mother and I anticipate loving my children quite fiercely.”
“She said: "Oh my God.”
“(Image: Splash) (Image: Rex)Anne and Adam married in 2012 and she has previously spoken of her desire to start a family.”


"Mirror celebrity has contacted Annie's representative for an official communication network."
"If the rumors are true, we can imagine that all she's worried about is sleeping as much as possible."
“…… She said
"Video loading video not available Click to play Click to play video will play automatically soon 8 cancel now (picture: splash)" I was thinking about this (paparazzi), because I really want to have a child, my husband and I thought, "where are we going to live?" "
"Anne also admits that she and Adam have been trying to decide where to live once they have children, because she wants to keep their offspring out of the spotlight."
"I can't wait to see them."
"I think about it all the time, even though it's a stupid thing, because what kind of mother I'm going to be depends on what kind of children I have."
"I want to be a mother and I look forward to loving my children very much."
She said, "my God."
(source image: splash) (source image: Rex) Annie and Adam got married in 2012, and she had previously said she wanted to get married. "



Number  206
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
““An early dinner allows for the body to digest the meal, balance blood sugar and clear excess insulin before you head to bed,” says LeVeque, “so you can benefit from a fat-burning, belt-shrinking night of sleep!” We see why Garner and Rossum swear by these ladies.”
“For a more 360-degree approach, she wanted to include a nutritionist, and because of their several shared clients (Garner and Rossum among them) and complementary beliefs and philosophies, LeVeque was the ideal fit.”
“Leave it to two A-list wellness gurus to democratize customized fitness and nutrition programs for the world.”
“The dream team of Body By Simone personal trainer Simone De La Rue and nutritionist Kelly LeVeque whose client list includes the likes of Jennifer Garner Emmy Rossum Jessica Alba and Molly Sims have just released an app that gives users access to their expertise for a very nominal monthly...”
“...fee...”
“But it’s not just an app stuffed with content — more than 900 minutes of video and hundreds of recipes — that leaves users to their own devices to navigate and motivate.”
“For $19.99/month, the platform actually uses artificial intelligence software to create customized workout plans and nutrition programs for each individual, taking into consideration their specific goals.”
“It tracks progress via measurements and weekly photos, and reminds users via push notifications to work out.”
“It is programmed to provide the customization of a personal workout with me says De La Rue adding This has never been done before in a fitness app But while it may seem the app approach speaks only to the general population De La Rue says hers and LeVeque s...”
“...celebrity clients are very excited especially as they are often on set or traveling...”


"An early dinner allows the body to digest food before going to bed, balance blood sugar and remove excess insulin, so you can benefit from a sleep that burns fat and contracts your belt," Leveque said! "We understand why Ghana and Rosen swear to these women."
"For a more 360 degree approach, she would like to include a nutritionist, and because of their several common clients (Ghana and Rosen in one) and complementary beliefs and philosophies, Leveque is the ideal fit."
"Let two top health masters customize fitness and nutrition programs for the world."
"Simone personal trainer Simone de La Rue and nutritionist Kelly Leveque's" body dream team "have a list of clients, including Jennifer Garner, Emmy Rossum, Jessica Alba and Molly Sims, who have just released an app that allows users to access their expertise every month..."
“… Fees... "
"But it's not just a content filled app - more than 900 minutes of video and hundreds of recipes - that allows users to navigate and inspire on their devices."
"The platform costs $19.99 a month, and actually uses AI software to create customized exercise and nutrition plans for everyone, taking into account their specific goals."
"It tracks progress through measurements and weekly photos, and alerts users to fix problems through push notifications."
"It's a customized program that provides me with personal exercise, which has never been seen in fitness apps, but although the app's approach seems to be only for the general population, De La Rue said she and Leveque s..."
“…… Celebrity customers are very excited, especially when they are often on set or traveling... "



Number  207
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“If you've got a celebrity story, video or pictures get in touch with the Metro.co.uk entertainment team by emailing us celebtips@metro.co.uk, calling 020 3615 2145 or by visiting our Submit Stuff page - we'd love to hear from you.”
“‘Selena and I both went through a depression.’We have reached out to Selena and Camila’s reps.MORE : Selena Gomez ‘suffered from depression’ after life-saving kidney transplantGot a showbiz story?”
“It’s going to be hard.” And it was very hard.”
“She said: ‘[I was told], “It’s going to be hard, the recipient is going to glow and she’s going to recover a lot faster than the donor because she’s getting something she needs and you are losing something you don’t need to lose.”
“Selena Gomez underwent a kidney transplant (Picture: Backgrid)In a chat with Self Magazine Francia Raisa – who donated the kidney to Selena – confessed they both struggled with their mental health throughout the journey.”
“And the procedure took its toll on the 25-year-old, who ‘went through a depression’ during the process.”
“AdvertisementAdvertisement‘But more than anything Selena is just happy for Camilla, she knows how much this means to her, it’s so huge.’Selena has had a tough few months, after she revealed she had undergone a kidney transplant for her battle with Lupus.”
“‘Taylor’s her best friend and she can’t help but wish she was going on tour with her.”
“‘But there’s a part of her that’s envious too.”
“‘Selena is so happy for Camila and Taylor, she love them both and knows they’re going to have the best time on tour together,’ an insider reportedly told HollywoodLife.”


"If you have celebrity stories, videos or pictures, please email us with Metro entertainment team at: celebtips@metro.co.uk , please call 020 3615 2145 or visit our submission page - we are glad to hear from you. "
"Selena and I both went through a great depression." We've contacted the families of Serena and Camilla. Repeat more: is there a story about Serena Gomez "suffering from depression" after her life-saving kidney transplant
"It's going to be hard." And it's hard
"She said: '(someone told me)," it's going to be hard, the recipient will shine, she'll recover much faster than the donor, because she gets what she needs and you lose what you don't need to lose. "
"Selena Gomez, who had a kidney transplant (photo source: backgrid), admitted in a chat with her self magazine Francia Raisa that they were struggling for their mental health throughout the process."
"This process has cost the 25-year-old a lot. In the process, he" experienced depression. "
"But most of all, Serena is happy for Camilla, she knows what it means to her, it's so huge." Serena had a difficult few months after she revealed that she had received a kidney transplant because of her fight against lupus
"Taylor is her best friend and she can't help but hope to travel with her."
"But there's a part of her that's enviable."
"Serena is happy for Camilla and Taylor, she loves them both and knows they will have the best time together," according to reports, a person familiar with the matter told Hollywood life



Number  208
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“[Featured Image by Andrew H. Walker/Getty Images]”
“The actor had recently been injured while filming the latest installment for the Mission Impossible franchise, yet looked much better and entirely unaffected by the Katie Holmes and Jamie Foxx reveal.”
“...to ear smile from Tom who also gave an enthusiastic thumbs up...”
“Tom Cruise is pictured for the first time since ex wife Katie Holmes confirmed her relationship with Jamie Foxx https t co BqKD4cDrxm Daily Mail Celebrity DailyMailCeleb September 6 2017 As The Sun indicated Cruise recently landed in London and fans awaiting the Hollywood heartthrob were greeted with an ear...”
“As for Tom being “furious,” this seems a bit far-fetched seeing as the actor was snapped looking as happy as can be, even after news broke that Katie and Jamie are, in fact, an item.”
“...the star is to find love again it must be with the approval of the faith...”
“Katie Holmes finally goes public with new man Jamie Foxx I m questioning why she ever agreed to marry Tom The Sun TheSun September 10 2017 It s been no secret that Cruise s relationship with the Church of Scientology has caused both of his marriages to fail and if...”
“A said source indicates that Tom is bothered by the romance and that “Katie is so happy with someone else,” adding that “Tom would love to find his own true love, someone he can share the rest of his life with too.”
“The action star is reportedly “furious” and “envious” about the relationship between Holmes and Foxx and feels a sense of betrayal over it all, as International Business Times states.”
“Additional claims, since Jamie and Katie were spotted walking in Malibu holding hands, have been made regarding Cruise’s reaction to his ex and former co-star coming clean about their relationship.”


"[Andrew h. Walker / Getty pictures]
"The actor was injured recently while filming the latest film in the impossible mission series, but he looks much better, completely unaffected by Katie Holmes and Jamie fox."
“… When he heard Tom's smile, he gave a warm thumbs up
"Tom Cruise has been photographed for the first time since his ex-wife Katie Holmes confirmed her relationship with Jamie fox. On September 6, 2017, the sun showed that cruise recently landed in London, waiting for the Hollywood fans to be welcomed by one ear..."
As for Tom being "angry," it seems a bit far fetched, because the actor was secretly photographed to look as happy as possible, even after the news came out that Katie and Jamie, in fact, were a project
“… If stars want to find love again, they must be recognized by their faith. "
"Katie Holmes and new couple Jamie fox finally made it public. I'm questioning why she agreed to marry Tom the sun. On September 10, 2017, cruise's relationship with the Church of Scientology led to the failure of his two marriages. It's no secret that if..."
According to sources, Tom is upset about the relationship. "Katie is very happy with other people," he said, adding, "Tom wants to find his true love, someone he can spend the rest of his life with."
The action star is reported to be "angry" and "jealous" of the relationship between Holmes and fox, and betrayed by all this, as the International Business Times put it
"Since Jamie and Katie were photographed walking hand in hand in Malibu, there have been claims of Cruise's reaction to his ex and ex partner's confession of their relationship."



Number  209
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Let us know in the comments section.”
“Source: BACKGRIDWhat are your thoughts on Taylor's squad no longer being around?”
“Looks like Taylor is going to have to find some new A-list pals!”
“Article continues below advertisementSource: BACKGRIDBut at least Karlie still is backing Taylor, even if everyone else is remaining silent on her birthday.”
“Source: BACKGRIDGuess it doesn't always pay off to stay off of social media!”
“She’s made it clear that anyone listening or supporting Taylor will be banned from her circle instantly, and the likes of Gigi, Bella and Cara are all doing as they’re told," a source said.”
“Article continues below advertisementSource: BACKGRID“Since Taylor’s been in hiding Kendall’s very much the queen bee these days, so what she says goes for the majority of that group.”
“Source: BACKGRIDWhile Taylor already was losing friends, according to reports, one of her latest singles, "Look What You Made Me Do," didn't help matters at all, as she called out Kanye West, Katy Perry, and others, reportedly leaving a former friend, Kendall Jenner, furious.”
“T-Swift is now 28-years-old.”
“Article continues below advertisementBut Karlie Kloss came to the rescue to wish happy birthday to the singer with a cute selfie snap.”


"Please let us know in the comments section."
"Source: BACKGROUND: what do you think of Taylor's team gone?"
"It seems Taylor has to find some new first-rate friends!"
"The article continues with the following advertising source: backgrid, but at least Karlie still supports Taylor, even though others remain silent on Taylor's birthday."
"Source: backgridguess staying away from social media doesn't always pay off!"
"She has made it clear that anyone who listens to or supports Taylor will be immediately banned from her circle, and people like Gigi, Bella and Kara do what they say," a source said
Since Taylor has been hiding Kendall's very queen bee these days, she's talking about groups for most people
"Source: Although backgrid Taylor has lost her friends, it is reported that one of her latest singles," see what you asked me to do, "has not helped at all, because she yelled Kanye West, Katy Perry and others, which is said to have made her ex friend Kendall Jenner furious."
"T-swift is 28 years old now."
"The article continues in the following ad, but Kelly cross comes to the rescue with a lovely selfie to wish the singer a happy birthday."



Number  210
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“...is conceivable that after a major breakup Garner is looking for answers where she can find them...”
“That is not her style.”
“After living apart for two years, Affleck and Garner decided to go their separate ways.”
“The actors were married for 12 years and have three children together – 11-year-old Violet, Seraphina, 8, and Samuel, 5.”
“Very rapidly, Affleck revealed to the world that he was in a serious relationship with Lindsay Shookus.”
“Rumors are claiming the movie maker and his new lady secretly started dating in 2012.”
“Affleck has been seen on romantic dinner dates with the Saturday Night Live producer, and the pair has moved into a home together.”
“A source has come out to say; Garner is feeling lonely and abandoned by the father of her children who has found a new love.”
“A friend explained: “Jen is hurt and humiliated by Ben’s very public romance.”The chatty insider added: “Jen has never been about getting retribution.”
“But Ben’s insensitive actions have changed her.”


“…… It can be imagined that after a major breakup, Ghana is looking for the answer, where she can find the answer... "
"That's not her style."
"After living apart for two years, Affleck and Ghana decided to go their separate ways."
The two actors have been married for 12 years and have three children - violet, 11, Serafina, 8 and Samuel, 5
"Soon, Affleck revealed to the world that he had a serious relationship with Lindsay schokus."
"There are rumors that the filmmaker and his new girlfriend started dating secretly in 2012."
"Someone saw Affleck and the producer of" Saturday night live "moving into a house together on a romantic dinner date."
"There is news that Ghana feels lonely and abandoned by the father of the child who has found a new love."
"Ben's public love affair has hurt and humiliated Jen," a friend explained The talkative insider added: "Jen has never thought of retribution."
"But Ben's insensitive behavior changed her."



Number  211
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“I regret that my shame is now shared by the people I cherish dearly.””
““It was one of those slow-developing things,” he told the Palm Beach Post.”
“I really do.”They tied the knot in Bridgehampton, New York, later that year.”
“I think it’ll be something we’ll look at each other and day and say boom — and it’ll happen quickly.”
“It’s not at all true.”
“As for trying the knot, he said, “That was written someplace — that Matt’s afraid of commitment.”
“It has been about eight months now,” he added.”
““I am single, but extremely committed and spoken for,” Lauer said, adding that his mystery woman was was “not in the media.”“She is terrific.”
““I don’t think I kissed her for two months.”‘She is terrific’Also in 1998, Lauer hinted about popping the question to Roque during an interview with Larry King, though he did not share her name.”
“Image zoom From left: Jack Matthew Lauer, Romy Lauer, Thijs Lauer and Matt Lauer | Credit: James Devaney/GC ImagesNot love at first sightIn 1998, Lauer discussed meeting Roque on a blind date.”


"I'm sorry that my shame is now shared by the people I love so much."
"It's one of the things that's developing slowly," he told the Palm Beach Post
"I really like it." Later that year, they got married in Bridgehampton, New York
"I think it's going to be something that we look at each other every day and say" bang, "and it's going to happen soon."
"It's not true at all."
As for the tie, he said, "it's written somewhere - Matt's afraid of commitment."
"It's been eight months now," he added
"I'm single, but I'm very loyal and speak for him," Raul said. He added that his mysterious woman "didn't appear in the media." "She's wonderful."
"I don't think I've kissed her in two months." "She's wonderful." Also in 1998, Raul hinted in an interview with Larry King that he would propose to rock, although he did not disclose her name
"Zoom in and out on the left: Jack Matthew Raul, ROMMY Raul, tis Raul and Matt Raul | source: James dewani / GC images first love 1998, Raul discussed the issue of dating rock."



Number  212
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Here’s the full list of Grammy nominees.”
“Newcomer SZA, who is nominated for best new artist with Alessia Cara, Khalid, Lil Uzi Vert, and Julia Michaels, will also perform.”
“Among other awards, Adele won album of the year, song of the year, and record of the year in 2017.”
“Competing to take home the coveted title of album of the year are Childish Gambino, Jay-Z, Kendrick Lamar, Lorde, and Bruno Mars.”
“Other performers for the night include Chris Stapleton, Maren Morris, Ben Platt, Rihanna, and U2.”
“Additionally, “Grammys Live From the Red Carpet” will be live-streamed on GRAMMY.com, and The Recording Academy Facebook page and CBS Facebook page beginning at 12 p.m. PT.”
“...will also air a red carpet special starting at 2:30 p.m. PT.”
“E!”
““Entertainment Tonight’s” Nancy O’Dell, Kevin Frazier, and Keltie Knight will host.”
“If you’re more interested in who wore whom than who won what, CBS’ “Red Carpet Live” special airs an hour before the show.”


"This is the full list of Grammy nominees."
"The new Sasha, along with Alecia Kara, Khalid, Lille UZ Witt and Julia Michaels, has been nominated for best new artist and will also perform."
"Among other awards, Adele won album of the year, song of the year and record of the year in 2017."
"It's the naive Gambino, Jay-Z, Kendrick Lamar, rod and Bruno Mars who are vying for the best album of the year."
"Other performers that night included Chris Stapleton, Marlene Morris, Ben Pratt, Rihanna and U2."
In addition, "Grammy red carpet live" will also broadcast Grammy online, as well as record the college's Facebook page and CBS's Facebook page, starting at 12 p.m
“… The red carpet special will also start at 2:30 p.m. "
“E！”
"Entertainment Tonight" will be hosted by Nancy Odell, Kevin Fraser and Kelty knight
"If you're more interested in who wears who than who wins what, CBS's" red carpet live "special is on the air an hour before the show."



Number  213
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“It was just too much baggage.””
“A “Bieber pal” echoed to the magazine: “Their relationship was always very complex and complicated.”
““It was never a healthy situation for Selena and Justin,” a source tells People.”
“The long—so long—history of their relationship was absolutely part of what made people root for them, but it could always be a valid deal-breaker.”
“Furthermore, for Selena Gomez, marrying Justin Bieber could very possibly feel akin to marrying your high school boyfriend at age 25, which a lot of people, in 2018, simply do not want to do.”
“All good thoughts to Bieber and Baldwin, but statistically speaking, drawing on the history of young celebrity engagements, Gomez is probably not the person we should be concerned about here.”
“And perhaps she is not the spontaneous, splashy engagement type either, which may be why she is no longer with someone who clearly is.”
“She has, especially by child Disney star–turned–teen pop idol standards, largely skirted controversy and scandal.”
“She has never urinated in a restaurant mop bucket.”
“She was never the one getting arrested for a DUI in a rented Lamborghini in Miami.”


"It's just too much luggage."
"Their relationship has always been very complex and complex," one "Bieber partner" responded to the magazine
"It's never been a healthy situation for Serena and Justin," a source told people
"Their long-term relationship is definitely one of the reasons why people take root for them, but it can always be an effective deal breaker."
"Besides, for Serena Gomez, marrying Justin Bieber is likely to feel like marrying your high school boyfriend at 25, which many people don't want to do at all in 2018."
"It's a good idea for Bieber and Baldwin, but statistically speaking, drawing on the engagement history of young celebrities, Gomez may not be the person we should care about here."
"Maybe she's not the spontaneous, eye-catching type of engagement either, which may be why she's no longer with someone who's obviously like that."
"She, especially the standards of teen pop idols who were born as children's Disney Stars, basically avoided controversy and scandal."
"She's never peed in a mop bucket in a restaurant."
"She was never the one arrested for drunk driving in a rented Lamborghini in Miami."



Number  214
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“MORE : Amber Rose calls Rob Kardashian a ‘f***boy’ over Blac Chyna revenge pornMORE : Rob Kardashian and Blac Chyna ‘still haven’t spoken’ since that explosive Instagram rant...”
“The lawsuit claims Chyna was paid ‘$92,500 for every 60 minute episode and $112,350 for every 90 minute episode in which she appeared’.”
“New Royal Baby as Princess Eugenie gives birth to boyRob, 30, and his sister Kylie Jenner, 20, have filed a lawsuit in the Superior Court of the States of California against 29-year-old Chyna, real name Angela Renee White.”
“In the lawsuit, which has been seen by Metro.co.uk and was first reported by The Blast, Rob alleges that Chyna ‘physically abused Rob and engaged in reckless behaviour such as heavy drinking and drug use’.”
“And in a bombshell claim, Rob alleges that Chyna fell pregnant with daughter Dream to ‘shake down’ the Kardashians.”
“A section of the lawsuit reads: ‘Rob and Kylie [Jenner] are compelled to seek legal recourse against Chyna for enduring several months of injuries in Chyna’s deliberate attempt to extort the Kardashian family for her own monetary gains.”
“AdvertisementAdvertisement‘Chyna’s desire to pursue a relationship and have a baby with Rob was nothing short of an outright fraud to shake down the Kardashian family without any concern of the consequences.’Dream was born to the couple in November 2016.”
“Elsewhere in the lawsuit, Rob accuses his ex of a series of alleged assaults, claiming that Chyna physically assaulted him while ‘intoxicated on drugs and alcohol’ inDecember 2016, as well as allegedly assaulting him ‘near the end of 2016 and continuing into 2017’.”
“Rob is accusing Chyna of assault and battery (Picture: The Blast / MEGA)Rob claims that E!”
“Network declined to offer the couple another season of their reality show Rob & Chyna due to their relationship being ‘beyond repair’.”


"More: Amber Rose calls rob Kardashian an 'f * * boy' in blackchener revenge porn more: Rob Kardashian and blackchener 'still haven't spoken' since that explosive instagram roar..."
"According to the lawsuit, Zina was paid" 92500 dollars per 60 minute episode and 112350 dollars per 90 minute episode. "
"Boyrob, 30, and her sister Kylie Jenner, 20, filed a lawsuit in the California High Court against Zina, 29, when Princess Eugenie gave birth to her new royal baby."
"In the lawsuit, which had been first reported by metro, rob claimed that chener 'physically abused rob and engaged in reckless behaviors such as drinking and taking drugs.'
"In an explosive statement, rob claims that Gina is pregnant with her daughter and dreams of" shaking "the Kardashian family."
"Part of the lawsuit is:" rob and Kelly (Jenner) were forced to seek legal prosecution from Gina because Gina deliberately tried to blackmail the Kardashian family to obtain their own money, resulting in Gina's injury for several months. "
"The advertisement says," Zina wants to pursue a relationship and have a baby with rob. It's a complete hoax. The purpose is to shake the kardashians without considering the consequences. " The couple's dream was born in November 2016. "
"In other parts of the lawsuit, rob accused his ex girlfriend of a series of attacks, claiming that in November 2016, Zina made a personal attack on him while" taking drugs and drinking alcohol "and was suspected of attacking him" towards the end of 2016, until 2017. "
"Rob accused chener of attacking and beating (photo: explosion / mega) rob claimed that e!"
"The TV station refused to offer the couple another reality show, rob & Chyna, because their relationship is" irreparable. "



Number  215
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“It’s time for her to move on.””
“It’s no exaggeration to say that Ben broke her heart and left her in a terrible place emotionally, [but] it’s been almost three years since they called it quits.”
“He has reportedly been ‘begging’ her to take him back, but we’ve got an EXCLUSIVE scoop on if he’s really looking to reunite!”
“Ben Affleck, 45, and Jennifer Garner, 45, broke the hearts of fans everywhere when they split in 2015.”
“Despite some hoping they’d work it out, the two filed for divorce in April 2017.”
“Supposedly Ben wasn t ready to let go as Us Weekly reports that since they filed the papers he s begged her to come back several times but she has no interest Though Ben has moved on to date Saturday Night Live producer Lindsay Shookus 37 he was reportedly at...”
“...one point telling friends he wanted his ex back...”
“Despite two years of trying to fix things – Jennifer “put her heart and soul into fixing the relationship and so desperately wanted to turn things around for the children’s sake, as well as theirs,” a fiend told Us – it was all in vain.”
“Supposedly, there was a hopeful moment in 2017.”
“After Jennifer reportedly helped Ben during his stint in rehab for alcohol abuse, a source claims he said, “He didn’t want to live without her.”


"It's time for her to go."
"It's no exaggeration to say that Ben broke her heart and put her in a terrible emotional situation, (but) it's almost three years since they announced their breakup."
"It is reported that he has been 'begging' her to take him back, but we have an exclusive report on whether he really wants to reunite!"
"When Ben Affleck, 45, and Jennifer Garner, 45, broke up in 2015, it broke the hearts of fans everywhere."
"Although some people hoped to solve the problem, they filed for divorce in April 2017."
"According to us weekly, Ben was not ready to let go because they submitted documents and he begged her to come back several times, but she was not interested. Although Ben had already started dating Lindsay shokus, producer of live on Saturday night, it was reported that he was..."
“… One thing is to tell a friend that he wants his ex back... "
"Although it took two years to try to solve the problem - Jennifer" devoted herself to solving the relationship, for the sake of the children, and for them, she wanted to turn the situation around very much, "a demon told us - it was all in vain."
"It should be said that 2017 has a moment of hope."
According to reports, Jennifer helped Ben when he was sent to rehab for drinking too much. It is said that he said, "he doesn't want to be without her."



Number  216
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“"We are focusing on birthday parties tomorrow for Zahara," Jolie added.”
“I like the cane!"”
“Brad Pitt was rocking a cane at the Palm Springs Film Film Festival gala on Saturday night — and he finally explained the injury (first revealed late last week) on the red carpet to Us Weekly.”
“"I was carrying my daughter [Vivienne Jolie-Pitt, 3] down the hill and I slipped and it was either her or me," Pitt, 48, told Us.”
“"It's my ACL," he added of the knee injury, but added that no surgery is planned.”
“"I think I will be alright!"”
“At his side at the event, love Angelina Jolie was quick to tell reporters that he's not asking for extra help around the house because of the injury.”
“"He is not that kind of guy," the In the Land of Blood and Honey director, 36, said.”
“"He does everything!”
“And little Vivienne (twin sister to Knox) is no worse for the wear either.”


Julie added: "we're going to have a birthday party for Zahara tomorrow."
"I like this stick!"
"Brad Pitt, rocking his cane at the Palm Springs Film Festival party on Saturday night, finally explained the injury to us weekly on the red carpet (first revealed later last week)
"I was carrying my daughter (Vivian Jolie Pitt, 3) down the mountain and I slipped, either she or I," Pitt, 48, told us
"This is my anterior cruciate ligament," he added, with a knee injury, but added that there was no surgery planned
"I think I'll be fine!"
"At the event, Angelina Jolie, her lover, quickly told reporters that he would not seek extra help at home because of the injury."
"He's not that kind of person," said the 36 year old director of blood and honey
"He does everything!"
"And little Vivian (Knox's twin sister) doesn't look bad either."



Number  217
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“She is not currently publicly linked to anyone romantically.”
“Kaling, who is notoriously private, has not revealed the identity of her baby's father.”
“"So if I can be kind of fun too, I think that would be nice."”
“"I'd like to be the fun mom, I know I'm gonna be the dorky mom," she added.”
“She broke her silence about her pregnancy the following month, saying on NBC's Today show that she is "really excited" to become a mom.”
“News learned that Kaling was pregnant with her first child and that it was "an unexpected surprise."”
“Back in July, E!”
“News has exclusively learned that the 38-year-old actress welcomed her first child, a baby girl named Katherine Kaling on Dec. 15.”
“E!”
“Congrats to Mindy Kaling!”


"She's not publicly connected with anyone at the moment."
"Karin, known for her privacy, did not reveal the identity of her father."
"So it would be great if I could have some fun, too."
"I want to be an interesting mom and I know I'm going to be a stupid mom," she added
The following month, she broke her silence about pregnancy, saying on NBC's today show that she was "very excited" to be a mother
"The news that Karin was pregnant with her first child was" a surprise. "
"Back to July, e!"
The 38 year old actress ushered in her first child, Katherine Carlin, on December 15, according to the exclusive
“E！”
"Congratulations to Mindy Kaling!"



Number  218
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
““It’s been a crazy year and today is not how I imagined it would look like,” Prudence recently wrote on social media.”
“...with pals on Feb 15”
“...s granddaughter and other pals in a hideaway high in the California hills all while her mother battles breast cancer...”
“Spies reveal Paris and her tie-dyed gang tramp into the desert to meditate ­— and as these amazing images obtained RadarOnline.com show, the wealthy and wacky teenager even camps out in a teepee!”
““It’s a form of therapy for Paris and her friends.”
“They consider each other family, and feed off the energy that’s generated by their intense bond,” tattled a pal.”
““Their intentions are actually quite positive, so no mind-bending pills or negativity.”
“They may indulge in pot, but that’s legal in California."”
“Click for more on the story!”
““Paris is convinced this is perfectly normal and thinks everyone should be happy for her, but there’s major concern over her isolated lifestyle," snitches the source.”


Prudence recently wrote on social media: "it's been a crazy year. Today is not what I expected."
"February 15 with friends"
“… Her granddaughter and other friends are in a shelter in the mountains of California, and her mother has been fighting breast cancer... "
"The spy revealed Paris and her tie dye Gang wanderers entering the desert to meditate when these amazing images were obtained RadarOnline.com The website shows that wealthy and eccentric teenagers even camp in tents! "
"It's a treatment for Paris and her friends."
"They see each other as a family and live on the energy of their close ties," a friend posted
"Their intentions are actually quite positive, so there are no disturbing pills or negative things."
"They may be addicted to marijuana, but it's legal in California."
"Click to see more stories!"
"Paris is convinced that it's perfectly normal and thinks everyone should be happy for her, but people are mainly worried about her isolated lifestyle," the source said



Number  219
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
““Chris’ friends are all placing bets on how long it will take before he’s with Jen.””
““They both tried to pass it off as good acting, but I’m not sure anyone believed them, especially not Anna,” dishes the insider.”
“This could be Chris’ chance!” As Star previously reported, there were whispers that Chris, 38, and Jen, 27, got a little too cozy while filming Passengers.”
““Jen is technically still dating Darren Aronofsky, but things between them don’t seem so good.”
““This is obviously a very delicate situation,” admits a source.”
“Chris Pratt barely waited a week after splitting from Anna Faris to take off his wedding ring — and now the actor’s close pals are pushing him to make a move on Jennifer Lawrence.”


"Chris's friends are betting on how long it will take him to be with Jane."
"They all want to pretend to be good performers, but I'm not sure anyone believes them, especially Anna," the person familiar with the matter said
"This could be Chris's chance! "As star has previously reported, there are rumors that Chris, 38, and Jan, 27, were a little too comfortable filming passengers."
"Technically, Jane is still dating Darren Aronofsky, but their relationship doesn't seem to be very good."
"It's obviously a very delicate situation," one source admitted
"Chris Platt took off his wedding ring a week after breaking up with Anna Faris - now the actor's close friends are pushing him to propose to Jennifer Lawrence."



Number  220
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“...in waves Bridesmaids Quotes and Phrases...”
“...the wedding bands The last splash Good times and tan lines with the bride The last sail before the veil Aloha beaches Let s get nauti Time to shellabrate Anchors down bottoms up She found her main squeeze Happiness comes...”
“After months of group texting, navigating schedule conflicts, and Venmo requesting, once the bachelorette weekend is set in stone, the real fun begins.”
“Bachelorette parties are the ultimate chance to go crazy with the decor and accessories.”
“It’s impossible to overdo it: banners, koozies, shot glasses, and pool floaties are all part of the fun, along with matching outfits and curating the perfect playlist.”
“For a truly memorable bachelorette, take it one step further and customize all these goodies with fun bachelorette party quotes and phrases to commemorate your last weekend as a single gal.”
“To help inspire you as you plan this epic weekend, we’ve rounded up the best bachelorette party quotes below.”
“You can use these as social media captions, on shirts and swag, or as your weekend anthem as you’re cheers-ing with your besties to your future with your forever partner.”
“Here are the best bachelorette party quotes and phrases that will take your bach weekend to the next level.”
“Classic Bachelorette Quotes and Phrases The best I do crew around Kiss the miss goodbye Last fling before the ring Bach and boujee Look on the bride side Single for the very last time Engaged AF A final toast to...”


“… In the wave bridesmaids quotes and phrases... "
“… The wedding ring, the last spray, the good time, the tan line with the bride, the last sail in front of the veil, Aloha beach, let's have time to anchor. She found that her main squeeze happiness came... "
"After months of mass texting, browsing schedule conflicts and Wenmo requests, once the single weekend remains the same, the real fun begins."
"The bachelor party is the ultimate opportunity for decoration and accessories."
"It's impossible to go too far: banners, koozies, lenses, glasses, pool floats are all part of the fun, along with matching costumes and masterminding the perfect play list."
"For a truly unforgettable single woman, go one step further and customize all these dishes with interesting singles party quotes and phrases to commemorate your last weekend as a single woman."
"To inspire you in planning this epic weekend, we've collected the best singles party quotes below."
"You can use them as social media headlines, put them on your shirts and clothes, or as weekend carols to cheer with your friends for your future and your forever partner."
"Here are some of the best singles party quotes and phrases to take your weekend to the next level."
"Classic single girl quotes and phrases I've made the best crew around kiss miss goodbye before the last indulgence ring Bach and boogie watch the bride's single the last engagement the last drink..."



Number  221
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“— Tierney McAfeeMore Jennifer Aniston News:”
“Share your thoughts in the comments section below!”
“Check it out.”
“Jennifer Aniston, 45, has finally found happiness with fiance Justin Theroux, 43, but her road to true love was definitely bumpy!”
“After enduring a very public and painful split from ex-husband Brad Pitt, 50, who allegedly cheated on her with his Mr & Mrs. Smith co-star Angelina Jolie, 39, Jen has found a way to forgive the “unforgivable” and achieve inner peace.”
“Here’s how she did it!”
“Jennifer Aniston Forgives Brad Pitt & Angelina Jolie For CheatingJennifer opens up like never before to Harper’s Bazaar about her marriage to Brad, her future with Justin, and learning to forgive.”
“I’m “a forgiving person,” she says.”
““I absolutely am.”
“I think it’s extremely important to forgive.”


"- Tierney mcphemore Jennifer Aniston news:
"Share your thoughts in the comments section below!"
"Have a look."
"45 year old Jennifer Aniston and 43 year old fiance Justin serux finally find happiness, but her road to true love is definitely bumpy!"
Jennifer has broken up in public with her 50 year old ex husband, Brad Pitt, who has been accused of breaking up with 39 year old Mr. and Mrs. Smith& Mrs.Smith ）After her partner Angelina Jolie was unfaithful, Jennifer found a way to forgive the unforgivable and achieve inner peace
"That's what she did!"
"Jennifer Aniston forgives Brad Pitt and Angelina Jolie for their deception. She opens her heart before Harper's fair, tells about her marriage to Brad, her future with Justin, and learns to forgive."
"I'm a tolerant person," she said
"Of course I am."
"I think forgiveness is extremely important."



Number  222
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Dr. Luke previously sued Kesha’s mother Pebe Sebert for defamation in 2014 and 2016, but dropped the suits in June.”
“It’s worth noting the usage of “celebrities” — plural — meaning other A-listers may find themselves on the stand.”
““In connection with Dr. Luke’s defamation claims against Kesha, various third parties are being deposed by both sides, including celebrities,” his lawyer’s statement also confirmed.”
“Lady Gaga has publicly supported Kesha throughout her sexual assault case against Dr. Luke — including tweeting #FreeKesha — and is said to have exchanged text messages with the pop star.”
“She could now be required to attend a 3-hour, sit-down interview instead.”
““This motion has become necessary because Dr. Luke’s counsel has not been able to obtain, despite repeated request, a deposition date from Lady Gaga.”According to a TMZ report, Lady Gaga did submit a written statement, but redacted too much of the content to prove useful.”
“Luke’s counsel served a subpoena on Lady Gaga because she has relevant information regarding, among other things, false statements about Dr. Luke made to her by Kesha,” said Dr. Luke’s lawyer in a statement on Saturday.”
““Dr.”
“The music producer has now subpoenaed Lady Gaga for a deposition for her involvement in the case.”
“Dr. Luke’s team is attempting to manipulate the truth and draw press attention to their case by exaggerating Lady Gaga‘s role and falsely accusing her of dodging reasonable requests.”Dr. Luke is continuing his defamation lawsuit against Kesha.”


"Dr. Luke had previously sued Keisha's mother, pebe sebert, for defamation in 2014 and 2016, but dropped the suit in June."
"It's worth noting that the use of 'celebrity' - the plural - means that other first-line stars may find themselves on the stand."
"As for Dr. Luke's libel charges against Kesha, a number of third parties, including celebrities, have been dethroned by both sides," his lawyer's statement confirmed
"Lady Gaga has been publicly supporting Kesha in the sexual assault case against Dr. Luke - including tweeting # freekesha - and is said to have exchanged text messages with the pop star."
"She may now be asked to sit down for a three hour interview."
"This motion is necessary because Dr. Luke's lawyers, despite repeated requests, have not been able to obtain the date of the testimony from Lady Gaga." According to a TMZ report, Lady Gaga did submit a written statement, but made too many changes to prove useful
"Luke's lawyer served a subpoena on Lady Gaga because she had information about Kesha's misrepresentation of Dr. Luke," Luke's lawyer said in a statement on Saturday
"Dr“
"The music producer has now summoned Lady Gaga to testify about her involvement in the case."
"Dr. Luke's team tried to manipulate the truth by exaggerating Lady Gaga's role and falsely accusing her of evading reasonable demands, and to attract media attention to their case." Dr. Luke continues to file libel suits against Kesha



Number  223
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“EFFY ring (right hand), £2,885 (effyjewelry.com).”
“Bangles, Kardashian’s own Credit: Mike Rosenthal Mike Rosenthal Y/PROJECT bodysuit, £358, at avenue32.com.MELODY EHSANI earrings, £28 (melodyehsani.com).”
“Images Pharrell Williams and Khloe Kardashian attend the collaboration celebration of Pharrell Williams and Adidas at Hinoki The Bird on December 3 2014 in Los Angeles California Getty Images Khloe Kardashian Kendall Jenner and Kylie Jenner speak onstage at the 2014 American Music Awards at Nokia Theatre L A Live...”
“Images Khloe Kardashian attends Cosmopolitan s 50th Birthday Celebration at Ysabel on October 12 2015 in West Hollywood California Frazer Harrison Getty Images Khloe Kardashian attends The Hollywood Reporter s 23rd Annual Women In Entertainment Breakfast at Milk Studios on December 10 2014 in Los Angeles California Valerie Macon Getty...”
“Getty Images Khloe Kardashian and Lamar Odom attend Kanye West Yeezy Season 3 on February 11 2016 in New York Jamie McCarthy Getty Images Khloe Kardashian attends the 2016 Angel Ball hosted by Gabrielle s Angel Foundation For Cancer Research on November 21 2016 in New York Jamie McCarthy Getty...”
“...at the Gibson Amphitheatre on August 7 2011 in Universal City California Jason Merritt Getty Images Kim Kardashian Khloe Kardashian and Kourtney Kardashian attend the Beach Bunny Swimwear 2011 fashion show during Mercedes Benz Fashion Week Swim at the Raleigh on July 16 2010 in Miami Beach Florida Michael Buckner...”
“Khloe Kardashian In pictures 1 42 Khloe Kardashian In pictures Khloe Kardashian attends the 2015 NBCUniversal Cable Entertainment Upfront on May 14 2015 Getty Images Lamar Jr Lamar Odom daughter Destiny Khloe Kardashian Kendall Jenner Kim Kardashian Kylie Jenner and Kourtney Kardashian arrive at the 2011 Teen Choice Awards held...”
“As of now, she’s planning on being in Cleveland for another month.”
“They told the publication: “Khloe doesn’t have any immediate plans to head back to LA.”
“True is doing great, too.”While an insider also told Entertainment Tonight that the 33-year-old plans to spend “another month” in Ohio, having moved to the State shortly before giving birth to her daughter.”


"Effy ring (right), ￡ 2885（ effyjewelry.com Website)
"Bracelets, Kardashian's own credit: Mike Rosenthal, Mike Rosenthal Y / Project tights, ￡ 358, Avenue 32. com.MELODY Company Ehsani earrings, ￡ 28（ melodyehsani.com ).”
"On December 3, 2014, in Los Angeles, California, Pharrell Williams and Khloe Kardashian attended the cooperation celebration between Pharrell Williams and Adidas in Hinoki the bird. Getty Images Khloe Kardashian Kendall Jenner and Kylie Jenner spoke at the 2014 American music awards ceremony of Nokia Theater LA Live..."
"Photo Khloe Kardashian attends cosmopolitan 50th birthday celebration in Isabel, West Hollywood, California on October 12, 2015 Fraser Harrison Getty photo Khloe Kardashian attends the 23rd annual entertainment women's breakfast for Hollywood journalists held in Valerie Macon Getty dairy studio, Los Angeles, California on December 10, 2014..."
"Getty pictures Chloe Kardashian and Lamar Odom attend Kaye West YZY Season 3 in New York on February 11, 2016 Getty Images Chloe Kardashian attends cancer research sponsored by angel ball 2016 Gabriel Angel foundation in New York on November 21, 2016 Jamie McCarthy Getty..."
“… Kim Kardashian Khloe Kardashian and kurtany Kardashian attend the 2011 fashion show during Mercedes Benz Fashion Week in Raleigh July 16 in Miami Beach, Florida, Michael Buckner... "
"Khloe Kardashian in pictures 1 42 Khloe Kardashian in pictures Khloe Kardashian attended NBC Universal Cable Entertainment 2015. On May 14, destiny Khloe Kardashian Kendall Jenner Kim Kardashian Kylie Jenner and Kourtney Kardashian, daughters of Getty Images Ramar Jr Lamar Odom, attended the 2011 youth Choice Award Ceremony..."
"So far, she plans to stay in Cleveland for another month."
"Khloe has no immediate plans to return to Los Angeles," they told the media
"Really well done, too." An insider told entertainment tonight that the 33 year old plans to stay in Ohio "for another month" because she moved to Ohio shortly before giving birth to her daughter



Number  224
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“When Foxx was asked during the NBA All-Star Celebrity Game in February about shooting hoops with the mom of 12-year-old Suri days earlier, he immediately took off his microphone and walked off of the live interview.”
“The outfit featured high-waisted, pleated shorts with a semicircle trim and a cropped, off-shoulder bodice top.”
“Night Out!”
“Jamie Foxx and Katie Holmes Grab Dinner in the Big Apple After Split RumorsJamie Foxx was the constant gentleman while out with Katie Holmes on Monday night.”
“The Beat Shazam host, 50, was photographed helping Holmes out of their black SUV as the two headed to dinner at popular Asian fusion restaurant Tao in New York City.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
“Earlier in the day, Foxx was spotted heading to a taping of The Tonight Show Starring Jimmy Fallon, where he and costar Taron Egerton promoted their upcoming movie, Robin Hood.”
“For the dinner date, Foxx wore skinny white pants and a navy blue polo.”
“Holmes, meanwhile, kept cool from the summer heat in a Zimmermann two-piece look.”
“The 39-year-old Dawson’s Creek alum paired the ensemble with a red handbag, tan shoes, a pendant necklace, and oversized sunglasses.”


"In February, when fox was asked to shoot with 12-year-old Suri's mother a few days ago at the NBA all star masters, he immediately took off the microphone and left for the interview."
The dress features high waist Pleated Shorts with semicircular edges and a cropped off shoulder bodice
"Go out at night!"
"Jamie Fox and Katie Holmes have dinner at the big apple after they split up. Jamie fox is a regular on Monday night when they go out with Katie Holmes."
"Beat Shazam, 50, was photographed helping Holmes get out of the black SUV while dining at Tao, a popular Asian fusion restaurant in New York City."
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
Earlier in the day, it was found that fox was on his way to the recording scene of the tonight show starring Jimmy Fallon, where he and his partner Taron Eagleton promoted their upcoming film Robin Hood
"On the dinner date, fox was wearing white tights and Navy polo."
"At the same time, Holmes wore Zimmerman's two-piece suit to keep out the cold and spend the summer."
"The 39 year old Dawson stream alum paired the outfit with a red handbag, a pair of Tan shoes, a pendant necklace and a pair of oversized sunglasses."



Number  225
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“MORE : ‘Where are my royalties!’: Eric Benét wants his money for the epic name drop Jay-Z made on new album 4:44MORE : Kim Kardashian is apparently pissed with JAY-Z for calling Kanye West ‘insane’ in 4:44 lyrics...”
“He doesn’t have time for any of [Eric Benet’s] nonsense.’Metro.co.uk has reached out to representatives for both JAY-Z and Eric for a comment.”
“An insider allegedly said: ‘Jay was inside enjoying his family.”
“It’s kind of unreal being mentioned in his lyrics, but like I said, it’s all love’But according to these new reports from MediaTakeOut.com, Eric drove over to JAY-Z’s Malibu mansion on 1 July and asked security to tell Jay to come outside and fight.”
“(Picture: FilmMagic)He added: ‘But it’s all love…everything he makes is always fire, and once again he did not disappoint.”
“Is he upset or not?”
“He’s also been said to say that ‘it’s all love’.”
“...said it was all love...”
“Speaking to USA Today at an airport on 30 June Eric even joked about Jay Z owing him some royalties for the name dropped Advertisement Advertisement It s like yo bro where are my royalties At the time he didn t seem annoyed by the name drop in fact he...”
“Eric Benet and ex wife Halle Berry who allegedly cheated on Picture Getty Images The rapper real name Shawn Carter raps You almost went Eric Benét let the baddest girl in the world get away I don t even know what else to say n ga never go Eric Benét...”


"More:" my royalty! ": Eric Bennett wants to spend more money on the epic name DROP Jay-Z in the new album 4:44: Kim Kardashian is obviously angry with Jay-Z because he calls Kanye West 'crazy' in the 4:44 lyrics..."
"He doesn't have time for (Eric Bennett) bullshit." Metro has contacted representatives of Jay-Z and Eric for comments. "
"It is said that an insider said:" Jay Chou is enjoying his family in it. "
"It's a bit untrue to mention it in his lyrics, but as I said, it's all about love, but based on what comes from MediaTakeOut.com Eric drove to Jay-Z's Malibu mansion on July 1 and asked the security guard to tell Jay to fight outside. "
"(picture: filmmagic) he added:" but it's all about love Everything he did was fire. Once again, he didn't let people down
"Isn't he happy?"
"Some people say that he said 'it's all love.'"
“… Say it's all love... "
"Eric told USA today at the airport on June 30 that he even joked that jay z owed him some royalties for" off name "ads, just like your brother, where is my royalties? He didn't seem to be annoyed by" off name "at that time. In fact, he..."
"Eric Bennett and his ex-wife Harry berry are suspected of cheating on" pictures of Getty. "Rapper's real name is Sean Carter. You almost left. Eric Bennett let the worst girl in the world escape. I don't even know what else to say. Nga will never leave. Eric Bennett..."



Number  226
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
““He is the most condescending person I have ever met,” Stanulis said.”
““We headed to his music studio.”
“...not speak in his presence according to the rapper s former bodyguard...”
“The ex-NYPD cop described how he witnessed the rap superstar lord over his underlings, before he finally got fired for introducing himself to West’s wife, Kim Kardashian, The Sun reported.”
““I had to look after his toddler daughter once and it was so much easier than baby-sitting the father,” said bodyguard to the stars Steve Stanulis, whose past clients include Leonardo DiCaprio and Tobey Maguire.”
““I’ve been employed by a lot of high-end people but I’ve never worked for someone like him.”
“He’s 10 times worse than what you see.”Stanulis, 42, who only worked for West for two weeks, recalled a career’s worth of West’s diva antics.”
““I was told, ‘Don’t expect to last long.”
“He goes through a lot of guys and some don’t even last the first hour’.”On his very first day, Stanulis got a taste of West’s pampered antics.”
“When we got into the elevator Kanye just stood there with his arms folded and said, ‘Aren’t you going to press the button?’”Stanulis explained he didn’t know which floor.”


"He's the most condescending person I've ever met," stanoulis said
"We went to his music studio."
“… According to the former bodyguard of the rapper, you can't speak in front of him... "
According to the sun, the former New York police officer described how he witnessed the rap superstar overlord before being fired for introducing himself to West's wife, Kim Kardashian
"Once I had to take care of his toddler daughter, which was a lot easier than taking care of his father," said the bodyguard of Steve stanulis, whose former clients include Leonardo DiCaprio and Tobey Maguire
"I'm employed by a lot of high-end people, but I've never worked for someone like him."
Stanoulis, 42, has only worked for West for two weeks, recalling the antics of his acting career
"I've been told not to expect it to last long."
"He went through a lot of people, some of whom couldn't even last the first hour." On his first day, stanoulis had a taste of West's spoiled antics
"When we got into the elevator, Kanye just stood there with his arms in his arms and said," don't you press the button? "Stanoulis explained that he didn't know which floor it was on."



Number  227
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“...email digishowbiz@the-sun.co.uk or call us direct on 02077824220”
“He said: "Khloe is his favourite.”
“Jeffrey said: "One day I could hear Khloe screaming in the phone.”
“That was his way of keeping up with the Kardashians..."He then claims that her paternity came up in one of these conversations and OJ tried to calm her down.”
“"In the prison, the phone calls have to be made out by OJ, so he would call at least once a week.”
“"But I know he still talks to Khloe behind her back.”
“She's upset with OJ for thinking that he killed her best friend, Nicole Brown.”
“"The mom Kardashian does not talk to OJ.”
“8 Rumours about Khloe's paternity have come up a number of times in recent years Credit: Splash NewsSpeaking in the documentary, which will air tonight on US channel Reelz, OJ's prison guard Jeffrey speaks about Khloe's relationship with the disgraced football star.”
“Got a story?”


“… E-mail digishowbiz@the-sun.co.uk Or call 0207782420 directly
"Khloe is his favorite," he said
"One day I could hear Chloe screaming on the phone," Jeffrey said
"That's how he kept in touch with the kardashians..." He went on to say that her paternity was mentioned in one of the conversations, and oy tried to calm her down
"In prison, the phone has to be made by OJ, so he calls at least once a week."
"But I know he's still talking to Chloe behind his back."
"She's upset that OJ thinks he killed her best friend Nicole brown."
"Mother Kardashian doesn't talk to ojie."
"In recent years, there have been many rumors about Khloe's relationship with his son. The documentary, which will be broadcast on reelz channel tonight, features splash news speaking, OJ's prison guard Jeffrey, talking about Khloe's relationship with the disgraced football star
"Is there a story?"



Number  228
Source test case:  ['Opinion']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Tell us below!”
““Caitlyn and Candis have thought about adopting an older child because there are a lot of trans kids whose parents have turned away, or who have run away from home.”
“A new report claims that the reality star is planning on adopting a baby boy!”
“Caitlyn Jenner, 66, is no doubt loving her new life, but something seems to be missing.”
“The transgender reality star is reportedly expanding her family and is adopting a baby boy.”
“That’s not all.”
“She plans to bring the little one home with the help of another woman!”
““She is going to adopt and is leaning toward a little boy,” a source told In Touch.”
“Caitlyn is looking to raise a little one with her bestie Candis Cayne, 44.”


"Tell us next!"
"Caitlin and Candice have considered adopting an older child because there are many transgender children whose parents have left or run away from home."
A new report says the reality TV star is planning to adopt a baby boy! "
"Caitlin Jenner, 66, no doubt loves her new life, but there seems to be something missing."
"The transgender reality star is reported to be expanding his family and adopting a baby boy."
"It's more than that."
"She's going to take the little guy home with the help of another woman!"
"She's going to adopt a little boy," a source said in contact magazine
"Caitlin wants to have a baby with her 44 year old friend Candice Kane."



Number  229
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Yes, it does.”
“MORE : Does it matter if James Bond’s character is black or white?”
“The 47-year-old actress, who tied the knot to the Bond actor in 2011, confessed that it was never an ‘ambition’ of hers to marry until she met Daniel Craig, in a new interview with ES Magazine.”
“The Oscar-winning star revealed she was ‘very independent’ in her youth and had even struggled to watch chick flicks, before love just ‘happened’ one day with the actor, 49.”
“Rachel Weisz says marriage ‘isn’t particularly exceptional’ (Picture: PA)Speaking of their relationship, she said: ‘It’s very personal, it’s very private.”
“I don’t think mine’s particularly exceptional apart from that we’re both in the public eye.”
“‘But I never thought I would get married.”
“It was not an ambition of mine.”
“It was the opposite.’AdvertisementAdvertisementThe Brit added: ‘I couldn’t relate to romantic comedies — marriage seems to be the whole point of them.”
“Then it just happened, happily, at a more mature moment.’The pair, who are notoriously private about their romance, had been pals years before they worked as an on-screen couple on psychological thriller Dream House in 2010.”


"Yes, yes."
"More: does it matter whether James Bond is black or white?"
The 47 year old actress, who married bond in 2011, admitted in a new interview with ES magazine that marriage had never been her "ambition" until she met Daniel Craig
"The Oscar winner revealed that when she was young, she was" very independent "and even hard to watch chick movies. Until one day, she and the 49 year old actor" fell in love. "
"Rachel Weiss says marriage is' not special '(photo: PA) and when it comes to their relationship, she says:' it's very personal, very private. '
"I don't think I'm special, except that we're all in the public eye."
"But I never thought I would get married."
"It's not my ambition."
"The opposite is true." The Englishman added: "I can't relate to romantic comedies - marriage seems to be all of them."
"And then it happened, happily, at a more mature moment." The couple, known for their privacy, had been close friends for several years before they became screen lovers in the 2010 psychological thriller dreamhouse



Number  230
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Or plain old rebound?”
“© TwitterIs this true love?”
“© Instagram© InstagramThough it is believed that the couple is keeping things under the wraps, but knowing Pitt, the cat will soon be out of the bag.”
“© Instagram© InstagramShe is 42 but doesn't look a day older than 22 if you ask me, also this amazing woman has a legit Ph.D. in design computation for MIT.”
“Besides being an MIT professor, this American-Israeli architect also has a TED talk to her credit.”
“© Instagram© InstagramShe is what one may call the epitome of 'beauty with brains'.”
“Brad Pitt might have separated with his gorgeous ex-wife Angelina Jolie but it looks like he isn't nursing a broken heart anymore, thanks to the new beautiful woman in his life, Neri Oxman.”


"Or ordinary old rebound?"
"Is this true love?"
"Instagram although people believe the couple are confidential, they know Pete and the cat will come out soon."
"Instagram she's 42 years old, but if you ask me, she doesn't look a day older than 22, and this amazing woman has a legal doctorate in design computing from MIT."
Besides being a professor at MIT, the American Israeli architect also gave a ted speech
"? instagram? Instagram people can call it the epitome of the beauty of wisdom."
"Brad Pitt may have broken up with his beautiful ex-wife Angelina Jolie, but it seems that he is no longer nurturing a broken heart, thanks to the new beautiful woman in his life, Nelly Oxman."



Number  231
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“News in February that among all of her female friends, Aniston has leaned on Cox the most following the fall out of her relationship.”
“The same publication also said that Aniston consulted with professionals to help improve her physical appearance.”
“Rumors about the actress getting a makeover to show Theroux what he’s missing are not true.”
“A handful of tabloids claimed that Aniston is still getting over Theroux, but she wants to show him that she’s doing much better since they broke up.”
“The speculations heightened after Theroux was spotted hanging out with Emma Stone in while serving as brand ambassadors for Louis Vuitton.”
“Some tabloids reported that Theroux and Stone are an item, but rumor-debunking site Gossip Cop clarified that they are simply working professionals.”
“Prior to the clarification, a tabloid said that Aniston got hurt over the thought that Theroux moved on from her very quickly.”
““So Jen decided the best revenge was to focus on herself.”
“Jen’s been feeling more and more insecure about looking older, and her split from Justin only made her feel worse… She knows she can’t compete with 20- and 30-something women,” the tabloid noted.”
““She’s already consulted with some of the most advanced and progressive anti-aging specialists in Hollywood.”


In February, it was reported that of all her female friends, Aniston was most dependent on Cox after the breakup
"The same publication also said Aniston consulted professionals to help improve her appearance."
"It's not true that the actress has changed her face to show him what he lacks."
"Some tabloids claim that Aniston is still out of trouble, but she wants to show him that she has done much better since they broke up."
"Speculation intensified after Cyrus was found with Emma stone as a Louis Vuitton brand ambassador."
"Some tabloids have reported that Theroux and stone are a project, but rumors have exposed the website gossip, and the police have clarified that they are just professionals working."
"Before clarifying, a tabloid said Aniston was injured because she thought seru would leave her soon."
"So Jane decided that the best revenge was to focus on herself."
The tabloid pointed out: "Jennifer is becoming more and more insecure about looking older. Breaking up with Justin will only make her feel worse She knows she can't compete with women in their 20s and 30s. "
"She has consulted some of Hollywood's most advanced and progressive anti-aging experts."



Number  232
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“During the same conversation, Post Malone labeled the mega-church “a total cult” while praising the Purpose singer as a “fucking awesome, great dude” and “genuine friend.””
““He is a very gifted artist,” he said, “and I wish him nothing but the best.”In Rolling Stone‘s original, wide-ranging story, a source close to Bieber also denied that he’s donated $10 million.”
“So that gives you a little insight about how serious you can take his observations about anything to do with us.”Despite the tension, Lentz added that he’s still a Post Malone fan.”
“We do not even own a church building.”
““Justin has not given our church $10 million, and we do not have gold ceilings.”
“...he continued...”
“...comments made by people who know absolutely nothing about the subject they are speaking on I do not know Post Malone and I have no idea why he would say reckless things about our church which he has never visited...”
“But people are spending so much money and God doesn t care that your church has a fucking gold roof Now Carl Lentz pastor at Hillsong New York City has refuted those claims telling RS I put no stock in...”
““It’s nice to support something you believe in, I guess,” the rapper said.”
“Post Malone recently lamented, in a revealing Rolling Stone profile, that his friend Justin Bieber has turned “super-religious” and “real culty,” claiming the pop star had donated $10 million to Hillsong, the megachurch he belongs to.”


In the same conversation, post Malone called the huge church "a complete cult" and praised the target singer as "damn great, great guy" and "real friend."
"He's a very talented artist," he said. "I just want him to go well." In the original and extensive story of rolling stone, a source close to Bieber also denied that he donated $10 million. "
"So it gives you a little insight, and you can take any observation he makes of us seriously." Despite the nervousness, Lenz added that he is still a post Malone fan
"We don't even have a church."
"Justin didn't give us $10 million for church, and we don't have a gold ceiling."
“… He went on to say
“… I don't know about post Malone, and I don't know why he said something rash about our church that he had never visited... "
"But people spend so much money, God doesn't care that your church has a fuckin 'golden roof, and now Reverend Carl Lenz of hillsson, New York City, refutes the claims that I don't have any stock..."
The rapper said, "I think it's good to support what you believe in."
"Post Malone" recently lamented in the profile of Rolling Stone magazine that his friend Justin Bieber has become a "super religion" and "real cult", claiming that the pop star has donated $10 million to his cathedral, hillsson



Number  233
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
““It played a role in her wanting to marry Justin.”For more on Aniston and Theroux’s split, pick up the new issue of Us Weekly, on stands now!”
““Jen has struggled with the perception that she is this pathetic woman after the divorce from Brad,” the insider tells Us.”
“Pitt and Jolie, who share Maddox, 16, Pax, 14, Zahara, 12, Shiloh, 11 and 9-year-old twins Knox and Vivienne, called it quits in September 2016 after two years of marriage and 12 years together.”
“He infamously moved on from the Friends alum with his Mr. and Mrs. Smith costar, Angelina Jolie.”
“While it was Theroux’s first marriage, Aniston was married to Pitt, 54, from 2000 to 2005.”
“We are two best friends who have decided to part ways as a couple, but look forward to continuing our cherished friendship.”The duo, who started dating in May 2011, tied the knot in August 2015.”
“This decision was mutual and lovingly made at the end of last year.”
“...decided to announce our separation...”
“Jen assured him they weren t a big deal but Justin wasn t thrilled Justin had moments of insecurity like that As previously reported Aniston 49 and Theroux 46 announced their separation on Thursday February 15 via a joint statement In an effort to reduce any further speculation we have...”
““Sweet little Post-its like, ‘You looked nice tonight’ or ‘Miss you already.’”The source explains that impact of those little notes was huge.”


"It played a role in her attempt to marry Justin." To learn more about Aniston's breakup with Cyrus, check out the new issue of American weekly and start now
"After her divorce from Brad, Jennifer has been struggling to think of herself as this poor woman," people familiar with the matter told us
"Pitt and Julie have 16-year-old Maddox, 14-year-old parks, 12-year-old Zahara, 11 year-old Shiloh and 9-year-old twins Knox and Vivian. They announced their separation in September 2016 after two years of marriage and 12 years of cohabitation."
"He left his friends' Alumni Club in disgrace and left with his Smiths' partner, Angelina Jolie."
When it was seru's first marriage, Aniston married Pitt, 54, from 2000 to 2005
"We are two best friends and have decided to break up, but we are looking forward to continuing our cherished friendship." The two started dating in May 2011 and married in August 2015
"This decision was made by both sides at the end of last year and is full of love."
“… Decided to announce our separation... "
"Jane assured him that they were not a big deal, but Justin was not excited that Justin had such unsafe moments. As previously reported, Aniston 49 and Cyrus 46 announced that they had adopted a joint statement on Thursday, February 15, to reduce any further speculation, we have..."
"Cute little posts, such as' you look good tonight 'or' I miss you so much '" The source explained that the impact of these little notes is huge



Number  234
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“You may be able to find more information about this and similar content at piano.io...”
“You may be able to find the same content in another format, or you may be able to find more information, at their web site.”
“The pair, who began dating back in 2014 after meeting on the set of their film The Light Between Oceans, got married in a private ceremony at a resort in Ibiza over the weekend, according to People.”
“Both Alicia and Michael have also been pictured with rings on their wedding finger by the Daily Mail as they spent time with family and friends on the island, so all signs point to the notoriously private couple tying the knot.”
“Digital Spy has reached out to reps for the actors for comment.”
“Alicia and Michael have largely kept their relationship private in the years they've been together, keeping public appearances together to a minimum but acknowledging their relationship in moments like Alicia kissing Michael before accepting her Oscar for The Danish Girl in February 2016.”
“Speaking to EW last year about their relationship, both Alicia and Michael said that they value their privacy.”
“"I think we've made a clear statement that we keep certain things just between us," Alicia said.”
“"It was very easy to unite, but that's quite personal."”
“Michael added: "This content is imported from Third party.”


"You can find more information about this and similar content at: piano.io..."
You can find the same content in other formats on their website, or you can find more information
"According to people familiar with the matter, the two started dating after meeting on the set of the movie" light of the sea "in 2014 and held a private wedding in a resort on Ibiza island last weekend."
"When Alicia and Michael were spending time with family and friends on the island, they were also photographed wearing rings on their fingers by the daily mail, so all the signs point to the marriage of the couple, who are known for their privacy."
"Digital Spy has contacted the cast representative for comments."
"During the years when Alicia and Michael were together, they basically kept a private relationship and tried not to appear in public. However, before accepting the Oscar of Danish girl in February 2016, Alicia acknowledged their relationship by kissing Michael."
"Both Alicia and Michael said in an interview with the Wall Street Journal last year that they attached great importance to their privacy."
"I think we have made it clear that we keep certain things secret," Alicia said
"It's easy to unite, but it's personal."
Michael added: "this content was imported from a third party."



Number  235
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Journalism', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“As such, fans of the power couple may take this new breakup rumor with a grain of salt.”
“The supposed constant effort to reassure Gwen has taken a toll on Blake and now the county music superstar has reportedly told her that he’ll go through with the “latter part of the monthlong Country Freaks Tour without her.”The insider said Gwen was caught by surprise.”
“Shelton supposedly broke up with Stefani last month but the No Doubt singer is still clinging on to hope that they will get back together.”
“Blake reportedly broke up with Gwen in February right before he went on tour, according to In Touch Weekly.”
“The celebrity gossip magazine claims that a source close to the couple told them that Stefani is not taking the breakup too well.”
““Gwen doesn’t know what hit her,” said the source.”
““She’s heartbroken.”Jealousy has apparently gotten the better of Gwen as Blake has had enough of her “neediness and all the drama,” which forced him to dump her, according to the source.”
“Rumor has it that Gwen is not too happy with the closeness between her boyfriend of two years and The Voice Season 13 winner Chloe Kohanski.”
“Previous rumors say Blake and Chloe have developed a bond deeper than a student-teacher relationship, reported the Hollywood Gossip.”
“This allegedly led Gwen to be suspicious of the two.”


"As a result, fans of power couples are likely to hit the nail on the head about this new breakup rumor."
"All along, people have been trying to appease Gwen, which has cost black a lot. Now, the county music superstar is reported to have told her that he will complete "the second half of a month long country geek Tour" without her. Gwen was taken aback, people familiar with the matter said
"Sheldon is said to have broken up with Stephanie last month, but the unquestionable singer is still hopeful that they will get back together."
According to contact weekly, Blake broke up with Gwen just before his tour in February
Celebrity gossip magazine claimed that a source close to the couple told them that Stephanie didn't see the breakup too well
"Gwen doesn't know what hit her," the source said
"Her heart is broken." According to the source, jealousy has clearly defeated Gwen because Blake has had enough of her "needs and all the drama," forcing him to abandon her
"It's rumored that Gwen is not very happy with the intimate relationship between his boyfriend of two years and Chloe kohanski, the 13th season champion of voice."
"There was a rumor that Blake and Chloe were closer than teachers and students," the Hollywood gossip reported
"It's said to have made Gwen suspicious of the two."



Number  236
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“The pic opens October 5.”
“Warners generally doesn’t release its CinemaCon-premiered footage, but we will post the video when it becomes available.”
“He meets the ingenue at the bar, and sparks ignite as it is clear she has the potential to ascend as quickly as he is descending.”
“Cooper’s character performs in what looks like a jazz burlesque club.”
“Cooper croons country, and Gaga’s mellifluous voice kicks in three-quarters into the trailer with a big “Aaahhh.” While she wasn’t onstage, Gaga’s voice spoke for her in the trailer.”
“It’s a poignant, honest trailer about songwriters and singers, and their struggles.”
“But as Ally’s career quickly eclipses his own, Jack finds it increasingly hard to handle his fading glory.”
“As the two begin a passionate love affair, Jack coaxes Ally into the spotlight, catapulting her to stardom.”
“In the new movie, Cooper plays Jackson Maine, a country music star on the brink of decline when he discovers a talented unknown named Ally (Gaga).”
“Cooper REX/Shutterstock“We jumped on stage in front of real crowds,” said Cooper.”


"The picture will open on October 5."
"Warner doesn't normally release videos of cinemacon premieres, but we will post them."
"He met this genius in the bar, and the sparks were all over the place, because it was clear that she had the potential to rise as fast as he did."
"Cooper's character plays in a place that looks like a jazz funny club."
"Cooper hummed country music in a low voice, and the sweet, quacking voice sounded" aha "in three-quarters of the trailer When she's not on the stage, Gaga's voice speaks for her in the trailer
"It's a bitter, honest trailer about songwriters and singers, and their struggle."
"But as Ellie's career is quickly eclipsed, Jack finds it increasingly difficult to deal with her fading honor."
"When they fell in love, Jack coaxed Ali into the spotlight and made her famous."
In the new film, Cooper plays Jackson Maine, a country music star on the verge of decline. He discovers an unknown talent named gaga
"We jumped on the stage in front of the real crowd," Cooper said



Number  237
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Email us at tips@radaronline.com, or call us at (866) ON-RADAR (667-2327) any time, day or night.”
“Do you have a story for RadarOnline.com?”
“We pay for juicy info!”
“Sound off in the comments below.”
“Do you think Bradley and his pregnant fiancée’s relationship will last?”
“As Radar exclusively reported, Cooper proposed to Shayk with an emerald and diamond engagement ring, but those close to the couple observed his changed demeanor in the last few weeks.”
“The hot pair, who once weren’t able to hide their attraction to each other during steamy PDA make out sessions all over the world, have been keeping a very low profile as they get ready to become parents.”
““Bradley has never looked so miserable,” a source told Radar about witnessing the way the Silver Linings Playbook star acts around his model fiancée.”
“As the stunning model, 31, and her actor fiancé, 42, prepare to welcome their first child, a source close to the couple told RadarOnline.com exclusively that the couple’s relationship has hit a low point.”
“Bradley Cooper‘s recent malaise about his pregnant baby mama and wife-to-be Irina Shayk have sparked worries that their engagement could be on the rocks.”


"Email us tips@radaronline.com , or call the (866) radar (667-2327) at any time. "
"Do you have a story to tell RadarOnline.com ？”
"We pay for interesting information!"
"Voice in the comments below."
"Do you think Bradley's relationship with his pregnant fiancee will continue?"
Cooper wore an emerald and diamond engagement ring when he proposed to Shayk, but people close to the couple have observed that his behavior has changed in the past few weeks, according to radar
"This hot couple, once at the world's steaming PDA intimate meeting, could not hide their attraction, but they kept a very low profile when preparing to become parents."
"Bradley has never been so miserable as he is now," a source told radar magazine, witnessing the first-line star's behavior around his model fiancee
The 31 year old model and the 42 year old actor's fiance are preparing for their first child, according to people familiar with the matter RadarOnline.com Website "the couple's relationship is at a low ebb."
"Bradley Cooper's recent dissatisfaction with his pregnant mother and wife to be, Elena Scheck, has raised concerns that their engagement may be on the rocks."



Number  238
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“"Whenever I see that star," Fuller said, "I won't see my name, I'll see all names of the people I've worked [with] and all those amazing artists and people that have helped me achieve this stuff."”
“Busy guy, that Brit.”
“In case the Beckham connection seems kind of random, aside from Victoria's stint as an Idol guest judge last year, remember that Fuller manages both the fashion plate and her soccer stud hubby, David Beckham.”
“Dance cocreator Nigel Lythgoe were all on hand to fete Fuller in front of the W Hollywood across the street from the famed Pantages Theatre...”
“Along with the lovely ladies mentioned above Lopez hubby Marc Anthony Ryan Seacrest Randy Jackson Idol finalists Scotty McCreery and Lauren Alaina past winners Kris Allen and David Cook and former Idol executive producer and So You Think You Can...”
“(He sold his original powerhouse, 19 Entertainment, for more than $250 million in cash and stock in 2005 and formed XIX last year.)”
“Fuller, founder of XIX Entertainment and creator of the global American Idol juggernaut, received the 2,441st star on the Hollywood Walk of Fame this morning for his considerable accomplishments.”


"Whenever I see that star," fuller said, "I don't see my name, I see the names of all the people I've worked with, and all the great artists and people who have helped me achieve that goal."
"Busy man, the Englishman."
"If David's relationship seems a little casual, in addition to Victoria's role as the guest judge of idol last year, I still remember Fuller's management of the fashion industry and her handsome husband, David Beckham, at the same time."
"Nigel Lythgoe, CO creator of dance, held a banquet for fuller in front of W Hollywood opposite the famous Pantages Theatre..."
"In addition to the lovely lady mentioned above, Lopez husband Mark Anthony Ryan Heathcliff trandy Jackson idol final, Scotty mcleary and Lauren arena, former champions Chris Allen and David Cook and former idol executive producer, so you think you can..."
(he sold his prime 19 entertainment company in 2005 for more than $250 million in cash and stock, and set up XIX last year.)
"Fowler, founder of XIX entertainment company and creator of global American Idol star, won 2441st star on Hollywood Walk of fame this morning for his outstanding achievements."



Number  239
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Considering Mariah, Nick and the twins recently made an adorable appearance at the 2018 Kids’ Choice Awards, it makes total sense that Mariah’s ex would be on hand to see her say “I Do” again.”
“Mariah would love to get married in May at the Grand Wailea Resort in Maui the insider told OK where she and Bryan first went public with their romance Mariah and Bryan struck up a relationship in late 2016 with Mariah low key confirming the romance in February 2017 by...”
“The iconic singer reportedly popped the question to her bae, Bryan Tanaka, and the two are busy planning their big day!”
“Did Mariah Carey, 47, have a vision of love when looking at boyfriend Bryan Tanaka, 34, one that left her feeling all sorts of emotions?”
“After deciding that she just can’t let go of this hunk, Mariah reportedly decided to make it happen – an engagement, that is!”
““Word is Mariah took matters into her own hands,” a source tells OK!”
“...magazine, “It was an unusual proposal but it did the trick.”
“She wrote a song about how she wanted Bryan to be her husband and she performed it for him while wearing a sexy, glitzy gown.”
“Then she explained that she’s ready for them to make their relationship official.”Bryan gave a “hearty yes,” as the insider says, “He couldn’t believe his luck!” It appears Bryan also thinks he and Mariah belong together, and he always wants to be her baby.”
“These two aren’t waiting around for one sweet day to tie the knot.”


"Considering that Maria, Nick and the twins recently made a lovely appearance at the 2018 children's Choice Awards, Maria's ex boyfriend will see her at the scene and say" I do. "
"Maria is eager to get married in May at the grand Willa resort in Maui. The person familiar with the matter told OK that she and Bryan had disclosed their love affair for the first time. Maria and Bryan established a relationship with Maria at the end of 2016 and confirmed the relationship in a low-key way in February 2017 by..."
According to reports, the idol singer asked her BAE, Bryan Tanaka, about their big day
"When Mariah Carey, 47, looks at her 34 year old boyfriend Bryan Tanaka, does she have a vision of love that makes her feel all kinds of emotions?"
According to reports, after deciding not to let go of the big man, Maria decided to make it come true - engagement, that's it! "
"It's said that Maria is in her own hands," a source told OK
“… Magazine, "it was an unusual proposal, but it worked
"She wrote a song that said she wanted Brian to be her husband, and she performed it for him in a sexy, gorgeous dress."
"Then she explained that she was ready to formalize their relationship." Brian said "sincerely agree," as people familiar with the matter said, "he can't believe his luck! "Brian seems to think that he and Maria belong together. He always wants to be her child."
"These two are not waiting for a sweet day to get married."



Number  240
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Follow @htshowbiz for more...”
“But without even a draft of the settlement being written by either side, it just goes to show ‘how at odds they continue to be,’ the report continued.”
“But their divorce still isn’t final, a new report says, because they still haven’t agreed to terms about their six children.”
“According to E!”
“News, Jolie is resentful of Pitt for essentially locking her down in Los Angeles, because he’s chosen a film that will be shot in LA to be near his kids.”
“Jolie, meanwhile, had planned on taking them to Europe.”
““Brad is opposed to that and is blocking it from happening.”
“Brad will be filming in LA for the summer and wants to see the kids on his regular custody schedule,” a source told E.He currently sees his children - Maddox, Pax, Zahara, Shiloh, Knox and Vivienne - a few times a week.”
“Jolie, according to the report, is ‘furious’ at the situation.”
“Brad Pitt and Angelina Jolie split in September 2016.”


"Follow @ htshowbiz to learn more..."
"But neither side has drafted a draft settlement agreement, which only shows that their differences continue to exist," the report continued
"But their divorce is still not final, a new report says, because they haven't reached an agreement on their six children."
"According to e!"
"The latest news is that Julie is outraged that Pete has locked her up in Los Angeles because he has chosen a film to be shot in Los Angeles close to his children."
Meanwhile, Julie plans to take them to Europe
"Brad was against it and prevented it from happening."
"Brad will be filming in Los Angeles this summer and he wants to see his children in his regular custody schedule," a source told E. He currently sees his children - Maddox, parks, Zahara, Shiloh, Knox and Vivian - several times a week
"Julie is reported to be 'angry' about the situation."
"Brad Pitt and Angelina Jolie broke up in September 2016."



Number  241
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“HollywoodLifers, do you think it’s finally time that Selena gets her own American Vogue cover?”
“Selena has never landed an American Vogue cover after appearing on international editions including Brazil and Australia, so it would be perfect timing for her to get one and show off her sexy romance with The Weeknd.”
“Those two followed in the footsteps Kanye West, 39, and Kim Kardashian‘s 2014 cover spread that the 36-year-old reality star had been coveting for years.”
“Who can forget that epic kiss she gave him while doing a yoga handstand above his body?”
“...as their backdrop...”
“Of course they would want the shoot to be as glamorous as possible and our inside says that Paris and Greece were named as potential location shoots Gigi and Zayn s insanely hot Vogue spread will be hard to top as the two stunners were photographed with romantic Naples Italy...”
“The singer is the new face of the clothing and accessories brand, and we’re sure she’d love to wear their designs in the magazine alongside her stylish boyfriend.”
“Selly had Anna’s ear during the Coach show at NYFW, where they were seated together in the front row Feb. 14.”
“Celebrity couples always do well for Vogue and needless to say Selena and The Weeknd are today’s top trendsetters and Hollywood’s hottest couple,” a source tells HollywoodLife.com EXCLUSIVELY.”
“Anna loves the idea.”


"Hollywood stars, do you think it's time for Serena to finally get on the cover of American fashion?"
"Serena has never been on the cover of American fashion magazine since she appeared in international editions such as Brazil and Australia, so this is a great time for her to show her sexy romance with this week."
"They follow what Kanye West, 39, and Kim Kardashian, a 36 year old reality star, coveted for years, said on their 2014 cover."
"Who can forget the epic kiss she gave him when she was doing a yoga handstand over his body?"
“… As their background... "
"Of course, they will want to shoot as glamorous as possible. Our internal sources say that Paris and Greece are named as potential locations. It will be difficult to shoot Gigi and Zane's crazy hot fashion spread, because these two stunts are taken with romantic Naples and Italy..."
"The singer is a new face for clothing and accessories brands, and we believe she will like to wear their designs in magazines with her fashionable boyfriends."
On February 14, during a New York Fire Department coach show, Celie heard Anna's voice and they sat in the front row together
A source told reporters: "star lovers always do well in fashion magazine. Needless to say, Selena and weekend are the hottest trend leaders and the hottest couples in Hollywood." Exclusive to Hollywood life
"Anna likes the idea."



Number  242
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“...of Angelina and the kids he quietly fumes while and he doubles his energy to provide the children with a quiet peaceful normal life Advertisement Fans are hoping the pair will work things out away from the media...”
“While Angelina treats the children like her best friends and takes them on dates to her award show appearances Brad has been trying to instill in his children the wholesome humble midwest values he grew up learning The individual concluded by Every time Brad sees another picture in the press...”
“Angelina keeps dragging the kids to red carpets, award shows, and extravagant trips around the world while Brad has been doing the complete opposite.”
“The family friend had the following to say: “Brad and Angelina have been at war over how to raise and educate their many children.”
“He wants to protect the kids as much as possible and not open them up to public scrutiny.”According to another insider, Pitt disagrees with Jolie on how to raise their children, and it drew them apart.”
“The person in the know shared: “like to spend more time with them than he does, when he is with his children, his children, he prefers to keep things very private and safe.”
“However, a source told Us Weekly that Pitt is an excellent father who is dedicated to his little clan.”
“It was claimed that Jolie pulled the split trigger after Pitt got into an argument with Maddox.”
“They are now in a better place than they have been in a long time and should be settling their divorce and custody agreement by sometime in February.”The former couple announced their divorce in late 2016.”
“The insider, who spoke to the publication, revealed: “Brad and Angelina are near an amicable agreement with the kids.”


“…… As for Angelina and the children, he smokes quietly. Meanwhile, he redoubles his efforts to provide a quiet and peaceful normal life for the children. Advertising fans hope that the couple can solve the problem away from the media.... "
"When Angelina treats the children as best friends and takes them to the awards ceremony, Brad has been trying to instill in the children the healthy and humble Midwest values he developed since childhood. Every time Brad sees another picture in the media, he will learn from this person's conclusion..."
"Angelina always drags the kids onto the red carpet, awards ceremonies and luxury trips around the world, while Brad always does the opposite."
"Brad and Angelina have been arguing about how to raise and educate their children," the family friend said
"He wants to protect the children as much as possible, not put them under public scrutiny." Another person familiar with the matter said that Pitt's disagreement with Julie on how to raise the children separated them
"He likes to spend more time with them, and when he's with his children, he prefers to keep things secret and safe," the insider shared
"However, a source told us weekly that Pete was an outstanding father who was dedicated to his small family."
"It is said that Julie pulled the trigger after Pitt and Maddox had a dispute."
"They are in a better position now than they were a long time ago and should settle the divorce and guardianship agreement sometime in February." The former couple announced their divorce at the end of 2016
"Brad and Angelina have almost reached a friendly agreement with the children," the person familiar with the matter said



Number  243
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“DailyEdge is on Instagram!”
“It’s Wade.”
“He doesn’t even hold back when it’s his wife.”
“Last august, he shared this photo of himself and wife Blake Lively and wrote “Happy Birthday to my amazing wife.”Happy Birthday to my amazing wife.”
“A post shared by Ryan Reynolds (@vancityreynolds) on Aug 25, 2017 at 8:20pm PDTDon’t worry.”
“Blake got her revenge on Ryan’s birthday in October.”
“Happy Birthday, baby.”
“A post shared by Blake Lively (@blakelively) on Oct 23, 2017 at 3:25pm PDTThe latest birthday that Ryan Reynolds has celebrated was Zayn Malik’s.”
“Source: F. SadouHe sent the former One Direction star a video of himself in character as Deadpool.”
“He opened by saying “Zayn!”


"Dailyedge is on instagram!"
"It's Wade."
"When it was his wife, he didn't even flinch."
Last August, he shared this picture of him and his wife, black lively, and wrote "Happy Birthday to my wonderful wife." Happy birthday to my wonderful wife
"Don't worry about the post that Ryan Reynolds (@ vancityreynolds) shared at 8:20 p.m. on August 25, 2017."
"Black took revenge on Ryan's October birthday."
"Happy birthday, baby."
"Blake Lively (@ blakelively) posted a post at 3:25 p.m. on October 23, 2017. Ryan Reynolds recently celebrated zayn Malik's birthday."
"Source: f. sadouhe sent the former one-way star a video of himself playing the role of Deadpool."
He said, "Zane!"



Number  244
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“...to son Eissa Al Mana in January 2017”
“RELATED VIDEO Jenna Dewan on Janet Jackson Receiving Icon Award at the BBMAs She Changed the Game for Dancers In addition not only was the moment her first television performance in nine years but it was also the first time she has performed a live broadcast since she gave birth...”
“I will always have love and respect for my family Paris Jackson said Paris Jackson Says No One From My Family Reached Out About Attending BBMAs for Aunt Janet s Honor One day after the Las Vegas event the only daughter of the late Michael Jackson revealed she had absolutely...”
“...no idea about Janet s tribute on Sunday or that her own family members would be in attendance much less...”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
““No one from my mgmt reached out to me about attending billboards or about the award, and no one from my family did either.”
“I had absolutely no idea until y’all spammed with hatred,” Paris shared on her Instagram Story Monday.”
“Check out PEOPLE’s full Billboard Music Awards coverage to get the latest news on music’s big night.”
“Image zoom Paris Jackson; Janet Jackson | Credit: Bertrand Rindoff Petroff/Getty; Steve Granitz/WireImageMeanwhile, Paris shared cryptic messages about her current dynamic with the Jackson family.”
““Dear social media followers, friends, stalkers, lovers and haters, and fellow moonwalkers: Please do not tell me/demand/try to control how I handle my relationship with the people in my life, specifically my family,” she wrote.”


"To my son isa almana in January 2017"
"Jenna Dewan, a video about Janet Jackson winning the idol award on bbmas, changed the game of dancers. This is not only her first TV performance in nine years, but also her first live broadcast after childbirth..."
"I will always love and respect my family, Paris Jackson said. One day after the event in Las Vegas, no one in my family offered to participate in bbmas to commemorate aunt Janet. The only daughter of the late Michael Jackson revealed that she absolutely
“…… I don't know that Janet's memorial service on Sunday, or that her own family will be much less present... "
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
"No one in my management asked me to take part in billboards or win awards, nor did my family."
Paris shared her story on instagram on Monday: "I had no idea until you were all full of hatred."
"Check out all the Billboard Music Awards in people magazine for the latest news on music night."
"Image zooming Paris Jackson; Janet Jackson | source: Bertrand rindoff Petroff / Getty; Steve granitz / wireimages at the same time, Paris shares mysterious information about her current developments with the Jackson family."
"Dear social media followers, friends, stalkers, lovers and enemies, and moon walkers: please don't tell me / demand / try to control how I deal with people in my life, especially my family," she wrote



Number  245
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Photo Credit: WENN Ltd/Alamy Stock Photo...”
“Her attorney, James Leonard, tells the Gossip Cop website that she has no current plans to do a spinoff show about Joe’s possible deportation.”
“UPDATE – Teresa is denying this report.”
“Joe will reportedly be turned over to ICE custody upon his March 2019 release, although it is likely he could be released earlier than March which would mean an earlier deportation back to Italy.”
“She is a good mom and wants to provide for her children,” the source stated.”
“She never stops thinking about taking care of her girls and she agreed to this so that they would have money for college.”
““Teresa will do anything for the money.”
“Earlier this year, an Immigration official confirmed that “records show that an immigration judge ordered Mr. Giudice be removed from the United States on March 14, 2018.”A source close to Teresa adds that she needs the Bravo money as Joe tries to appeal the deportation order.”
“IS TERESA BEGGING PRESIDENT TRUMP TO STOP JOE’S DEPORTATION?”
““It is going to be like the other specials when she was in prison and will show how she and Joe and the girls are handling the scary prospect of Joe getting deported,” added the source.”


"Image source: Wynn Limited / Alami stock image..."
"Her lawyer, James Leonard, told gossip police.com that she has no plans to do a sideshow on Joe's possible deportation at the moment."
"The latest news - Theresa denied the report."
"It is reported that Joe will be put under ice supervision after his release in March 2019, but he is likely to be released before March, which means that he will be deported to Italy ahead of time."
"She's a good mother and wants to support her children," the source said
"She never stopped thinking about taking care of her daughter, and she agreed, so that they would have the money to go to college."
"Theresa would do anything for the money."
"Earlier this year, an immigration official confirmed that" records show that the immigration judge ordered Mr. Judith to be expelled from the United States on March 14, 2018. " A source close to Theresa added that she needed the money when Joe tried to appeal the expulsion order. "
"Is Theresa begging president trump to stop Joe from being deported?"
"It's going to be like other special shows when she's in prison and it's going to show how she and Joe and the girl are dealing with the terrible prospect of Joe being deported," the source added



Number  246
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Tour Canceling Revival World Tour Was Best Thing She Could Have Done Featured Image by Theo Wargo Getty Images For US Weekly...”
“RELATED POSTS ON THE INQUISITR Selena Gomez Interview Singer Hints Bieber Made Her Feel Insecure During Their Relationship Selena Gomez Admits She Needs Therapy Months After Rehab To Help Her Deal With Haters And Fame Selena Gomez Says Boyfriend The Weeknd Is Her Best Friend I m Lucky Selena Gomez...”
“That’s what an article in the current issue of Star Magazine says.”
“The tabloid alleges that the “Starboy” singer may have slept with an Irish model while he was on tour in Dublin.”
“But Gossip Cop is on the case and they claim that the story is nothing but the work of a Bad Liar As Gossip Cop reports Star Magazine says that it learned that The Weeknd aka Abel Tesfaye invited Irish Instagram model Ava Van Rose back to his hotel the...”
“...night before his performance at the Longitude Festival in Dublin on July 15 They say that they got the information from a so called insider who told them that the model spent some time with The Weeknd...”
“The article then speculates about how Selena will react to the “news” that Abel may have cheated on her, implying that Gomez would be emotionally gutted by the news.”
““She hoped Abel would prove her wrong.”
“If Selena finds out about this hookup with Van Rose there s no telling what she might do But Gossip Cop insists that the story is based on what they call unsubstantiated rumors They say that the story was first published in The Irish Sun and was derived from an...”
“...insider in the model s circle...”


"Canceling the tour and reviving the world tour is the best thing she can do. Feature theo voggetti as the image of American weekly..."
"An interview with singer Selena Gomez, an investigator, suggested that Bieber was making her feel insecure in their relationship. Selena Gomez admitted that she needed treatment to help her deal with her haters and celebrities after a few months of recovery. Selena Gomez said that her boyfriend this week was her best friend, and I'm very lucky Selena Gomez..."
"That's what an article in this issue of star magazine says."
The tabloid claimed that the star boy singer might have slept with an Irish model while touring Dublin
"But gossip police is investigating the case and they claim that the story is just the work of a bad liar, because gossip police reported that star magazine said they learned that this week, also known as Abel tesfaye, invited Irish instagram model AVA van rose back to his hotel..."
“… The night before he performed at the longitude festival in Dublin on July 15, they said they got information from a so-called insider who told them that the models spent some time on the weekend... "
"The article then speculates about Selena's reaction to the" news "that Abel may cheat her, which means that Gomez will be emotional by the news."
"She wanted Abel to prove her wrong."
"If Serena finds out about her relationship with van Roth, it's not clear what she might do, but the scandal police insist that the story is based on what they call unconfirmed rumors. They say the story was originally published in the Irish sun and came from a..."
“… Inside the model circle... "



Number  247
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Hewitt, who supplied a number of photographs of bruising and injuries she alleges she obtained from the altercation, was admitted to Cedars-Sinai Medical Center after the incident, where police issued the emergency protective order and filed a report.”
“...stand against domestic violence...”
“...abusive toward her...”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
“In court documents obtained by PEOPLE, Phillippe’s lawsuit denies the allegations, claiming Hewitt “broke into Phillippe’s home in the middle of the night without permission” and “fabricated a story in an unjustified attempt to extort money” from him to help her modeling career.”
“PEOPLE has reached out to both Phillippe’s and Hewitt’s attorneys.”
“Phillippe alleges Hewitt, 21, made a false police report accusing him of injuring her in the early morning of July 4 when the alleged incident is said to have taken place.”
“The actor also claims Hewitt was extremely intoxicated He further says in his suit that he was raised by women in a household where women s rights feminism and advocacy were very much at the forefront and he is sickened to have been falsely accused of domestic violence Phillippe tweeted...”
“...on Wednesday after the news of his lawsuit broke writing to be clear i have not had a girlfriend for over a year now have barely dated anyone since...”
“...any other labels or mis- characterizations, from media or gossips, related to anyone, briefly, connected to my personal life, are false.”He continued, “happy thanksgiving.”Authorities closed the criminal investigation regarding domestic violence against the actor in September.”


"Hewitt provided some pictures of bruises and injuries she claimed to have obtained from the quarrel. After the incident, she was taken to sidas Sinai Medical Center, where the police issued an emergency protection order and submitted a report."
“… Against domestic violence... "
“… Abuse her... "
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
"In court documents available to people, Philip's lawsuit denies these charges, claiming that Hewitt" broke into Philip's home in the middle of the night without permission "and" fabricated a story in an attempt to extort money from him unreasonably "to help her modeling career."
"People have contacted Philip and Hewitt's lawyers."
Philip claims that Hewitt, 21, made a false police report early in the morning of July 4, accusing him of hurting her at the time of the alleged incident
"The actor also claimed that Hewitt was drunk. In the lawsuit, he further said that he grew up in a women's family, where feminism and feminist advocacy are very prominent. He is disgusted at being framed for domestic violence," Philip tweeted
“…… On Wednesday, after the news of his lawsuit came out, I wrote to make it clear that I had no girlfriend for more than a year, and since then, I have hardly dated anyone... "
"Any other labels or misrepresentations in the media or in the gossip that relate to my personal life are false." He went on, "Happy Thanksgiving." Authorities ended a criminal investigation into the actor's domestic violence in September



Number  248
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“For her sister Pippa’s wedding last May, she wore a blush pink midi dress also by Alexander McQueen, which matched the sash of Charlotte’s flower girl dress.”
“Kate is a pro at wedding guest style , always looking elegant without upstaging the bride.”
“Alexander McQueen for Prince Harry and Meghan Markle s wedding at St George s Chapel in Windsor...”
“Of course, it's the same designer who created Kate's wedding dress for her big day in April 2011.”
“Kate arrived at the service hand-in-hand with the bridesmaids, including daughter Princess Charlotte, 3, who were dressed in white with rose-adorned headbands.”
“She teamed her ensemble with a matching Philip Treacy hat and shoes by Jimmy Choo.”
“Though undeniably stunning, the Duchess' choice created a stir as wedding protocol dictates that only the bride wears white when tying the knot.”
“(Image: Getty)(Image: Getty) (Image: PA)Video Loading Video Unavailable Click to play Tap to play The video will auto-play soon 8 Cancel Play nowMany viewers took to Twitter to complain about the colour.”
“"I'm no wedding expert... but should Kate Middleton be wearing white to a wedding if it's not her wedding?"”
“"Is Kate Middleton srsly (sic) wearing white to the #RoyalWedding "" Kate Middleton : the only person in the world who can get away with wearing white at a wedding."”


At her sister Pippa's wedding in May last year, she wore a light pink MIDI skirt designed by Alexander McQueen to match the belt of Charlotte's flower skirt
"Kate is an expert on the style of wedding guests. She always looks elegant and doesn't steal the limelight of the bride."
"Alexander McQueen married Prince Harry and Megan markel at St. George's Church in Windsor..."
"Of course, the same designer designed Kate's wedding dress for her big day in April 2011."
Kate and the bridesmaids came to the wedding hand in hand, including her three-year-old daughter, Princess Charlotte, who wore a white dress and a rose colored headband
"She paired her ensemble with Jimmy Choo's Philip Treacy hat and shoes."
"Although undeniably shocking, the Duchess's choice caused a sensation, because the wedding etiquette stipulated that only the bride would wear white when she married."
"(picture: Getty) (picture: Getty) (picture: PA) video loading video not available click play click play video will play automatically soon 8 cancel now many viewers complain about color on twitter."
"I'm not a wedding expert... But if it's not Kate Middleton's wedding, should she dress in white? "
"Kate Middleton (SIC) dressed in white for the royal wedding?" "Kate Middleton: the only person in the world who doesn't wear white at a wedding."



Number  249
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Let us know in the comments section.”
“What are your thoughts on Robert's healthier lifestyle?”
“Source: BACKGRIDThe two co-starred in the film Lost City of Z, and it was reported Charlie got an icy reception from the 31-year-old, and maybe his interest in marijuana is why!”
“...partner is exactly what he needed to turn his life around...”
“He doesn t want to hang out with him or his other hard partying friends like Tom Sturridge or Eddie Redmayne Source BACKGRID But we haven t heard anything negative about FKA Twigs since they started dating in 2014 so it sounds like having a low profile and more mature...”
““Rob’s dismayed that Charlie Hunnam hasn’t given up his pot habit.”
“Article continues below advertisementSource: BACKGRID"He's matured a lot and become this very serious young man,” adds the source.”
“...of Twilight we can only imagine what happened after those infamous photos of Kristen Stewart making out with her movie producer boss while they were still together did to him...”
“Rob was basically a 24 hour pot smoker back in his Twilight days but since his relationship with Twigs got serious he s scaled back on all his vices and hardly ever drinks or smokes around other people Source BACKGRID If Robert drank due to being stressed with the fame...”
“Article continues below advertisementSource: BACKGRIDThe insider tells OK!”


"Please let us know in the comments section."
"What do you think of Robert's healthier lifestyle?"
"Source: BACKGROUND: the two co starred in the movie" lost Z City ". It is reported that Charlie got a cold reception from a 31 year old girl. Maybe his interest in marijuana is the reason!"
“… His partner is what he needs to change his life... "
"He doesn't want to go out with him or other party loving friends, such as Tom Sturridge or Eddie Redmayne source backgrid, but since FKA twigs started dating in 2014, we haven't heard any negative news about them, so it sounds like low-key and more mature..."
"Charlie Hennan didn't get rid of marijuana. Rob was depressed."
The article goes on in the advertisement source: backgrid "he has matured a lot and become a very serious young man," the source added
“…… In twilight, we can only imagine what happened to Kristen Stewart after the infamous photos she took when she was still with her filmmaker boss... "
"Rob was basically a 24-hour marijuana smoker in his old age, but since his relationship with twig became more serious, he reduced all his bad habits and almost never drank or smoked around others. If rob drank because of his fame..."
Let's continue with the article advertising source: backgrid insiders can tell you! "



Number  250
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“VIDEO: The Five Biggest Haircut Trends of 2020”
“...in January...”
“To help you figure out how to wear your hair in the new year we ve rounded up the five biggest haircut trends of 2020 so you ll be sure of what you want before you head to the salon...”
“Or, you can get the look instantly with the help of some clip in extensions.”
“...inspiration...”
“RELATED The 10 Hairstyles You ll See Everywhere This Winter But if you swear that 2020 is going to be the year you finally grow out your hair let Jennifer Lopez and Kim Kardashian s extra long lengths be your...”
“As seen on Kerry Washington, 2020's bob has textured, softer edges, and looks amazing whether you part it down the middle or off to the side.”
“But there will be a few tweaks.”
“For anyone with a blunt bob — the most popular haircut of the past few years — you probably already guessed that the cut will still be going strong into the next decade.”
“This decade's first big hair trends include looks at every length that can be tailored to your hair texture and personal style.”


"Video: five haircut trends in 2020"
“… January... "
"To help you understand how to wear your hair in the new year, we summarize the five major haircut trends in 2020 so that you can determine what you want before you go to the Salon..."
"Or, you can get an immediate look with some plug-in extensions."
“… Inspiration... "
"You can see 10 hairstyles all over the place this winter, but if you swear that 2020 will be the year when your hair finally grows, let the super long hairstyles of Jennifer Lopez and Kim Kardashian become yours..."
"As Kerry Washington saw in 2020, Bob has texture, soft edges and looks amazing, whether you're part down the middle or closed to the side."
"But there will be some adjustments."
"For anyone with straight hair - the most popular hairstyle of the past few years - you may have guessed that it will remain strong for the next decade."
"The number one hairstyle trend of this decade includes hairstyles of every length, which can be customized according to your hair texture and personal style."



Number  251
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“5” by Lou Bega.”
“Also in attendance was Kourtney’s daughter Penelope, who held baby True on her lap while Dream busted an adorable move with the other children to the tune of “Mambo No.”
“A rendition of The Wheels on the Bus could be heard in a third video shared by the Good American mogul where a group of youngsters were dancing around to the famed kids song...”
“It s very cute Image zoom Khloé Kardashian and Kim Kardashian West with daughters True and Chicago Credit Kim Kardsahian Instagram In a pair of videos Khloé shared to her Snapchat account earlier this month Kourtney 39 picked up True and said I m gonna steal her for baby class...”
““Right now, Dream and Reign are super obsessed with each other.”“Chicago knows that she’s the oldest one out of the three babies and she definitely shows off a little bit in front of True, LOL,” Khloé reveals.”
“Image zoom Penelope Disick and True Thompson | Credit: Khloe Kardashian/SnapchatImage zoom True Thompson and Khloé Kardashian | Credit: Khloe Kardashian/SnapchatRELATED VIDEO: The Kardashian Kids“It’s so fun to see how they all interact and connect,” she says of the kids.”
“Click here to get those and more in the PEOPLE Babies newsletter.”
“I can’t wait to watch it continue!”Want all the latest pregnancy and birth announcements, plus celebrity mom blogs?”
“Explains the Keeping Up with the Kardashians reality star, “Seeing their strong little personalities bond with each other is the best thing to witness.”
“We have baby class once a week together with all of the kids and it’s incredible!” wrote Khloé, 34.”


"5" by Lou Bega
Courtney's daughter Penelope was also present at the wedding. She sat on her lap with betaine in her arms, while Meng sang "Mambo no" with other children and performed a lovely action
"In the third video, people can hear the performance of the wheels on the car. This video is shared by this kind American tycoon. A group of young people dance around the famous children's songs..."
"It's a very lovely picture. Kutni, 39, said in a pair of videos shared with her snapchat account earlier this month," I'm going to steal her to a baby class... "
"Now, dream and regine are super addicted to each other." "Chicago knows that she is the eldest of three children, and she will certainly show off a little bit in front of true, ha ha," khlo é revealed
"Image zooming Penelope disc and true Thompson | source: Khloe Kardashian / snapchatimage zooming true Thompson and khlo é Kardashian | source: Khloe Kardashian / snapchatreleased VIDEO:Kardashian "Kids," she said of the kids, "it's really fun to see how they interact and connect."
"Click here to get these and more information in the people's baby newsletter."
"I can't wait to see it go on! "Want all the latest pregnancy and childbirth announcements, plus celebrity mom blogs?"
"Kardashian reality show stars" explained, "to see their strong little personalities connected is the best witness."
"It's incredible that we have a baby class with all the kids once a week! The 34 year old wrote



Number  252
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“'My dad and Bruce were always really close — Kendall and Kylie even called my dad Uncle Robert which I loved.'”
“'I was seriously the luckiest girl in the world growing up because I had two amazing dads who not only loved us kids more than anything, but adored each other as well.”
“...had told her that he and Kris were not sleeping together at the time Khloe was conceived...”
“Different Khloe has often pointed out that she looks nothing like her older sisters and their mother Kris far right said once people asked whether she was the milkman s child Fighting back Khloe has responded to the claims today on Twitter She said Robert who is of Armenian descent...”
“Didn't look anything like the other three children.'”
“She was tall, had a different shape, light hair, curly hair.”
“She looked nothing like the rest.”
“'Khloe brought it up all the time.”
“She claims Khloe, who is married to Dallas Mavericks basketballer Lamar Odom, knew she had a different father to her sisters and younger brother Rob.”
“'And I said… "OK" and that was it.'”


"My dad and Bruce have always been very close. Kendall and Kelly even call me dad Uncle Robert. I like it very much."
"When I was growing up, I was really the luckiest girl in the world because I had two great dads who not only loved our children more than anything else, but also adored each other."
“… Tell her he and Chris didn't sleep together when Chloe was pregnant... "
"Different Khloe often point out that she doesn't look like her sisters at all. Their mother, Kris far right, once asked if she was the child of a milkman who opposed Khloe, she responded to today's statement on twitter that Robert was of Armenian origin..."
"Not at all like the other three children."
"She's tall and has a different shape, light hair, curly hair."
"She's not like anyone else at all."
"Khloe talks about it all the time."
"She claimed that heroy, who married Dallas Mavericks basketball player Lamar Odom, knew that her father was different from her sister and brother rob."
"I said..." "All right." that's it. “



Number  253
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Kim and Kanye - already parents to daughter North, four, and son Saint, 21 months - will welcome a baby girl via surrogate in January.”
“Youngest sibling Kylie Jenner, 20, is pregnant with her first child with rapper boyfriend Travis Scott, 25.”
“The former basketball star, 37 - whose divorce from the reality star, 33, was finalized in December 2016 - wished his former flame well during an interview on YouTube's Complex News Channel's morning show, Everyday Struggle, on Wednesday.”
“Odom told hosts Joe Budden, DJ Akademiks and Nadeska Alexis: 'From a distance, I wish her well.”
“I've still got love for her'.”
“Good times: Lamar Odom has publicly congratulated his ex-wife Khloe Kardashian on her reported 'pregnancy' (pictured in May 2012)Khloe is said to be 'four months along in her pregnancy' with her first child with Cleveland Cavaliers star Tristan Thompson, 26, according to Us Weekly.”
“Lamar - who was married to Khloe for four years - also spoke about the stress of receiving so much media attention while married to the Keeping Up With The Kardashians star.”
“'Some of the sh*t I did to myself… but yeah, it was a little smearing campaign I think going on,' he shared.”
“The former sportsman addressed drifting apart from ex brother-in-law Kanye West, 40, who is married to Khloe's sister Kim, 36.”
“He said: 'I would say it probably deteriorated with all the other relationships that were built.”


"Kim and Kanye are the parents of a four-year-old daughter, north, and a 21-month-old son, saint. They will have a surrogate baby girl in January."
"The youngest brother, Kelly Jenner, is 20 years old. She is pregnant with her first child with rapper boyfriend Travis Scott, who is 25 years old."
"The divorce between the 37 year old former basketball star and the 33 year old reality TV star was finalized in December 2016, and he wished his former lover all the best in an interview with the morning show daily struggle on YouTube comprehensive news channel on Wednesday."
"From a distance, I wish her all the best," Odom told hosts buden, akademix and Alexis
"I still love her."
"Good time: according to us weekly, Lamar Odom publicly congratulated his ex-wife Khloe Kardashian on her pregnancy (photo taken in May 2012), who is said to have given birth to her first child with 26 year old Cleveland Cavaliers star Tristan Thompson."
"Lamar has been married to Chloe for four years, and he also talked about the pressure of so much media attention during his marriage to the" keep up with Kardashian "star
He said: "I played some pranks on myself But, yes, I think it's a smear campaign. "
"The former athlete broke up with his 40 year old brother-in-law, Kanye West, who married helo's 36 year old sister Kim."
"I would like to say that it could worsen the relationship with all the others," he said



Number  254
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Journalism', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“RELATED: Jennifer Aniston Style: Her Best Fuss-Free Fashion Looks...”
“Other attendees of Paltrow's very A-list affair included Reese Witherspoon, Julia Roberts, Demi Moore, Kate Hudson and Chelsea Handler.”
“That is the best supportive group."”
“"All her friends are around her.”
“"She won't fall in love anytime soon," the source noted when asked if she has plans to start dating.”
“Not long after her breakup, a source told ET that Aniston is currently taking time out for herself.”
“Since news broke of her split from Justin Theroux after two years of marriage, the former Friends star has yet to make a formal red-carpet appearance and has kept busy pampering herself and going out with her gal pals.”
“ET has reached out to Aniston's rep for comment.”
“The black splint served as an understated accessory, matching her long flowing black gown and strappy heels.”
“The 49-year-old actress arrived solo to Gwyneth Paltrow and Brad Falchuk's star-studded engagement party at the Los Angeles Theatre while sporting a mysterious brace on her left arm.”


"Related report: Jennifer Aniston style: her best no fuss fashion look..."
"Other top players in Paltrow include Reese Witherspoon, Julia Roberts, Demi Moore, Kate Hudson and Chelsea Handler."
"This is the best support group."
"All her friends are by her side."
"She won't fall in love soon," the source said when asked if she had plans to start dating
"Shortly after the breakup, a source told et that Aniston was making time for herself at the moment."
"Since the news of breaking up with Justin Cyrus two years after her marriage came out, the former" friends "star has not officially appeared on the red carpet, but has been busy doting on himself and dating his friends."
"Et has contacted a representative of Aniston for advice."
"The black splint is a low-key accessory that goes with her flowing black robe and lace up heels."
"The 49 year old actress came alone to Gwyneth Paltrow and Brad falchuk's star engagement party at the Los Angeles Theater with a mysterious bracket on her left arm."



Number  255
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“On the track Jay clears the air about exactly what happened I said no to the Super Bowl You need me I don t need you Every night we in the endzone Tell the NFL we in stadiums too These are the kinds of lines we ve come to expect...”
“As Cardi B would say, that’s not a reliable source.”
“Taken together, they’re the culmination of decades worth of perfecting the craft of controlling the narrative.”
“Each album has given us the plot twists, conflicts, and resolution we’ve become accustomed to consuming through every form of media besides music.”
“Everything Is Love completes The Carters’ trilogy of albums that began with Beyoncé’s 2016 project Lemonade and continued with Jay’s 2017 release 4:44.”
“Nowhere is that strategy more evident than on their new album.”
“They’ve basically monetized their gossip.”
“Rather than giving outlets and social media the details of their private lives, they give us updates through their songs.”
“When the time comes to unleash a new provocative detail, it always seems to come at the perfect and most commercially viable moment.”
“Like everything else they do, it’s calculated.”


"On the track, Jay clarified what happened. I said no to the super bowl, you need me, I don't need you. Every night we told NFL in the terminal area that we were also in the stadium. This is the kind of line we expected..."
"As Cardi B put it, this is not a reliable source."
"To sum up, they are the crystallization of decades of perfect control narrative techniques."
"Every album brings us plot twists and turns, conflicts and solutions. We are used to consuming through various media other than music."
"Everything is love has completed cartel's trilogy album, from Beyonce's lemonade project in 2016 to Jay's 4:44 release in 2017."
"This strategy is most obvious in their new album."
"They basically monetized their gossip."
"Instead of providing the media and social media with the details of their private lives, they provide us with the latest news through songs."
"When new provocative details are introduced, it always seems to come at the most perfect and commercially viable time."
"Like everything else they do, it's calculated."



Number  256
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“REUTERS/Mark BlinchOnline Editors...”
“2017”
“Photo by Michael Kovac Getty Images for for J P HRO Gala Author First They Killed My Father Loung Ung Director designer by Rithy Panh Maddox Chivan Jolie Pitt Shiloh Nouvel Jolie Pitt Angelina Jolie Composer Him Sophy and guest attend Bangsokol A Requiem for Cambodia at BAM Brooklyn Academy...”
“...of Music on December 16 2017 in New York City...”
“Photo by Cindy Ord Getty Images for Brooklyn Academy of Music Actors Brad Pitt and Angelina Jolie C with children L R Pax Jolie Pitt Zahara Jolie Pitt Knox Jolie Pitt Shiloh Jolie Pitt and Maddox Jolie Pitt attend the World Premiere of Disney s Maleficent starring Angelina Jolie at...”
“...the El Capitan Theatre on May 28 2014 in Hollywood California...”
“(Photo by Charley Gallay/Getty Images for Disney)Brad Pitt; Pax Thien Jolie-Pitt, Shiloh Nouvel Jolie-Pitt and Maddox Jolie-Pitt attend the "Unbroken" Los Angeles premiere held at the TCL Chinese Theatre IMAX on December 15, 2014 in Hollywood, California.”
“(Photo by JB Lacroix/WireImage)Angelina Jolie with husband Brad and some of their six children.”
“Brad Pitt attends the premiere of Amazon Studios' "The Lost City Of Z" at ArcLight Hollywood on April 5, 2017 in Hollywood, California.”
“(Photo by Rich Fury/Getty Images)Angelina Jolie has reportedly been ordered to allow Brad Pitt to spend more time with their children.”


"Reuters / mark bringe online editor..."
“2017”
"First they killed my father loung rithy panh Maddox chivan Jolie Pitt Shiloh Nouvel Jolie Pitt Angelina Jolie composer him Sophie and guests attended bangsokol's Requiem for Cambodia at BAM Brooklyn College..."
“… Music in New York City on December 16, 2017... "
"Brooklyn Conservatory of music actors Brad Pitt and Angelina Jolie C and children's photos L R parks Jolie Pitt Zahara Jolie Pitt Knox Jolie Pitt Shiloh Jolie Pitt and Maddox Jolie Pitt attend the world premiere of Disney prank starring Angelina Jolie..."
“… May 28, 2014 El Capitan theater, Hollywood, California... "
(Charlie Gary / Getty pictures for Disney) Brad Pitt, parks Dean Jolie Pitt, Shiloh nuville Jolie Pitt and Maddox Jolie Pitt attended the "uninterrupted" Los Angeles Premiere of TCL China theater IMAX in Hollywood, California on December 15, 2014
"(JB Lacroix / WireImage) Angelina Jolie has a picture with her husband Brad and some of their six children."
"Brad Pitt attended the premiere of Amazon studio lost Z City in Arclight Hollywood on April 5, 2017 in Hollywood, California."
(Photo by rich fury / Getty Images) Angelina Jolie has been ordered to allow Brad Pitt more time with her children, according to the report



Number  257
Source test case:  ['Agenda Driven', 'Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“43 in the fall...”
“And for fans of Saturday Night Live Weekend Update Summer Edition promises to feature contributions from a number of the show s key cast members during the next few weeks providing a nice holdover until the mothership returns for Season...”
“If not, “Weekend Update: Summer Edition” is unlikely to seduce you.”
“NBC s special edition of the faux newscast stretches the segment and adds a commercial break which that means more than ever its success rests not on the momentum of the evening the charisma of the host or the enthusiasm...”
“...of the studio audience but on the talents and chemistry of anchors Colin Jost and Michael Che...”
“Those two are still grappling with a stilted awkwardness in their “Weekend Update” personas that make them both less engaging than they would otherwise be on their own.”
“But as “Saturday Night Live” has enjoyed a resurgence in ratings and cultural relevancy, Jost’s and Che’s growing pains have smoothed out into a predictable dynamic.”
“Tonight s premiere of Weekend Update Summer Edition had the advantage of a ton of Trump related material to work with and several guest appearances SNL cast member Leslie Jones featured cast members Mikey Day and Alex Moffat and alum...”
“Bill Hader in a committed impression as Anthony Scaramucci...”
“Jost’s biggest laugh — one punctuated with gasps and groans — came from a remark about how even President Franklin Roosevelt knew when to stand up.”


"Autumn of 43..."
"For fans of Saturday night live weekend, the summer update promises that some major actors will contribute in the next few weeks to provide a good endurance period before the Mothership returns..."
"If not, weekend update: Summer Edition is unlikely to tempt you."
"NBC's special edition of fake news extends this part and adds a commercial break, which means that its success, more than ever, does not depend on the momentum of the evening, the charisma or enthusiasm of the host..."
“…… In the studio audience, but in the talent and chemistry of hosts Colin Jost and Michael Chester... "
"These two people are still facing an embarrassing situation in the role play of" weekend update ", which makes both of them less attractive than being alone."
However, with the rise of the ratings and cultural relevance of live on Saturday night, the growing pains of JOST and Che have gradually subsided and become a predictable dynamic
"Tonight's premiere of the Summer Edition of weekend update has a lot of trump related materials to use. SNL actor Leslie Jones has invited actors Mikey day, Alex Moffat and alum on several guest appearances..."
"Bill hard plays Anthony scaramucci in a strong impression..."
"Jost's biggest laugh - gasping and groaning from time to time - came from the saying that even President Franklin Roosevelt knew when to stand up."



**Something goes wrong**
“Fox News' Tyler McCarthy contributed to this report.”
“Kardashian began dating Bendjima in 2016 after years of on-again-off-again romance with Disick, with whom she shares three children, Mason, 8, Penelope, 6, and Reign, 3.”
“Many Kardashian fans took issue with Bendjima's comment, though the model claims it was just a joke, according to Us Weekly.”
“KIM AND KHLOE KARDASHIAN FIGHT WITH KOURTNEY OVER MONTHS-LONG FEUD IN LIVE TWITTER FIGHT“Thats what you need to show to get likes?” he said in a since-deleted comment.”
“News of the split comes just weeks after Bendjima trolled the "Keeping Up With the Kardashians" star's revealing bikini picture on Instagram.”
“"I know who I am where I'm from and where I'm going and that bothers you ... only one opinion matter the one of my Lord."”
“"I'm not attached to this 'life' so you can't touch me," he continued.”
“Bendjima then posted several photos of his friends playing in the sand.”
“"F--- your Hollywood bulls--- (can't have fun with your friends no more)."”
“KKHLOE KARDASHIAN EXPLAINS HER 'PREGNANCY LIPS'"They really want me to be the bad guy," Bendjima wrote on an Instagram story Tuesday, including a screenshot of a Daily Mail article about his "rebound" girl.”


"Taylor McCarthy of Fox News contributed to this report."
"Kardashian started dating Ben Gemma in 2016 after years of off and on romance with desik, who has three children: 8-year-old Mason, 6-year-old Penelope and 3-year-old Rafe."
According to us weekly, many fans of Kardashian disagreed with Ben Jima's comments, but the model claimed it was just a joke
"Kim and Khloe Kardashian quarreled with Kourtney over months of discord in the fight of twitter live." is that what you need to show in order to get like? "He said in the deleted comment."
Just a few weeks ago, benjima posted a bikini photo of the "keep up with Kardashian" star on instagram
"I know who I am, where I come from and where I'm going, which bothers you... There is only one opinion that matters, and that is the opinion of my Lord
"I don't like this' life ', so you can't touch me," he continued
"Benjima then posted some pictures of friends playing on the beach."
"F --- your Hollywood bulls -- (can't play with your friends any more."
"Khloe Kardashian explained her" pregnant lips "and" they really want me to be a bad person, "she wrote in an instagram report on Tuesday, including a screenshot of a daily mail article about his" rebound "of girls



**Something goes wrong**
““He’s telling his friends that he’s been alone with Kylie tons of times in her house but when they ask if [they’ve been intimate], he simply smiles,” and an insider revealed to In Touch.”
“According to sources, Tim even bragged about how much alone time he has been able to spend with Kylie.”
“...seems like there could have very well been a few instances where Kylie could have been alone with her security guard...”
“And given the whirlwind nature of Kylie s relationship with Travis they started dating just one month after her split from her ex boyfriend Tyga and the fact that Travis was busy touring during the beginning of their relationship it...”
“...s daugther kind of looks like she has some of Tim s features and they started to point it out in the comments...”
“He flat out wants to talk to Kylie and Tim together to once and for all get to the bottom of this Ever since Kylie started sharing more and more photos of baby Stormi fans started to realize that Ky...”
“If that happened and Stormi’s not his, that would be the most devastating news of his life.”
“In the back of his mind he wonders if Kylie strayed.”
“He loves Stormi and truly believes that’s his daughter but can’t help but notice that she doesn’t look like him.”
“He’s not with her 24/7 and there were times they were a part from each other nine months ago.”


"He told his friends that he and Kelly had been alone in her home several times, but when they asked (whether they had an intimate relationship), he just laughed," a person familiar with the matter said
"According to sources, Tim even boasted about how much time he could spend alone with Kelly."
“…… It seems that Kelly and her security guard were alone several times... "
"Considering the whirlwind nature of Kelly's relationship with Travis, they didn't start dating until a month after she broke up with her ex boyfriend TEGA, and Travis was actually busy touring at the beginning of their relationship..."
“… Her daughter looks a bit like Tim, and they start to point out in the comments that
"Ever since Kelly began to share more and more pictures of baby Tommy, he wanted to talk to Kelly and Tim and get to the bottom of it. My fans are beginning to realize, Kelly... "
"If that happens and Tommy is not his, it will be the most devastating news of his life."
"He was wondering if Kelly was lost."
"He loved stommie and believed that it was his daughter, but he couldn't help noticing that she didn't look like him."
"He wasn't with her 24 hours a day, and they were part of each other several times nine months ago."



Number  260
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“FCC defines obscene as content that “must appeal to an average person’s prurient interest; depict or describe sexual conduct in a ‘patently offensive’ way; and, taken as a whole, lack serious literary, artistic, political or scientific value.”Here’s the monologue that launched a thousand complaints:”
“...fined...”
“...s rules In rough numbers the FCC was saying that programs airing on broadcast TV stations before 10 PM are subject to fine if the commission determines they are indecent Shows that run in late night however have a different threshold content must be ruled obscene for stations to be...”
“Today however the FCC put an end to the fun saying in a statement Consistent with standard operating procedure the FCC s Enforcement Bureau has reviewed the complaints and the material that was the subject of these complaints The Bureau has concluded that there was nothing actionable under the FCC”
“Reporters breathlessly reported Colbert was under FCC investigation, and a good time was had by all.”
“The FCC received thousands of complaints.”
“Related Story Stephen Colbert Wins 2016-17 TV Season In Late-Night, Taking On Donald TrumpTrump called Colbert “no-talent guy.” Colbert’s monologue was plastered by some as inappropriately vulgar, by others as homophobic.”
“All hell broke loose.”
“But, intrepid journalists, who are paid to ferret out the truth, discovered what was the word, and they printed it – minus the offending syllable, of course.”
“Colbert’s slew of frat-boy remarks culminated in a crack that the only thing Trump’s mouth is good for “is being Vladimir Putin’s [expletive] holster.” The naughty word was bleeped in the broadcast, and Colbert’s mouth was pixelated.”


The FCC defines obscenity as "having to attract ordinary people's interest in obscenity; describing or describing behavior in an 'obviously offensive' manner; and generally lacking serious literary, artistic, political or scientific value."
“… Fine... "
“… The Federal Communications Commission says that if the Commission determines that a program is indecent late at night, it will be fined for programs broadcast on radio and television before 10 p.m., but stations with different threshold content must be convicted of obscenity... "
"Today, however, the FCC concludes with this interesting statement that, in a statement of compliance with standard operating procedures, the FCC's enforcement agency has reviewed these complaints and the subject matter of these complaints and concluded that there is no action to be taken under the FCC."
"The reporters breathlessly reported that Colbert was being investigated by the FCC and everyone had a good time."
"The FCC has received thousands of complaints."
"It's related that Stephen Colbert won the 2016-17 TV Season of late at night against Donald Trump, calling Colbert" a guy without talent. ". Colbert's monologue is considered inappropriate and vulgar by some people, and homosexual fear by others
"It's all messed up."
"But the intrepid journalists hired to investigate the truth discovered the meaning of the word, and they printed it out - with the offending syllables removed, of course."
"Colbert's series of fraternity boy remarks eventually led to a rift, Trump's mouth is the only good thing" is Vladimir Putin's (curse) leather case. "Naughty words are beeped on the radio, and Colbert's mouth is pixelated."



Number  261
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“What do you think Travis and Blac said to each other, HollywoodLifers?”
“Though, here’s hoping the next time he goes out for a night on the town, he brings his pregnant girlfriend with him for some fun.”
“Travis Scott went partying in Los Angeles without Kylie Jenner, but Blac Chyna was there!”
“We’ve got the EXCLUSIVE details of what happened!”
“Travis Scott, 25, was spotted hitting up the Hollywood hotspot Delilah on Dec. 16, but his long-rumored pregnant girlfriend, Kylie Jenner, 20, was nowhere in sight.”
“However, the House of Kardashian — at least, Kardashian-adjacent — was represented, because Blac Chyna, 29, was there!”
““Travis rolled in with an entourage of buddies and they sat at a booth,” an eyewitness EXCLUSIVELY tells HollywoodLife.com.”
““They ordered bottle service all night, and drank Grey Goose as well as champagne.”
“They weren’t being hectic, it was a pretty chill vibe….Chyna was also at the club with her girls and they sat in a separate area.”
“She was wearing a pretty outrageous dress, one that was skin tight and kind of transparent, especially around the chest area!”An outrageous, semi-transparent outfit?”


"What do you think Travis and Blake said to each other, Hollywood actress?"
"However, I still hope that the next time he goes out to play, he will play with his pregnant girlfriend."
"Travis Scott didn't have Kelly Jenner when he went to the party in Los Angeles, but Blake ziner was there!"
"We have the exclusive details of what happened!"
"Travis Scott, 25, was found chatting with Delilah, a Hollywood hot spot, on December 16, but his long rumored pregnant girlfriend, Kylie Jenner, 20, disappeared."
"However, Kardashian's house - at least, adjacent to Kardashian - is representative, because Braque Chyna, 29, is there!"
"Travis came in with a team of friends and they were sitting in a booth," an exclusive witness told reporters Hollywood life. "
"They order bottles all night and drink grey geese and champagne."
"They're not very busy, it's a rather cold atmosphere Zina is also in the club with her girls, who sit in a separate area
"She's wearing an ugly dress, tight and a little transparent, especially around her chest! "An indecent translucent suit?"



Number  262
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
““It played a role in her wanting to marry Justin.”For more on Aniston and Theroux’s split, pick up the new issue of Us Weekly, on stands now!”
““Jen has struggled with the perception that she is this pathetic woman after the divorce from Brad,” the insider tells Us.”
“Pitt and Jolie, who share Maddox, 16, Pax, 14, Zahara, 12, Shiloh, 11 and 9-year-old twins Knox and Vivienne, called it quits in September 2016 after two years of marriage and 12 years together.”
“He infamously moved on from the Friends alum with his Mr. and Mrs. Smith costar, Angelina Jolie.”
“While it was Theroux’s first marriage, Aniston was married to Pitt, 54, from 2000 to 2005.”
“We are two best friends who have decided to part ways as a couple, but look forward to continuing our cherished friendship.”The duo, who started dating in May 2011, tied the knot in August 2015.”
“This decision was mutual and lovingly made at the end of last year.”
“...decided to announce our separation...”
“Jen assured him they weren t a big deal but Justin wasn t thrilled Justin had moments of insecurity like that As previously reported Aniston 49 and Theroux 46 announced their separation on Thursday February 15 via a joint statement In an effort to reduce any further speculation we have...”
““Sweet little Post-its like, ‘You looked nice tonight’ or ‘Miss you already.’”The source explains that impact of those little notes was huge.”


"It played a role in her attempt to marry Justin." To learn more about Aniston's breakup with Cyrus, check out the new issue of American weekly and start now
"After her divorce from Brad, Jennifer has been struggling to think of herself as this poor woman," people familiar with the matter told us
"Pitt and Julie have 16-year-old Maddox, 14-year-old parks, 12-year-old Zahara, 11 year-old Shiloh and 9-year-old twins Knox and Vivian. They announced their separation in September 2016 after two years of marriage and 12 years of cohabitation."
"He left his friends' Alumni Club in disgrace and left with his Smiths' partner, Angelina Jolie."
When it was seru's first marriage, Aniston married Pitt, 54, from 2000 to 2005
"We are two best friends and have decided to break up, but we are looking forward to continuing our cherished friendship." The two started dating in May 2011 and married in August 2015
"This decision was made by both sides at the end of last year and is full of love."
“… Decided to announce our separation... "
"Jane assured him that they were not a big deal, but Justin was not excited that Justin had such unsafe moments. As previously reported, Aniston 49 and Cyrus 46 announced that they had adopted a joint statement on Thursday, February 15, to reduce any further speculation, we have..."
"Cute little posts, such as' you look good tonight 'or' I miss you so much '" The source explained that the impact of these little notes is huge



Number  263
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“It's just very, very jarring for the kids, to suddenly have their family ripped apart."”
“And fortunately my partner in this agrees.”
“I just refuse.”
“And it seems to be true, you spend a year just focused on building a case to prove your point and why you're right and why they're wrong, and it's just an investment in vitriolic hatred.”
“I heard one lawyer say, 'No one wins in court—it's just a matter of who gets hurt worse.'”
“We're both doing our best.”
“"And you know, after that, we've been able to work together to sort this out.”
“"I was really on my back and chained to a system when Child Services was called," he noted to the mag.”
“He also seemed intent to move forward with the least amount of strife inflicted on his offspring.”
“And I haven't been great at it."”


"It's very disharmonious for children to suddenly break up their families."
"Fortunately, my partner agreed."
"I just refused."
"It seems to be true that you spent a year focusing only on building a case to prove your point of view, why you are right, why they are wrong, it's just an investment in mean hatred."
"I heard a lawyer say," no one wins in court. It's just a matter of who is more seriously injured. "
"We did our best."
"You know, after that, we can solve the problem together."
"When the children's service center got the call, I was really busy and tied to a system," he told the magazine
"He also seems to want to move on with the least amount of conflict."
"I've never been good at it."



**Something goes wrong**
“MORE : ‘Pregnant’ Kylie Jenner is still noticeably missing from the Kardashian Christmas card seriesMORE : Khloe Kardashian seemingly drops biggest ‘pregnancy’ hint yet…with her sunglasses...”
“If you've got a celebrity story, video or pictures get in touch with the Metro.co.uk entertainment team by emailing us celebtips@metro.co.uk, calling 020 3615 2145 or by visiting our Submit Stuff page - we'd love to hear from you.”
“‘She does not like her brother and it’s so hard for me.’Got a showbiz story?”
“I saw glimmers of hope like a week ago.”
“‘She needs to still get it together and warm up and like be a little bit nicer, but I think she is getting there.”
“‘Obviously North loves Saint, she just is still jealous,’ Kim said in a video on her website Kimkardashianwest.com.”
“He thinks North is a creative genius and he’s happy to let her name their third child.’Kim has previously spoken about the fact that North is already not a fan of her little brother Saint.”
“Kim s kind of on the fence about the idea but Kanye loves it...”
“Advertisement Advertisement According to HollywoodLife Kim has called on a parenting expert to get advice on what to do to avoid sibling rivalry this time around and one of the suggestions was to let North help name the baby so she feels more invested They continued They re considering it...”
“‘Kim can’t wait to hold her baby girl…[she] is definitely nervous and anxious about the birth.’Kim Kardashian’s surrogate grabs lunch in Los Angeles (Picture: Coleman-Rayner)Mum-to-be Kim recently revealed that she might let her ‘creative genius’ daughter North name the baby.”


"More: 'pregnant' Kelly Jenner is still apparently missing from the Kardashian Christmas card series more: Chloe Kardashian seems to drop the biggest 'pregnant' hint yet Her sunglasses... "
"If you have celebrity stories, videos or pictures, please email us with Metro entertainment team at: celebtips@metro.co.uk , please call 020 3615 2145 or visit our submission page - we are glad to hear from you. "
"She doesn't like her brother. It's too hard for me." Is there a story about the show business? "
"A week ago I saw a glimmer of hope."
"She still needs to cheer up, warm up and perform better, but I think she has achieved her goal."
Kim said in a video on her website that North Korea obviously loves saints and she's just jealous Kimkardahianwest.com .”
"He thinks north is a creative genius and he's happy to ask her to name their third child." Kim has said before that north is no longer a fan of her brother St
"Kim is a little hesitant about the idea, but Kanye likes it..."
"According to Hollywood life, Kim's advertisement has invited a parenting expert to consult on how to avoid the competition between siblings this time. One of the suggestions is to ask North to name her children, so that she will feel more invested and they will continue to consider..."
"Kim can't wait to hold her baby girl (she) must be nervous and anxious about the birth of the child. " Kim Kardashian's surrogate mother grabs lunch in Los Angeles (photo source: Coleman Reiner) Kim recently revealed that she may ask her "creative genius" daughter north to name her child



Number  265
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“See some of their posts below.”
“As did millions, artists took to Twitter and Instagram to express grief and prayers toward those in Mexico City.”
“That quake led to a tougher new construction code in the capital."”
“According to The New York Times, "The earthquake happened on the 32nd anniversary of a devastating 1985 quake that killed as many as 10,000 people and flattened 400 buildings in Mexico City.”
“As of Wednesday (Sept. 20) morning, 217 people have been confirmed dead with several others injured.”
“Previously, on Sept. 7, Mexico City was hit by an 8.1-magnitude earthquake.”
“On Tuesday (Sept. 19) afternoon, Mexico City was devastated again by an earthquake 7.1 in magnitude at its epicenter.”


"Look at some of their posts below."
"Like millions of people, artists use Twitter and instagram to express their grief and prayers to people in Mexico City."
"The earthquake led to stricter new building codes in the capital."
According to the New York Times, "the earthquake occurred on the 32nd anniversary of the devastating earthquake in Mexico City in 1985, which killed as many as 10000 people and razed 400 buildings."
"As of Wednesday (September 20) morning, 217 people have been confirmed dead and several others injured."
"Before that, on September 7, Mexico City had a magnitude 8.1 earthquake."
"On Tuesday (September 19) afternoon, Mexico City was once again devastated by a 7.1 magnitude earthquake."



Number  266
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“HollywoodLifers, can you blame Selena for wanting more privacy in her life?”
“And Jennifer, despite living in the heart of Bel Air with hubby Justin Theroux, rarely has a gaggle of cameramen chasing her around anymore.”
“So, she’s turned to famous besties like Taylor Swift for help, HollywoodLife.com has EXCLUSIVELY learned.”
“Naturally, Selena Gomez wants a little more privacy in her life after living so years in the public eye.”
“The 24-year old “It Ain’t Me” singer is “adamant” about keep her relationship with The Weeknd, 27, as under wraps as possible.”
““She wants it to be normal and exclusive to just them,” a source tells HollywoodLife.com EXCLUSIVELY.”
““The last thing she wants is a celebrity romance with a celebrity name like Bennifer and Brangelina.” Seeking advice, the pop star has turned to famous besties like Taylor Swift and Jennifer Aniston, who have both done an amazing job at keeping their love life away from the limelight.”
“Taylor is hardly EVER seen these days, especially with new boyfriend Joe Alwyn.”
“How did they do it?”
“Hopefully Taylor doesn’t teach her how to disappear completely, ’cause then we’d miss her like crazy!”


"Hollywood stars, can you blame Serena for wanting more privacy?"
"And Jennifer, though she lives in the heart of Bel Air with her husband Justin Cyrus, has very few photographers chasing her around."
"So, she turned to famous beauties like Taylor swift for help, and Hollywood life has learned it all."
"It's natural that Serena Gomez has lived in public for so many years, and she wants to have more privacy in her life."
The 24-year-old "not me" singer is "determined" to keep her relationship with the 27 year old weekend as secret as possible
"She wants it to be normal, just for them," a source told reporters Exclusive to Hollywood life
"The last thing she wants is to fall in love with celebrities like benniver and brengelina." For advice, the pop star turned to famous friends like Taylor swift and Jennifer Aniston, who have done a great job keeping their love lives out of the spotlight
"Taylor hasn't been seen much lately, especially with her new boyfriend Joe Alvin."
"How did they do it?"
"I hope Taylor won't teach her how to disappear completely, because then we will miss her madly!"



Number  267
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“You may be able to find more information about this and similar content at piano.io...”
“This content is created and maintained by a third party, and imported onto this page to help users provide their email addresses.”
“Case in point: The 40-year-old actress reveals she was once jealous of Jennifer Lawrence, 27, when the starlet worked alongside her (now ex) husband Chris Pratt, 38, on a film.”
“Getty ImagesLawrence and Pratt played love interests in the 2016 movie Passengers, and Faris’ publicist warned her that the paparazzi would have a field day with the good-looking co-stars.”
“"‘Anna, listen, there are going to be paparazzi all over them,'” Faris recalls her publicist telling her.”
““'There are going to be shots of them laughing together on their way to set.”
“There are going to be stories circulating, and you have to brace yourself for this.”
“'”Getty ImagesWhile Faris writes in the book that she “didn't think it would bother” her since Pratt had filmed with beautiful women (like Aubrey Plaza and Bryce Dallas Howard) before, she admits that eventually the tabloids did start to affect her.”
““The coverage, even though it was false rumors, was making me feel insecure,” she writes.”
“Faris knows all too well how sparks can fly on set.”


"You can find more information about this and similar content at: piano.io..."
This content is created and maintained by a third party and imported to this page to help users provide their email address
"For example, the 40 year old actress revealed that she was jealous of 27 year old Jennifer Lawrence when she was filming with her 38 year old ex husband, Chris Pratt."
"Getty Images Lawrence and Pratt played funny roles in the 2016 film passengers, and Faris's PR warned her that the paparazzi would have a good time with these handsome partners."
"Anna, listen, paparazzi are everywhere," Faris recalled, her PR told her
"There will be scenes of them laughing together on the way to the set."
"There will be stories, and you have to be prepared for them."
"Getty Images although Faris wrote in her book that she" didn't think it would disturb "her because Pratt had previously worked with beautiful women (such as Aubrey Plaza and Bryce Dallas Howard), she admitted that eventually tabloids did start to influence her."
"These reports, though false rumors, make me feel insecure," she wrote
"Faris knows very well how sparks fly on set."



Number  268
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Though other band members have denied receiving an invite, Mel B hasn't stopped gushing about the duo.”
“Former Spice Girl Mel B has been making royal wedding headlines ever since she suggested that she (and the rest of the '90s girl group) would be attending the nuptials.”
“...will tune in...”
“While he admitted that he probably won t be waking up at 7 a m on May 19 to watch his former co star and her royal beau tie the knot he did say that one member of his family...”
“She was very sweet," he reflected.”
“"It was great.”
“Comedy aside, Sudeikis revealed that Markle, who has since retired from acting, was a pleasure to work with.”
“"She was regal in that moment, and it seemed like she's only gotten better at it."”
“I gotta be honest with you," he told Entertainment Tonight, of Markle's soon-to-be royal status.”
“"I saw it coming a mile away.”


"While other band members denied receiving the invitation, Mel B has been talking about the pair."
"Ever since Mel B, the former Spice Girl, hinted that she (and other girl groups in the '90s) was going to the wedding, she has been in the headlines of the royal wedding."
“… Will listen to
"Although he admitted that he might not wake up at 7 a.m. on May 19 to see his former partner marry her royal boyfriend, he did say that one of his family members
"She's lovely," he thought
"Great."
"Aside from comedy, sudaikis revealed that after retiring from the performing arts, markel would be happy to work with him."
"She was very dignified at that moment, but she seemed to be more and more good at it."
"I have to tell you the truth," he told tonight's entertainment show. Mark will soon be a member of the royal family
"I saw it coming from a mile away."



Number  269
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“""I have always wanted nothing but the best for my better half, and will continue to support her following her dreams and creating the future she wants and deserves," the actor said in a statement.”
“"I am thankful for all of the love and support she is receiving from her fans all over the world.”
“8.”
“While Britney has not addressed the documentary, which was not authorized by the singer herself, Sam broke his silence on the matter in an exclusive interview with People on Feb.”
“The installment, which is a part of The New York Times Presents docuseries, examines Britney's battle with father Jamie Spears, who has legally controlled her life despite #FreeBritney supporters pointing out the many discrepancies surrounding the conservatorship.”
“Image Source: Getty / Paul ArchuletaA few days after the release of the FX/Hulu documentary Framing Britney Spears Sam Asghari , Britney's boyfriend of five years, spoke out about the singer's controversial conservatorship.”


"I always just want my partner to get the best, and I will continue to support her to realize her dream and create the future she wants and deserves," the actor said in a statement
"I appreciate all the love and support she has received from fans all over the world."
“8.”
"Although Britney Spears did not speak on the documentary, the documentary was not authorized by the singer himself. Sam broke his silence on this issue when he was interviewed by people magazine on February 1."
"This part is part of the New York Times, which introduces the struggle between" Britney "and father Jamie spears, who legally controls her life, although supporters of" free Britney "point out many differences around" custody. "
"Photo source: Getty / Paul Archuleta, a few days after the FX / Hulu documentary, talks about Britney Spears' boyfriend of five years, Sam asghari, and the singer's controversial music management position."



Number  270
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Tell us your thoughts in the comments below!”
“HollywoodLifers, do you think Nina and Orlando are dating?”
“Rumors are flying that the two have been hanging out ‘as more than friends’ and you’ve got to see the details!”
“Nina Dobrev and Orlando Bloom caused the Internet to have a freakout when they were spotted leaving The Promise premiere in LA together on Thursday, Apr.”
“12.”
“The 28 year-old Vampire Dairies stunner has reportedly been spending some time with the 40 year-old Pirates of the Caribbean star and not just as buddies!”
““They’ve known each other for a while,” a source told PEOPLE, “recently they’ve been hanging out as more than friends.”Try not to get too excited just yet though because things are still reportedly in the early stages between them.”
““It’s super casual,” the insider added and pointed out Orlando attended a Coachella party on Friday night with a woman who was not Nina.”
“The actress has been having a ball at the music festival in Indio, CA this weekend too, but without Orlando.”
“These two are definitely keeping things on the down low and casual!”


"Please let us know what you think in the comments below!"
"Hollywood stars, do you think Nina and Orlando are dating?"
"Rumors are flying all over the world. They have been dating 'more than friends'. You have to see the details!"
"Nina Dobrev and Orlando Bloom were found to have left the promise premiere in Los Angeles on Thursday, April 4, causing Internet panic."
“12.”
"It's reported that the 28 year old vampire dairy stuntman spent some time with the 40 year old Pirates of the Caribbean star, not just as a friend!"
"They've known each other for a while," a source told people. "Recently, they're not just friends, they go out a lot. However, try not to be too excited, as their relationship is reported to be in its infancy. "
"It's too casual," people familiar with the matter added, noting that Orlando went to cochella's party on Friday night with a woman who wasn't Nina
"The actress also had a dance at the IndiaNo festival in California this weekend, but not Orlando."
"These two are definitely putting things down and doing things at will!"



**Something goes wrong**
“And we hope they’ve already bought their denim outfits!”
“I want them to both—kinda like that Michael-Janet [Jackson] type thing, would be incredible.”All we can say is that we are anxiously awaiting.”
“Iconic pop couple Britney Spears and Justin Timberlake are allegedly set to collaborate on a song together according to superstar producer Timbaland!”
“MORE: Britney Spears’ Hot Boyfriend Sam Asghari’s Bulge Is Making Us Want a Piece of HimAccording to the hosts of the podcast Pop University, who attended a taping of the new show Boy Band on which Timbaland is a star.”
“Seizing the opportunity, Maddie Lazer and Hannah Rowston, the hosts of the podcast, went up to the 45-year-old producer to get the low down on the possibility of a “Justney” collab.”
“(Photo Credit: Getty Images)When they finally got to ask Timbaland if he and the ‘90s pop icons were going to be creating new tunes together, he pretty much confirmed.”
““Yes, it’s coming,” he told them.”
““It’s coming.”Rumors of a collaboration have been swirling for a while now.”
“Just last year, while answering fan questions in a Q&A, the mother-of-two hinted at the desire to collaborate with her former love.”
“J.T.”


"We hope they've bought jeans!"
"I hope they're both like Michael Jeanette. It's going to be incredible." All we can say is that we are waiting anxiously
Pop singers Britney Spears and Justin Timberlake will work together on a song, according to superstar producer Timbaland
"More: Britney Spears' sexy boyfriend Sam asgali's body makes us want a piece of him," said the host of podcast pop University, who took part in the recording of a new performing boys' band, of which tibaland is the star
"Taking this opportunity, podcast hosts Mardi Lazer and Hannah roston found the 45 year old producer and expressed doubts about the possibility of" jasney "cooperation."
"(photo source: Getty Images) when they finally asked Timbaland if he and the '90s pop idols would work on a new song together, he almost confirmed that."
"Yes, it's coming," he told them
"Here it comes." There have been rumors of cooperation for some time
"Just last year, when the mother of two answered fans' questions at a Q & a meeting, she hinted that she wanted to cooperate with her old love."
“J.T.”



Number  272
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“And there is a price for that when living in the public eye.””
“It’s just that I love her and she loves me and here we are.”
“The former True Blood star has issued his own spirited post on Instagram, slamming this same cover story and expressing love for his wife.”
“And that's exactly what Manganiello himself has done.”
“Tell us more.”
“Wow.”
“It flat-out lied?”
“It used Photoshop?”
“"#Starmagazinebullies Wait... a supermarket tabloid twisted a harmless photograph to make it appear scandalous?”
“"By the way, that's my friend, the producer of the movie Bent, that I was shooting in Rome and who came to spend Easter at my home the week later.”


"When living in the public eye, it comes at a price."
"It's just that I love her and she loves me, and we're here."
"The former true blood star posted his passionate post on instagram, attacking the same cover story and expressing his love for his wife."
"This is what magniello himself has done."
"Tell us more."
"Wow."
"A complete lie?"
"Photoshop?"
Star Magazine is waiting... A supermarket tabloid distorted a harmless photo to make it look like a scandal? "
"By the way, that's my friend, the producer of my film" bent "in Rome, who came to my house for Easter a week later."



**Something goes wrong**
“Coming up: Laverne Cox and Amy Schumer.”
““There are no words to express my sorrow and regret for the pain I have caused others by words and actions,” he said, in part.”
““The whole thing has been very painful for me,” Couric, 61, tells PEOPLE.”
““The accounts I’ve read and heard have been disturbing, distressing and disorienting and it’s completely unacceptable that any woman at the Today show experienced this kind of treatment.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
““I had no idea this was going on during my tenure or after I left,” she continued.”
““I think I speak for many of my former colleagues when I say this was not the Matt we knew.”
“Matt was a kind and generous colleague who treated me with respect.”
“In fact, a joke I once made on late-night television was just that, because it was completely contrary to our brother-sister relationship.”
“It’s still very upsetting.”


"Next up: Lavine Cox and Amy Schumer."
"I have no words to express my sorrow and regret for the pain caused by my words and deeds," he said in part
"The whole thing was very painful for me," Couric, 61, told people
"The reports I've read and heard are disturbing, painful and disoriented. Any woman on today's show has experienced such treatment, which is totally unacceptable."
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
"I don't know if it happened during my tenure or after I left," she continued
"When I say this is not Matt we know, I think I represent a lot of former colleagues."
"Matt is a kind and generous colleague and has a lot of respect for me."
"In fact, one of the jokes I made on late night TV was like this, because it was totally against our brother sister relationship."
"Still upset."



Number  274
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
““The fighting got worse and they disagreed a lot about parenting and a lot of things.””
“From creative memes to hilarious comments, Us has rounded up the best online reactions.”
“Angelina Jolie filed for divorce from Brad Pitt after over a decade together and two years of marriage, Us Weekly confirmed on Tuesday, September 20.”
“While some social media users are mourning the end of one of Hollywood’s most celebrated love stories, many can’t forget the complicated origin of Brangelina’s epic love affair.”
“As fans are well aware, the Fight Club actor, 52, and the Oscar-winning actress, 41, met on the 2004 set of Mr. and Mrs. Smith.”
“At the time, Pitt was married to Jennifer Aniston.”
“After the Friends alum, 47, reportedly discovered that her then-husband was cheating on her with his sexy costar, she called it quits on their five-year marriage.”
“Months later, Pitt and Jolie went public with their controversial romance.”
“During a now-legendary 2008 interview with Vogue, Aniston — who married Justin Theroux in August 2015 — broke her silence about the scandal.”
““That stuff about how she couldn’t wait to get to work every day?” she said, referring to former comments made by Jolie to W magazine.”


"The fighting is getting fiercer, and they're very divided on parenting and a lot of things."
"From creative memes to funny reviews, America has collected the best online responses."
Angelina Jolie and Brad Pitt have been together for more than 10 years and filed for divorce after two years of marriage, US weekly confirmed on Tuesday, September 20
"While some social media users mourn the ending of one of Hollywood's most famous love stories, many will not forget the complex origins of the epic love story of brengelina."
Fans know that the 52 year old fight club actor and the 41 year old Oscar winner met in 2004's Mr. and Mrs. Smith
"At that time, Pete and Jennifer Aniston got married."
According to reports, the 47 year old "friend" alum terminated their five-year marriage after discovering that her then husband and his sexy partner were unfaithful to her
A few months later, Pitt and Julie made public their controversial relationship
"In an interview with vogue in 2008, Aniston broke her silence on the scandal. Aniston married Justin Cyrus in August 2015. "
"She can't wait to go to work every day? "She said, referring to Julie's previous comments on W magazine."



Number  275
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“[Featured Image by Alberto E. Rodriguez/Getty Images]”
“TMZ reports that court documents filed in their custody negotiations reveal that Chyna is the breadwinner in this situation.”
“That’s the claim coming from an article in Media Take Out (MTO) about the former stripper and her custody battle with reality TV star, Rob Kardashian.”
“But Gossip Cop, a site that’s become known for debunking celebrity rumors is on the case, and they say that the article has no basis in truth.”
“Media Take Out has a history of reporting fake news stories about Chyna and Rob, according to Gossip Cop.”
“They’ve previously reported that Rob wasn’t Dream’s father and that Chyna was pregnant with his second child.”
“Both of those stories have been debunked.”
“With MTO’s less than stellar record, it’s easy to question the truthfulness of their story about which parent currently has legal custody of Dream Kardashian.”
“Gossip Cop says that they looked into the story and found that it was untrue.”
“Sources close to both Chyna and Rob confirm that Dream Kardashian does spend more time with Rob, but that isn’t because her mother has given up legal custody.”


"[Alberto E. Rodriguez / Getty pictures]
"TMZ reported that the court documents they submitted during the custody negotiations showed that in this case, chener was the breadwinner."
"This comes from an MTO article about the former stripper and her custody fight with reality TV star rob Kardashian."
"But the gossip police website, which is famous for debunking celebrity rumors, is investigating the case. They say the article is not based on facts."
"According to gossip police," media takeout "reported fake news about Zina and rob."
"They had previously reported that rob was not the father of dreams and that Gina was pregnant with his second child."
"Both stories have been exposed."
"Because MTO's record is not ideal, it's easy to question the truth of their story, that is, which parent currently has legal custody of dream Kardashian."
"The gossip police said they investigated the story and found it untrue."
"Sources close to Zina and rob confirmed that she did spend more time with rob, but it wasn't because her mother gave up legal custody."



Number  276
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Related video: Antonio Banderas' Heartfelt Words on Ex-Wife Melanie Griffith: 'I'll Love Her Until the Day I Die':”
“The Working Girl star, 60, opened up about her daughter’s romance with the Coldplay frontman on Thursday when asked if she gave the Fifty Shades of Grey star any dating advice when it came to her relationship with Martin.”
“Dakota Johnson ’s famous mom, Melanie Griffith , is finally speaking out about her daughter dating Coldplay frontman Chris Martin .”
“Mom approves!”
“...wrestler turned actor family...”
“Brie Bella on sister s ex John Cena He ll always be family Brie Bella slams a report claiming she s furious at John Brie Bella has broken her silence in regards to Nikki Bella and John Cena s breakup and she s supportive of both them even calling the...”
““But she is very private about her life and I respect that.”Johnson and Martin sparked dating rumors after being spotted on a mid-October sushi date in Los Angeles.”
““I adore him!” Griffith said while at the Global Gift Foundation USA Women’s Empowerment Luncheon.”
“© John Melanie Griffith Melanie Griffith is over the moon about her daughter Dakota Johnson‘s beau Chris Martin.”
“Melanie Griffith flashes a smile when asked if Chris Martin will be joining the family for ChristmasThe two were “cozy, laughing and affectionate” a source said at the time, adding it was just the two of them enjoying dinner.”


"Related video: Antonio Banderas's heartfelt words to his ex-wife Melanie GRIFFITH:" I will love her until the day I die ":
"The 60 year old career actress disclosed her daughter's love affair with the Coldplay band leader on Thursday when asked if she had given any dating advice to" grey star "on her relationship with Martin
Melanie Griffith, Johnson's famous mother in Dakota, has finally made public her daughter's date with Coldplay leader Chris Martin
"Mother agreed!"
“… A wrestler's family of actors... "
"Bulibera is in her sister's former John senna, and he will always be a family member. Bulibera attacked a report, claiming that she was angry with John bulibera and broke the silence. Regarding the breakup of nikibera and John senna, she supported them and even called for..."
"But she's very private about her life, and I respect that." Johnson and Martin were spotted dating in Los Angeles sushi in mid October, sparking rumors of a date
"I adore him! "Griffith said at the global gift foundation luncheon on American women's empowerment."
"John Melanie Griffith Melanie Griffith is crazy about Chris Martin, the boyfriend of her daughter Dakota Johnson."
Melanie Griffith laughed when asked if Chris Martin would spend Christmas with her family. At that time, it was reported that the two were "very comfortable, very happy, very emotional", just enjoying dinner



Number  277
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Email us at tips@radaronline.com, or call us at (866) ON-RADAR (667-2327) any time, day or night.”
“Do you have a story for RadarOnline.com?”
“We pay for juicy info!”
“Weigh in with your thoughts in the comments below.”
“...will be the one to win it for them Do you think Angelina deserves her second Oscar win...”
“That s given Angie the freedom to make bold choices you just don t see her doing that often and it s working because Angelina is the frontrunner and Netflix is a company willing to spend tens of millions to win its first big Oscar and it looks like Angelina...”
““Brad’s company is not in contention with a major film as they have been in all three of the previous awards seasons,” noted the insider.”
“It also helps that single-mom Jolie, 42, probably won’t have to deal with any awkward Oscar run-ins with her ex.”
““This is a good year for Angelina to make this kind of move because she’s a serious contender for Best Foreign Language Film” with First They Killed My Father, said the source.”
““Angelina is getting more aggressive ever with her fashion choices and social appointments in order to make a maximum impression, especially at events where there’s no chance Brad Pitt or any of his extensive network of Hollywood colleagues will be attending,” an insider revealed.”


"Email us tips@radaronline.com , or call the (866) radar (667-2327) at any time. "
"Do you have a story to tell RadarOnline.com ？”
"We pay for interesting information!"
"Add your thoughts to the comments below."
“… Would be their best choice. Do you think Angelina deserves a second Oscar... "
"It gives Angie the freedom to make bold choices, you just don't see her do it often, and it works, because Angie is the leader, and Netflix is a company willing to spend tens of millions to win the first Oscar, and it looks like Angie..."
"Brad's company doesn't compete with a big movie as it did in the previous three award seasons," the person familiar with the matter pointed out
"It also helps Julie, a 42 year old single mother, not have to face the embarrassment of Oscar and her ex boyfriend."
"This is a good year for Angelina to do this, because she is a strong competitor for the best foreign language film," the source said. "They killed my father first."
"Angelina is becoming more and more aggressive in fashion choices and social dating in order to make the most impression, especially at events that Brad Pitt or many of his colleagues in Hollywood are unlikely to attend," an insider said



Number  278
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Though if anyone's going to whip up a little of her own mystery fog, it's Beyoncé...”
“Once again, nature works its wonders, and even the Carter family is at its mercy.”
“News that the twins were actually due by the end of this month.”
“But a source had told E!”
“...guess work counting down from when Mrs Shawn Carter s much analyzed imitated and parodied pregnancy reveal on Instagram made everybody s day on Feb 1”
“As if Bey s children could be persuaded to stay put when they re ready to roll Well their arrival is a little ahead of the late June early July due date some people had settled on with their fancy...”
“You're probably wondering, aren't they a little early?”
“The twins join big sister Blue Ivy Carter in the most royal of famous family folds, short of being actual royalty.”
“News has confirmed that the pop icon and husband Jay Z welcomed their second and third kids.”
“E!”


"But if someone wants to create a little mystery of her own, it's Beyonce..."
"Nature has done a miracle again, and even the Carter Family are left to their fate."
"The twins will be born at the end of this month."
"But a source told e!"
“… Guess from Mrs. Sean Carter's massive analysis, imitation and imitation of pregnancy information disclosure on instagram to the countdown of everyone's day on February 1
"It seems that we can persuade Bei's children to stay where they are and wait until they are ready. Their arrival is a little earlier than the due date at the end of June and the beginning of July. Some people have already decided with their fantasies..."
"You may be thinking, aren't they a little early?"
"The twins live with sister LAN Ai Wei Carter in the most famous royal family, not the real royal family."
"It's confirmed that the pop icon and her husband, jay z, are expecting their second and third children."
“E！”



Number  279
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Let us know your thoughts below.”
“HollywoodLifers, what do you think of Blake Griffin choosing basketball over Kendall Jenner?”
“At least the sisters will have each other!”
“Travis will be preforming at LIV Nightclub in Miami, FL on Dec. 31.”
“Even though the couple will not be together for New Year’s Eve, Kendall will be able to spend time with Kylie Jenner, 20, who will also be without her beau, Travis Scott, 25.”
“Although Blake slammed those accusations, it’s clear that he’s taking no chances and is making basketball his number one priority.”
“...s performance...”
“This news should come as quite the treat for Blake s teammates and fans who feared he d succumb to the Kardashian Curse or Jenner Jinx After seeing what happened to fellow basketball players Lamar Odom 38 and Kris Humphries 32 many feared that dating Kendall would negatively impact Blake...”
“He is eager to get back to his job,” a source close to Blake tells HollywoodLife.com EXCLUSIVELY.”
“But his intentions are more to get back to the team then to hang out with Kendall.”


"Let's know what you think."
"Hollywood stars, what do you think of Blake Griffin's choice of basketball over Kendall Jenner?"
"At least the sisters will have each other!"
Travis will perform at liv nightclub in Miami, Florida, on December 31
"Although the couple won't spend the new year together, Kendall will still be with 20-year-old Kelly Jenner, who will also lose her 25-year-old boyfriend Travis Scott."
"Although Blake lashed out at these accusations, it's clear that he didn't take any risks. He made basketball his top priority."
“… Performance... "
"For Blake's teammates and fans, this news should be a kind of enjoyment. They are worried that he will succumb to the curse of Kardashian or the misfortune of Jenna, because they have seen what happened to his teammates Lamar Odom, 38, and Chris Humphries, 32. Many people worry that dating Kendall will have a negative impact on Blake..."
"He is eager to return to work," a source close to black told reporters
"But his aim is more to come back to the team and be with Kendall



Number  280
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“We were friends long before we dated, and we still are now.”Nina Dobrev: Ian Somerhalder And Nikki Reed s Wedding ‘Was Beautiful’”
“Yes, we’re professional, and that’s fine.”
““And that didn’t change.”
““I love him, and the friendship is still strong, and I think he’s great, and I care about him,” she said.”
“I just ignore it.”Dobrev, 26, and Somerhalder, 36, split in 2013 after about three years together.”
“If there’s no drama, there’s nothing to write about.”
“But, of course, we’re on a teen drama show, everyone’s going to look for drama.”
““The drama is in the media, it’s not with us.”
“They look happy, and I am happy, and so I don’t see why there should be a problem with that,” Dobrev said.”
““When I heard about the wedding, I thought it was beautiful.”


"We were friends long before we dated, and still are." Nina Dobrev: Ian summerholder and Nicky Reed's wedding was "beautiful"
"Yes, we are professional, that's good."
"That hasn't changed."
"I love him, the friendship is still strong, I think he's great and I care about him," she said
Dobrev, 26, and summerhard, 36, separated in 2013 after about three years together
"If there is no drama, there is nothing to write about."
"But, of course, we're shooting teen-agers' dramas, and we all look for them."
"The play is in the media, it has nothing to do with us."
"They look happy and I'm happy, so I don't understand why there's such a problem," Dobrev said
"Hearing about the wedding, I think it's beautiful."



Number  281
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
““No disrespect to people who date their friends’ exes, that’s just not my style.””
““Dear Tabloids, Please stop matching me with my friends’ exes,” she wrote.”
“And since then, the Leftovers star has been pretty busy hunting for his new bae—according to the media, at least.”
“With the end of a high profile relationship like Jen and Justin s rumors are par for the course but the speculation surrounding Theroux is next level especially considering that his counterpart Aniston hasn t been romantically linked to anyone except for ex husband Brad Pitt and c mon guys...”
“...that s way too easy...”
“Since announcing their split, Theroux has been linked to not one, but nine (9) different ladies (and one man), and surprise, surprise, most of the claims are ridiculous.”
“In case you haven’t had time to pore over each and every outlandish report, we’ve done it for you.”
“Behold, the complete history of Justin’s rumored post-Jen dating life.”
“Image zoom Credit: Getty ImagesChloe HarsteinNot two weeks post-split, rumors spread that Justin was dating his stylist Chloe Harstein.”
“However, the rumors were just that: rumors.”


"There's no disrespect for people who date friends' ex girlfriends, that's not my style."
"Dear tabloids, please stop comparing me to my friend's ex girlfriend," she wrote
"Since then, the star has been busy looking for his new BAE, at least according to media reports."
"With the end of a high-profile relationship like Jennifer and Justin, rumors are taken for granted, but the speculation surrounding serrux is the next level, especially considering that his opponent Aniston has no romantic connection with anyone except Brad Pitt and Simon's guy..."
“… That's too simple... "
"Since the announcement of the breakup, Theroux has been associated with nine (9) different women (and one man), and surprised, surprised, most of the statements are ridiculous."
"In case you haven't had time to study every odd report carefully, we've done it for you."
"Look, Justin's legendary post minimalism will have a complete history of life."
"Credit for image zooming: two weeks after Getty Images Chloe harstein broke up, there were rumors that Justin was dating his stylist Chloe hastain."
"Rumors, however, are just: rumors."



Number  282
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“A double Game of Thrones wedding, what could possibly go wrong?”
“Perhaps he wants to make it a double wedding with Turner?”
“Game of Thrones Season 8 will be shooting until summer of 2018 and Harington has reportedly asked production to be put on a brief hold next year so the cast can attend his wedding to Leslie.”
“Given their private nature, the couple have not revealed any further details on their engagement—as in how long they are going to wait to tie the knot.”
“In fact, the pair have never been photographed together in any official capacity and have only appeared together very rarely on each other’s social media accounts and in paparazzi shots.”
“...low key ever since Jonas attended the Los Angeles premiere of Game of Thrones this past summer with Turner but didn t walk the red carpet by her side...”
“Playing coy about her relationship at the Golden Globes that month Turner flashed a bejeweled finger for the camera and joked And my engagement ring that isn t really an engagement ring The very famous couple have kept their relationship...”
“Jonas and Turner have been dating since at least last November and went public just this past January.”
“), the social media-savvy Jonas and Turner revealed their news Sunday via carefully coordinated Instagram posts.”
“While Harington and Leslie announced their news in a very old-fashioned and traditional way (a notice in The Times!”


"What's wrong with a double power wedding?"
"Maybe he wants to have a double wedding with Turner?"
The filming of game of Thrones Season 8 will last until the summer of 2018, and it is reported that Harrington has asked for a temporary suspension of production next year so that the actors can attend his and Leslie's wedding
"Given their personal nature, the couple have yet to disclose more details about their engagement, such as how long they will wait to get married."
"As a matter of fact, the two have never been photographed together in any official capacity, but they rarely appear together in each other's social media accounts and paparazzi shots."
“…… Since Jonas and Turner attended the premiere of game of thrones in Los Angeles last summer, but did not walk on the red carpet beside her, she has been very low-key.... "
"Turner was very secretive about his love at the Golden Globe award that month. He flashed a jewel like finger to the camera and joked that my engagement ring was not actually an engagement ring. This very famous couple has always maintained their relationship..."
"Jonas and Turner have been dating since at least November last year and just went public in January this year."
"), social media savvy Jonas and Turner released their news on Sunday through a carefully coordinated instagram."
"And Harrington and Leslie announced their news in a very old-fashioned and traditional way (a notice in the times!"



Number  283
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Get the exclusive celebrity scoop on all the stars you love before any of your friends by subscribing to our new podcast Straight Shuter below!”
“Email us at tips@radaronline.com, or call us at (866) ON-RADAR (667-2327) any time, day or night.”
“Suri Cruise has begged her famous father Tom, “Daddy, come home!”RadarOnline.com exclusively learned their strained relationship could be repaired after she implored him to visit her, a source said.”
“Suri, 12, whose mom is Tom’s ex-wife, actress Katie Holmes, 39, has been contacting her dad through a series of heartbreaking letters, calls and voicemails, the insider has revealed.”
“Although Katie’s rep has denied it, according to the source, the little girl has begged Tom, 56, to come and visit and the Mission Impossible star has finally responded to Suri.”
““He’s contacted Suri through a third party, who he trusts implicitly, to check in and make sure she’s okay,” the spy said.”
““He wants her to know that he’s thought of her all this time and that he got all of her messages.”
“In fact, he read and listened to each and every word.”
““Tom’s paving the way to come back into Suri’s life permanently—and many expect it to happen soon.”In June 2012, Holmes ended her marriage to Tom and things have reportedly been hard between him and Suri ever since.”
“A second source said of Tom, “He was absent for one milestone after another” in Suri’s life.”


"Get exclusive news of all your favorite stars in front of your friends by subscribing to our new podcast below!"
"Email us tips@radaronline.com , or call the (866) radar (667-2327) at any time. "
Suri cruise pleaded with her famous father Tom: "Dad, go home!" RadarOnline.com "After she begged him to visit her, their strained relationship can be restored," a source on the website said
Suri, 12, whose mother is Tom's ex-wife and 39 year old actress Katie Holmes, has been in touch with her father through a series of heartbreaking letters, phone calls and voicemails, the person familiar with the matter said
"Although Katie's representative denied this, according to the source, the little girl has begged Tom, 56, to come to visit, and the star of impossible task finally responded to Suri."
"He has contacted Suri through a third party, and he secretly trusts her to check to make sure she's OK," the spy said
"He wanted her to know that he was thinking about her all the time and that he had received all her information."
"In fact, he was reading every word and listening to every word."
"Tom is paving the way for Suri's permanent return, and a lot of people are looking forward to it soon." Holmes ended his marriage to Tom in June 2012, and it is reported that the relationship between him and Suri has been difficult ever since
Another source said Tom "missed one milestone after another" in Suri's life



Number  284
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“...also tweeted We got you Harvey Weinstein we got you...”
“Most were threatened to shut up Former actress Rose McGowan one of the first women to publicly accuse Weinstein of assault gave an interview to Megyn Kelly upon news of Weinstein s arrest saying I can say this the man who pinned me down had handcuffs on him today She...”
“Weinstein has in the past denied all allegations of “non-consensual sex” and continues to do so.”
“More than 80 women have accused Weinstein of sexual harassment or assault in alleged incidents that span several decades.”
“More charges are expected as a grand jury continues to hear testimony in the state’s case with at least four women expected to testify, a source familiar with the investigation told CNN.”
“The Manhattan District Attorney’s office says Friday’s charges relate to incidents with two separate women in 2013 and 2004.”
“...act in the first degree...”
“Photo by TIMOTHY A CLARY AFP Photo credit should read TIMOTHY A CLARY AFP Getty Images CNN Seven months after women began coming forward with stories alleging sexual misconduct by Hollywood producer Harvey Weinstein the former movie mogul has been arraigned on charges of rape and committing a criminal sexual...”
“(Photo by Billy Farrell/Patrick McMullan via Getty Images)TOPSHOT - Harvey Weinstein (C) arrives at Manhattan Criminal Court for a hearing on October 11, 2018 in New York City.”
“(AP Photo/Seth Wenig)LOS ANGELES, CA - JANUARY 14: (L-R) Chris Backus, Mira Sorvino and Harvey Weinstein attend HBO's Annual Pre-Golden Globes Party hosted by Colin Callender, Chris Albrecht and Carolyn Strauss at Chateau Marmont on January 14, 2006 in Los Angeles, CA.”


“… And tweeted, "we got you, Harvey Weinstein, we got you..."
"Most people are threatened to silence former actress rose McGovern. She is one of the first women to publicly accuse Weinstein of assaulting others. After the news of Weinstein's arrest came out, she gave an interview to Megan Kelly. She said, I can say that the person who knocked me down today had handcuffs on her body. She..."
Weinstein has denied all charges of "involuntary sex" in the past and continues to do so
"More than 80 women have accused Weinstein of sexual harassment or assault, which has spanned decades."
A source familiar with the investigation told CNN that more charges are expected as the grand jury continues to hear testimony in the state case
"The Manhattan district attorney's office said Friday's charges involved incidents involving two different women in 2013 and 2004."
“… First level operations... "
"The credit for Timothy a berry AFP photography should be read as timothy a berry AFP Getty Images CNN. Seven months ago, women began to accuse Hollywood producer Harvey Weinstein of sexual misconduct. The former film tycoon was arraigned for rape and sexual crimes..."
(Billy Farrell / Patrick McMullen photographed by Getty pictures) topshort Harvey Weinstein (c) arrived at the Manhattan Criminal Court in New York on October 11, 2018 for a hearing
(AP Photo / Seth WEINIG) Los Angeles, California - January 14: (left right) Chris barks, mirasovino and Harvey Weinstein attend HBO's annual Golden Globe pre award party, hosted by Colin cullend, Chris Albrecht and Caroline straw, at Marmont castle on January 14, 2006 in Los Angeles, California



Number  285
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“...email digishowbiz@the-sun.co.uk or call us direct on 02077824220”
“Getty Images She shared a note on Twitter which read Hey guys I just wanted to address Fyre Festival Even though this was not my project what so ever nor was I informed about the production or process of the festival in any shape or form I do know that...”
“The famous models were joined by Kylie Jenner as they attended her rumoured boyfriend' Travis Scott's birthday bash at Cipriani in Soho.”
“9 Bella Hadid flashed her underboob as she partied with Kendall Jenner and Cara Delevingne in New York Credit Getty Images 9 The trio of models were partying at rapper Travis Scott s 25th birthday in New York Credit Getty Images 9 Bella left little to the imagination in the...”
“...sexy crop top from the Diesel Black Gold SS17 collection Credit Splash News Bella 20 showed off her killer abs and gave onlookers an eyeful of her bust in the corset style crop top from the Diesel Black Gold SS17 collection...”
“She paired the sexy top with matching high-waisted trousers in a tracksuit style material.”
“Most Read in Tv Showbiz STRICTLY OFF Strictly heartbreak for Ranvir as Giovanni says there s no way he d date her COWELL AND ABOUT Simon Cowell shows off 4 stone weight loss as he braves sub zero in London Exclusive WHAT S UP DOC Katie Price lands new documentary...”
“...series where she learns to be a paramedic FAMILY UNIT MAFS Australia s Cyrell Paule is now a mum with Love Island s Eden Dally GREATLY MISSED Father Ted star dies suddenly aged 67 how dare you...”
“This Morning's Martin Lewis left shaken as anti-vaxxers spew racist abuseThe supermodel, who is Gigi Hadid's younger sister, accessorised with nude suede boots, plenty of diamond rings and 90s style sunglasses.”
“Her night out comes after she released a statement distancing herself from the disastrous Fyre Festival, which she was paid to promote back in December.”


“… E-mail digishowbiz@the-sun.co.uk Or call 0207782420 directly
"Getty Images she shared a message on twitter that said," Hey guys, I just want to address Fyre Festival, although it's not my project, so I've never been told about the production or process of the festival, no matter what form it is, I know... "
"Kelly Jenner also joined the ranks of famous models at her rumored boyfriend Travis Scott's birthday party in Cipriani, SOHO."
"9 Bella Hadid showed her ass at a party in New York with Kendall Jenner and Carla delaviny. The three models had a party in New York on rapper Travis Scott's 25th birthday. This picture makes Bella There's hardly any imagination left in it. "
“… "Beira 20 shows her killer abdominal muscles, and let the bystanders see her in the diesel black gold 17 spring and summer series corset style jacket, the bust is full of eyes..."
"She paired her sexy top with high waisted pants made of sportswear like materials."
"What most people read in the television industry is about Lanwei's sadness. Giovanni said that he couldn't date her Cowell. Simon Cowell showed the weight loss effect of 4 stone in the new documentary of London's exclusive coverage of Dr. Katie Price..."
“… Series, she learned to become a nursing family unit groom, Australia's Cyril Paul is now a mother and Love Island Eden, Daley miss his father Ted star suddenly died 67 years old, how dare you... "
"Martin Lewis left this morning shocked by the racist remarks of the anti vaxxers. The supermodel is Gigi Hadid's sister, wearing nude suede boots, lots of diamond rings and 90s style sunglasses
"Before she went out at night, she made a statement to keep away from the disastrous faire Festival, which she was hired to promote last December."



Number  286
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“...of what a woman should look like Today I am happy living as a young beautiful bearded woman...”
“I used to have my face waxed two to three times a week and on the days I couldn t bear the pain I would simply shave I decided to keep my beard and step forward against society s expectations...”
“I’ll have no man telling me to shave my fuckin’ legs.”
“I just got up and I just got out of there.” – The Graham Norton Show, November 2010AdeleOn whether her husband minds her unshaven legs: “He has no choice.”
“It was probably one of the most awkward moments of my entire life.”
“It was really awkward.”
“You’re Rihanna, aren’t you?’ I was just like … awkward.”
“[Imitates wax-tearing noise.]”
“And she was basically like, ‘I know who you are.”
“...she was a 25 year old American...”


“… What should a woman look like today? I'm very happy to live as a beautiful young woman with a beard... "
"In the past, I used to wax my face two or three times a week. When I couldn't stand the pain, I only shaved. I decided to keep my beard and go against the expectations of the society..."
"I won't let a man tell me to shave my damn leg."
"I left as soon as I got up." ——On the November 2010 Graham Norton show, adeleon asked if her husband would mind her unshaven legs: "he has no choice."
"It was probably one of the most embarrassing moments of my life."
"It's really embarrassing."
"You're Rihanna, aren't you? "I'm like Embarrassed. "
"[imitate wax tearing noise. ]”
"She basically said," I know who you are. "
“… She's a 25-year-old American... "



Number  287
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
““Lucky for me I’ve got the prince bit so I’m able to make a difference.”Join our Facebook group for the latest updates on Kate Middleton, Prince William, and all things royal!”
“James in 2004.”
“That’s what many fans are asking themselves ahead of the royal wedding.”
“There have been rumors going around that Prince Charles isn’t Prince Harry’s real dad, so many fans are wondering if Harry and James Hewitt are actually father and son since they look alike.”
“Scroll down to find out!”
“Is Prince Harry Charles’ son?”
“Princess Diana’s ex-lover recently confirmed that Charles is Prince Harry’s biological father.”
“In a previous interview with Australia’s Sunday Night, James was asked, “Are you Harry’s father?” from the show’s host.”
““No, I’m not,” the 60-year-old candidly admitted.”
“He was then asked why he thought the truth of Harry’s paternity has been in constant doubt over the years.”


"Fortunately, I got the prince's seat, so I was able to make a difference." Join our Facebook group to learn the latest updates on Kate Middleton, Prince William and all royal items
"James of 2004."
"It's a question many fans ask themselves before the royal wedding."
"There have been rumors that Prince Charles is not Prince Harry's biological father, so many fans want to know if Harry and James Hewitt are really father and son, because they look very similar."
"Scroll down to see!"
"Is Prince Harry the son of Prince Charles?"
"Diana's ex lover recently confirmed that Charles is Prince Harry's biological father."
In a previous interview with Sunday night in Australia, James was asked, "are you Harry's father? "From the host."
"No, I'm not," the 60 year old admitted frankly
"Later, he was asked why he had doubted the authenticity of Harry's relationship for years."



Number  288
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“They were married for two years after tying the knot in secret in 2015”
“But the pair were pictured on holiday a New Year holiday in Mexico, showing they were still in close contact.”
“This Morning's Martin Lewis left shaken as anti-vaxxers spew racist abuseAccording to Jen and Justin's statement, they split up at the end of the year, before the pictures were taken.”
“...be a paramedic FAMILY UNIT MAFS Australia s Cyrell Paule is now a mum with Love Island s Eden Dally GREATLY MISSED Father Ted star dies suddenly aged 67 how dare you...”
“STRICTLY OFF Strictly heartbreak for Ranvir as Giovanni says there s no way he d date her COWELL AND ABOUT Simon Cowell shows off 4 stone weight loss as he braves sub zero in London Exclusive WHAT S UP DOC Katie Price lands new documentary series where she learns to...”
“5 Jennifer Aniston was reportedly not happy about the pictures Credit Getty Contributor 5 The couple announced their split yesterday Credit Getty Contributor 5 They called their separation loving and insisted they will cherish their friendship Credit EPA Jennifer Aniston and Justin Theroux have split Most Read In TV Showbiz...”
“Justin and Naomi have been friends for 16 years since they starred in David Lynch's cult 2001 movie Mulholland Drive.”
“At the time the National Enquirer reported the actress was not happy about the snaps.”
“However, the National Enquirer claimed the snaps upset Jen.”
“5 The pair have been friends for 16 years after starring in a movie together Credit: Rex FeaturesThey were shown catching up over drinks at the party, and chatting happily.”


"They got married in secret for two years in 2015"
"But photos of the two during their new year holiday in Mexico show that they are still in close contact."
"Martin Lewis left this morning shocked by the racist remarks of anti waxers. According to the statement of Jan and Justin, they broke up before the photo was taken at the end of the year."
“… Become a caregiver family unit MAFS Australia's Cyril Paul is now a mother and the Eden of Love Island. Daley misses his father Ted so much that the star suddenly died at the age of 67. How dare you... "
"Strictly closed strictly heartbroken Lanwei as Giovanni said he had no way to date Cowell and Simon Cowell showed him bravely in London exclusive what is doctor Katie Price land new documentary series, she learned..."
"It's reported that Jennifer Aniston is not happy with the photo. Jennifer Aniston and Justin Cyrus announced their split yesterday. They say they like separation and insist on cherishing their friendship. Jennifer Aniston and Justin Cyrus split up the most in the TV show business... "
"Justin and Naomi have been friends for 16 years since they starred in David Lynch's 2001 cult movie" journey to malholland. "
"At that time, the National Enquirer reported that the actress was not satisfied with the photos."
"However, the National Enquirer claimed that the photos made Zhan uneasy."
They have been friends for 16 years since they starred in the film credit: Rex. They were drinking and chatting happily at the party



Number  289
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“A source exclusively told Us that the 20-year-old reality star is “loving starting a family” with Scott, whom she began dating in April 2017.”
“The news of Scott’s guilty plea comes just a few days after he became a father with girlfriend Kylie Jenner, who gave birth to the couple’s daughter, Stormi, on Thursday, February 1.”
“The Rogers Police Department told Us at the time of the arrest that the “Goosebumps” rapper “encouraged people to rush the stage and bypass the security protocols to ensure concertgoer safety.” He was taken into custody at the Benton County Jail and released later in the evening.”
“He wanted to make sure those people were taken care of.”The attorney added that he believes the disorderly conduct charge could eventually be expunged from Scott’s record.”
“… If anyone was hurt, Travis expressed concern from the beginning.”
“The prosecutor’s office finally did the right thing — they made an offer that he agreed to.”
“We think the police way overcharged him.”
““To think that he incited one is ridiculous.”
“That would not be good for him as an entertainer,” Nelson says.”
““Obviously, [Scott] would not in any way want a riot to break out at his concert.”


"A source told us exclusively that the 20-year-old reality TV star is" starting a family "with Scott, who has been dating since April 2017."
"Scott's plea came a few days after he became a father to his girlfriend Kylie Jenner, who gave birth to their daughter, Tommy, on Thursday, February 1."
Rogers police told us at the time of the arrest that the "goose bumps" rapper "encouraged people to rush onto the stage and bypass security agreements to ensure the safety of concert audiences." He was held in Benton County prison and released later in the evening
"He wanted to make sure those people were taken care of." The lawyer added that he believed the disturbance charge could eventually be removed from Scott's record
“…… If someone is injured, Travis has expressed concern from the beginning
"The procuratorate finally did the right thing - they made a condition and he agreed."
"We think the police charged him too much."
"It's absurd to think he started it."
"As an artist, it's not very good for him," Nelson said
"Obviously, [Scott] would never want a riot at a concert."



Number  290
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
““They spend a lot of time in the Cotswolds, more than people realise"”
“One local told Vanity Fair: “It’s very clear they want to be left alone.”
“SUBSCRIBE Invalid email Sign up fornow and never miss the top Royal stories again.”
“When you subscribe we will use the information you provide to send you these newsletters.”
“Sometimes they'll include recommendations for other related newsletters or services we offer.”
“Our Privacy Notice explains more about how we use your data, and your rights.”
“You can unsubscribe at any time.”
“A royal source said when it comes to their friends: “If you talk to the press you’re out.”
““They both expect a code of silence.” The source added: “Harry didn’t used to care that much about what was written.”
“But he s very protective of Meghan and defensive these days The couple aren t due back on royal duty and currently spend most of their time in the Cotswolds where they have a rented farm house which is protected...”


"They spend more time in Cotswold than people realize"
"Obviously, they want to be alone," a local told Vanity Fair
"Subscribe to invalid email registrations now and never miss the top Royal stories again."
"When you subscribe, we will use the information you provide to send you these newsletters."
"Sometimes it includes suggestions for other relevant newsletters or services we provide."
"Our privacy statement explains in detail how we use your data and your rights."
"You can unsubscribe at any time."
"If you talk to the media, you're out," a royal source said of their friends
"They all want a silent password." "Harry didn't care much about what he wrote before," the source added
"But he's very protective of Megan, and the couple haven't returned to the royal duty these days. They spend most of their time in Cotswold, where they rent a farm and the house is protected..."



Number  291
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Considering Rihanna made an image of the baby’s tiny feet her cover photo on Twitter, chances are there are many more pictures to come.”
“Although the Grammy winner has two brothers (Rajad and Rorrey Fenty), two half sisters (Samantha and Kandy Fenty), and one half brother (Jamie Fenty), it’s not clear whose little baby she’s holding.”
““I can’t get enough, I’m so in love,” RiRi tweeted with another snap.”
“Clearly the sleeping baby has won over Rihanna as the “Diamonds” singer continued posting snapshots of the little one, whose name was not revealed.”
““My everything,” she captioned one photo cradling the baby girl.”
“Over the weekend on Sunday, June 8, the Barbadian chart topper, 26, posted a series of precious pictures with her newborn relative.”
“Babies and Rihanna don’t always go together, but there’s a new little one in Bad Gal RiRi’s life who has melted her heart.”
“Proud Auntie “What’s My Name?”!”


"Given that Rihanna has created a picture of her baby's little feet on twitter for her cover photo, there are likely to be more."
"Although the Grammy winner has two brothers (rajad and Rory Fenty), two half sisters (Samantha and Condi Fenty) and a half brother (Jamie Fenty), it's not clear whose baby she's holding."
"I can't stand it. I love you so much," Riri tweeted another photo
"It's clear that the sleeping baby has won Rihanna's favor, because the" diamond "singer continues to release snapshots of the baby, and her name has not been disclosed."
"Everything to me," she wrote in a picture of a baby girl in her arms
"Over the weekend of Sunday, June 8, the 26 year old Barbados ranking champion posted a series of rare photos with her new born relative."
"Baby and Rihanna are not always together, but bad girl Riley has a new kid in her life who melts her heart."
"Proud aunt" what's my name !”



Number  292
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“He also kept a food journal (which he accidentally emailed to Drake) while working with a nutritionist.”
“It’s the simplest thing in the entire world.”Hill has credited eating clean, including a Japanese food diet, and not drinking beer as the reason for his weight loss.”
““And [Tatum] said, ‘Yes, you dumb motherf–ker, of course, you will.”
“'” Hill told Jimmy Fallon on The Tonight Show in 2016.”
““I wanted to get in better shape, so I called Channing Tatum and said, ‘Hey, if I ate less and go to a trainer, will I get in better shape?”
“The Oscar nominee then had to gain 40 pounds for 2015’s War Dogs, only to subsequently slim down with the help of 21 Jump Street costar Channing Tatum.”
“In 2011, he famously lost 40 pounds before appearing in Moneyball with Brad Pitt.”
“The comedic actor became a household name in 2007 when he starred in Superbad as an overweight high school student.”
“Hill’s weight has gone up and down dramatically over the past few years.”
“Justin Theroux also has a role in the 10-episode series, which is based on a 2014 Norwegian show.”


"He also kept a food diary when he worked with a nutritionist (he accidentally e-mailed Drake)
"It's the simplest thing in the world." Hill thinks the reason for his weight loss is eating clean, including Japanese food and not drinking beer
"And then (Tatum) said," yes, you idiot, of course, you will. "
"Hill told Jimmy Fallon on the tonight show in 2016."
"I want to be in better shape, so I called Channing Tatum and said," Hey, if I eat less and go to the coach, will I be in better shape? "
"The Oscar nominee had to put on 40 pounds for 2015's battle dog and then lost weight with the help of 21-year-old jumping Street star Channing Tatum."
"In 2011, he lost 40 pounds before playing" the ball of money "with Brad Pitt
"The comedian became a household name in 2007 when he played an overweight high school student in super bad."
"Hill's weight has gone up and down dramatically in the past few years."
"Justin serux also plays a role in this 10 episode series, which is based on a 2014 Norwegian show."



Number  293
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“I could've had a stroke."”
“"That's what my break was really about.”
“"I was diagnosed with lupus, and I've been through chemotherapy," the actress reveals.”
“Then, in January 2014, she checked herself into The Meadows, an Arizona-based rehab.”
“In 2013, after releasing her debut solo album Stars Dance, Gomez abruptly canceled the end of her tour, saying she needed to "spend some time on myself."”
“I've had my moments, and it's almost unsafe for me to even talk about them, because I'll be taken advantage of."”
“Just because it's not plastered everywhere doesn't mean I didn't have my rock bottom.”
“Not too long ago, she says, "I felt like I'd lost everything.”
“That's not to say her life is perfect, of course.”
“"I've never had a problem with drinking," she says defiantly.”


"I may have had a stroke."
"That's the real purpose of my rest."
"I was diagnosed with lupus and I've had chemotherapy," the actress revealed
"Then, in January 2014, she was admitted to a drug treatment center in MEDOS, Arizona."
"In 2013, after releasing her debut album" dance of the stars, "Gomez abruptly cancelled the end of the tour, saying she needed to" spend some time on herself. "
"I've had moments where it's almost unsafe for me to talk about them because I'm going to be used."
"Just because I don't post everywhere doesn't mean I don't have my bottom."
"Not long ago," she said, "I felt like I had lost everything."
"Of course, it's not that her life is perfect."
"I've never had a problem with alcohol," she said provocatively



Number  294
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“This article originally appeared on AdWeek.”
“When YouTube TV is advertised on nearly every backstop and billboard during the World Series, consumers are going to notice.”
“Without much in the way of fanfare one of the TV industry s most challenging obstacles has been cleared consumers have mastered the art of accessing the wealth of content sitting behind the notorious input button According to recent streaming meter data from Nielsen consumers in homes with over the...”
“...top OTT capabilities spend one out of every 10 minutes of TV usage with OTT platforms or apps...”
“Whether they re accessing this content through a variety of interfaces or one of many skinny bundles of local and national content consumers are growing more accustomed to OTT as a primary input As all insiders know this button an often misunderstood piece of remote control real estate unlocks a...”
“...wide range of content for consumers with an array of devices...”
“Historically, that content has fallen outside the scope of traditional audience measurement and monetization.”
“Today, that’s no longer the case.”
“Nielsen has introduced new technologies over the past two years to better understand over-the-top media consumption and allow new ways to market to interested consumers.”
“So how do advertisers, content owners and broadcasters already well positioned in the linear TV environment take advantage of where audiences are growing?”


"This article first appeared in Adweek."
"When YouTube TV advertises on almost every backstage and billboard during the world series, consumers will notice."
"Without too many obstacles, one of the most challenging obstacles in the TV industry has been removed. Consumers have mastered the art of accessing the rich content behind the infamous input button. According to Nielsen's latest streaming data of consumers, there are more than..."
“… When top Ott functions use Ott platforms or applications, Ott functions are used every 10 minutes... "
"Whether they access these contents through various interfaces, or through one of many local and national contents, consumers are more and more accustomed to using Ott as the main input, because all people in the industry know that this button is unlocked by a remote control that is often misunderstood..."
“… Offering a wide range of content to consumers with a range of devices... "
"Historically, these contents have gone beyond the scope of traditional audience measurement and monetization."
"Today, that's not the case."
"Nelson has introduced new technologies in the past two years to better understand top media consumption and allow new ways to sell to interested consumers."
"So how do advertisers, content owners and broadcasters who are already well positioned in the linear TV environment take advantage of the growing audience?"



Number  295
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Updates can be found by clicking here.”
“The news about Posh and Becks comes out of the blue after almost 19 years of marriage.”
“Thank you for subscribing We have more newsletters Show me See our privacy notice Invalid EmailTwitter speculation was rife as rumours spread that Posh and Becks are set to split.”
“The former Spice Girl married the world renowned footballer in 1999.”
“David and Victoria Beckham have four children - Brooklyn, 19, Romeo, 15, Cruz, 13, and Harper, six.”
“Posh Spice bumped into the Manchester United footballer 21 years ago at a charity football match.”
“It is not yet confirmed whether the famous couple will be parting ways, but people are already losing their minds on Twitter.”
“Naaah is this posh and becks story truee...i love them — Tiff.Any (@ichenique) June 8, 2018Pep Harris tweeted: "Can't believe what I've just read.”
“If Posh and Becks split up, what hope have the rest of us got?”
“What a day..."Another wrote: "Not Posh and Becks please, there's no hope."”


"Click here to find the update."
"The news about bosh and Beck came out of the blue after nearly 19 years of marriage."
"Thank you for subscribing. We have more newsletters showing that I see our privacy statement invalid email. Twitter speculates that it is a popular rumor that bosh and Baker are going to split."
"The former Spice Girl married a world famous football player in 1999."
"David and Victoria have four children - Brooklyn, 19, Romeo, 15, Cruz, 13 and Harper, 6."
"The spice girls ran into the Manchester United player in a charity football match 21 years ago
"It's not sure whether the famous couple will go their separate ways, but people have lost their minds on twitter."
"Ah, this is the story of bosh and Beck. Really I love them - tiff, do you (@ ichenique) June 8, 2018, PEP Harris tweeted: "I can't believe what I just read."
"If bosh and Beck break up, what hope do the rest of us have?"
"What a beautiful day..." Another netizen wrote: "please don't bosh and Beck, there is no hope."



**Something goes wrong**
“Both are wearing their diamond watches and she is sporting her engagement ring, which Justin had helped design and which features a large, oval diamond and 18-karat gold band.”
“Hailey shared on her Instagram page a photo of her standing on the steps of a private jet near the singer, whose annual earnings are estimated to be $83.5 million, according to Forbes.”
“"Me and bae," he wrote.”
“On Friday, almost a week after the 24-year-old singer proposed to the 21-year-old model, daughter of actor Stephen Baldwin, in the Bahamas with a massive diamond ring, he posted on his Instagram Story a photo of the two wearing matching his and hers diamond watches.”
“Hailey Baldwin is sporting some extra bling after getting engaged to Justin Bieber.”


"Both are wearing diamond watches, and she is wearing an engagement ring, which Justin helped design with a large oval diamond and an 18 carat gold ring."
Hayley shared a picture on instagram of her standing on the steps of a private plane near the singer, which has an estimated annual revenue of $83.5 million, Forbes reported
"Me and Bei," he wrote
"On Friday, the 24-year-old singer wore a huge diamond ring when he proposed to the daughter of 21-year-old model and actor Stephen Baldwin in the Bahamas. Nearly a week later, he posted a picture of them wearing a matching diamond watch on instagram."
"Haley Baldwin is engaged to Justin Bieber and wears extra jewelry."



Number  297
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Please visit the source responsible for the item in question to report any concerns you may have regarding content or accuracy.”
“The news articles, Tweets, and blog posts do not represent IMDb's opinions nor can we guarantee that the reporting therein is completely factual.”
“This content is published for the entertainment of our users only.”
“Foxx and Theron sat together at the Mayweather -McGregor fight in Las Vegas, […]IMDb.com, Inc. takes no responsibility for the content or accuracy of the above news articles, Tweets, or blog posts.”
“One of the news tabloids claims Holmes is jealous of the supposed Pda at the sporting event, but Gossip Cop has the truth.”
“Is Katie Holmes furious about Jamie Foxx and Charlize Theron allegedly flirting at last month’s Floyd Mayweather Conor McGregor boxing match?”


"Please visit the person in charge of the relevant project and report any concerns about content or accuracy."
"News articles, tweets and blog posts don't represent IMDB's opinions, and we can't guarantee that the reports in them are completely true."
"This content is published just to entertain our users."
"Fox and Theron are sitting together in the Mayweather McGregor game in Las Vegas ] IMDb.com , Inc. assumes no responsibility for the content or accuracy of the above news articles, tweets or blog posts. "
A tabloid claimed that Holmes was jealous of his PDA at sporting events, but gossip police was telling the truth
Is Katie Helms angry about the allegations of flirting between Jamie Fox and Charlize Theron in Floyd Mayweather Connor Mcgregor's boxing match last month?



Number  298
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
““She is now pressuring Travis to pop the question ASAP and she wants a massive ring too.” Well, if Travis proposes, does that mean he’ll finally move in with Kylie (if he hasn’t already?)”
“To be sure, fans better keep an eye on Travis’s arms.”
“Kylie Jenner just said that she lives with her bestie, Jordyn Woods, instead of with her baby daddy, Travis Scott.”
“Does this mean there’s trouble in paradise?”
“Gasp!”
“Are Travis Scott, 27, and Kylie Jenner, 20, on the rocks?”
“Probably not, but what the Keeping Up with the Kardashians star said while filming a makeup tutorial for Vogue raised some eyebrows – pun intended.”
““I test out most of my stuff on Jordyn [Woods, 20] because we live together,” Kylie said, revealing that she shares a home with her BFF instead of her BF and baby daddy.”
““ So I’m like, ‘Jordyn, I need you.’ Everyone that comes in my house has tinted red arms from swatches and shadows.”Actually, Kylie didn’t make it clear whether or not Travis lives with Kylie and Jordyn.”
“Considering that Kylie owns a 13,000-square-feet home with eight bedrooms, 11 bathrooms (one she reportedly paid $12 million for in 2016, according to House Beautiful), it’s not beyond reason to think her boyfriend has a space of his own.”


"She's putting pressure on Travis to ask this question as soon as possible, and she wants to get a big ring, too." Well, if Travis proposes, does that mean he'll eventually live with Kelly (if he hasn't yet?)
"To be sure, the fans had better pay attention to Travis's arm."
"Kelly Jenner just said she lives with her good friend Jordan woods, not with her little dad Travis Scott."
"Does that mean there's trouble in heaven?"
"Breathe!"
Are Travis Scott, 27, and Kelly Jenner, 20, on the rocks? "
"Maybe not, but what the Kardashian star said when shooting a make-up course for fashion caught some people's attention - it's a pun."
"I tested most of my stuff on Jordyn (woods, 20) because we live together," said Kelly, who revealed that she shared a home with her boyfriend rather than her boyfriend and little dad
"So I said," Jordan, I need you. " Everyone who came to my house dyed their arms red with a palette and shadow. "In fact, Kelly didn't make it clear whether Travis lived with Kelly and Jordan."
"Given that Kelly has a 13000 square foot home with eight bedrooms and 11 bathrooms (she was reported to have bought one for $12 million in 2016, according to house beautiful), she has no reason to think her boyfriend has his own space."



Number  299
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Let's hope they reunite soon!”
“Recently, a source close to the couple told E!”
“Rumor mills are busy claiming that the 23-year-old has her heart set on yet another One Direction singer, Harry Styles.”
“According to NW, the Victoria's Secret model is interested in dating Zayn Malik's former band member.”
“"At the top of Gigi's man wish list is none other than Zayn's former band mate," the tabloid claims.”
“"She's always had a crush on him," a dubious insider claimed, adding that a Hadid-Styles hookup would be a "bit against girl code," Kendall Jenner previously dated him.”
“However, "she reckons Kenny will give her her blessing," the source added.”
“"But it's going to be a serious slap in the face for Zayn when he finds out!"”
“As shocking as these claims sound, Gossip Cop clears the air that these are merely rumors and nothing holds true.”
“Furthermore, several tabloids have been reporting that Gigi and Zayn are getting back together.”


"Hope they get together soon!"
"Recently, a source close to the couple told e!"
There are rumors that mills, 23, is busy claiming that her heart has fallen on another singer, Harry stiles
According to NW, the Victoria's Secret model is interested in dating former members of zayn Malik's band
"On Gigi's men's wish list, it's no one else. It's zayn's former band partner," the tabloid claimed
"She's always infatuated with him," a suspicious insider claimed, adding that Hadid style collusion would be a "bit of a violation of the girls' code," Kendall Jenner had dated him before
"But," she expected Kenny to bless her, "the source added
"But if Zane finds out, it will be a heavy slap in the face!"
"Although these statements sound shocking, the gossip police clarified that these are just rumors and nothing is true."
"In addition, several tabloids have reported that Gigi and Zane are getting back together."



Number  300
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
The total pass rate is  0.24381625441696114
Correct number is  69
Total number is  283
(base) mayingruideMacBook-Air:script mayingrui$ 
